A 2
CHAPTER I.
SCENE IN THE BANQUET-CHAMBER.
The
ease and affability of the Count of Osma soon
thawed the ice of ceremony and suspicion with which
the councillors at first received the honour that had
been so graciously extended towards them; and even
the president, as the banquet proceeded, began to think
his suspicions hasty and ill-grounded. All doubts,
however, of honourable purpose of the governor were
not effectually banished; and occasionally they
flashed
back upon his mind with redoubled force, as some
sinister word or look would betray itself through his
guarded language or manner. That the Spaniard was
playing a double part, he was well satisfied; and,
though his address and bearing invited confidence, he
felt that, in yielding it, he was playing with an adder in
his bosom.
So, gentlemen, said the count, setting down a cup
of wine, and speaking as if pursuing easy conversation
with his guests, I learn your fair city has been
sadly
torn by seditions of late, and that the young Marquis
of Caronde, an arrant scapegrace, hath laid claim to
the government?
He did make the attempt, your excellency,
answered
one of the councillors, on whose face the
count's eye chanced to rest as he spoke; but, his
purpose being lawless, and the king's commission
having
also expired at his father's demise
You saw fit, interrupted the count, laughing
sarcastically
,
to create seven uncommissioned rulers
instead! Methinks this were aggravating the evil.
What say you, Signor President? he asked, with a
careless air.
Now, by my mine honour, I like not that count's
manner well, whispered Renault.
Hush, and give heed, answered Estelle, quickly.
That, on the death of the royal governor, the
power
became vested in the people till resumed by his
majesty, who might then delegate it to whom he saw
fit, answered the president, firmly.
And so, until this event, the people made choice of
a tribunal to manage the state affairs, composed of
seven citizens, which body I have now the honour to
entertain at my humble table? he observed,
affirmatively
rather than interrogatively.
We did yesterday morning composed such a
tribunal
,
your excellency, he replied, with dignity, but
we are now private citizens.
So I learn, said the count, dryly. It has been
so told to me, as well as your reason for dissolving
your council.
The president evidently did not like the tone in
which this was said, but, without giving utterance to
his feelings, replied, in an even voice,
We are no longer in authority, Sir Count, 'tis
true.
The people took it back to give it to Spain. Was
it not so?
'Tis true they forgot their country for love of their
own interests.
And thus were basely ungrateful to thee, methinks.
I will, out of my gratitude to thee, Signor President,
repay it to them. Thou wilt gladly see them
requited
,
I doubt not.
On the contrary, signor, we hold the welfare of
our fellow-citizens to heart, and would fain now urge
upon you, who have succeeded us, clemency in
changing
their laws with the change of government,
responded
the president, who, with characteristic
patriotism
,
took the first opportunity of securing the welfare
of his fellow-citizens.
And give them to retain their judges also,
asswered
the count, sarcastically. We had best
restore
your power, signor, and go back to Spain, even
as you sent us back three years ago.
Ha! he forgets not that day! said Renault,
involuntarily
.
Nay, signor, continued the president, who saw
that the memory of the past had flushed the cheek and
kindled the eye of the Spaniard, I ask not this.
Conquered countries are allowed to retain their own
laws for a few years, that the transition may be
gradual
and healthy to all parties. This is not a
conquered
province, thank Heaven! but yet you would change
our laws and the language of the courts in one day.
It would be greatly for the advantage and tranquillity
of the inhabitants, if justice were to be administered
for a while longer according to the laws, forms, and
usages of the land. It is oppression, your excellency,
in the highest degree, to require that a community
should at once submit to a total change in the laws
that have hitherto governed it, and be compelled to
regulate its conduct by rules of which it is totally
ignorant
.
No necessity demands it, and no policy
justifies
it. The friendship hitherto existing between
Louis
XV. and the King of Spain should have been a
weighty influence with the latter to secure this
privilege
to the other's subjects. Louis expected it, or he
would never have condemned us to such a destiny.
By the rood, signor, you are bold, answered the
count, who had listened with surprise to the plain and
fearless language of the president, who even now
seemed to be ready to risk his life for the people he
had governed, although they had so basely revolted
from their allegiance to bow the neck to the Spanish
yoke.
I am bold because humanity is so, your
excellency
,
he answered, steadily, and without quailing
beneath
the stern eyes that surveyed his face.
This is the temper of spirit I have had to contend
with all along in getting foothold in this province!
this is the temper that has twice bathed your city's
square with the blood of Spanish men! To you,
gentlemen
,
I owe a debt you shall not long stand creditor
for.
The storm is bursting, said Estelle.
I am ready, said Renault, laying his hand upon
the door.
Not yet, she said, restraining him; and
remember
thy oath!
That we have disputed the possession of Spain, I
admit; that we would have disputed it, if we had
the power, to this moment, I confess, answered the
president, with spirit. You are displeased, sir!
But these very efforts to preserve our natal soil from
the rule of a foreign prince originated in our
attachment
to our own; and you ought to behold in our
conduct a pledge of our future devotion to Spain, if
hereafter we should personally yield to her our
allegiance
.
Santiago me!
I have not been misled in my
knowledge of your character. You have taken a
superior
part yourself, signor, in the revolt since the first
claim of Spain, both as a citizen and now as a ruler;
and it is mainly through your influence in encouraging
the leaders, instead of using your best endeavours to
keep the people in the fidelity and subordination they
owed to their sovereign, that Spain has so long been
kept from her just rights, and the whole province in a
state of sedition, he answered, warmly. It is
therefore
,
he added, rising, and speaking with stern
displeasure
,
and his eyes kindling with vengeance, and
it is therefore that your laws are changed and your
tribunals abolished! It is therefore that I would place
my foot upon the neck of your people. It is
therefore
that I have called you hither this evening, that
henceforward rebellious councillors may learn what
it is to excite revolt against Spain, and insult Ramarez
of Osma! Ho, secure the traitors! he cried, in a
loud and fierce tone to the slaves, who had, hitherto,
stood like statues behind the seat of the councillors.
Now is the time, in Heaven's name! But spare
my father! cried Estelle.
Before Renault could throw open the door, the hand
of an Ethiopian slave was upon the throat of each
guest, save that of the president, and a gleaming
dagger
was suspended in the air above their breasts.
Seize the assassins! cried Renault, behind the
Spaniard's chair, in a voice not less stern than his own.
Before the count could turn his head, he saw that
the banquet-room was filled with armed men, who
instantly
seized and disarmed his slaves, and then fixed
upon himself looks of deadly resentment, as if only
awaiting their leader's nod to bury the swords they
pressed against the naked bosoms of the blacks into
their hearts, and then sheathe them in his own. Among
them he beheld a noble-looking youth, whose bearing
and dress bespoke him to be their captain, in whose
indignant countenance, as he stood before him, fixing
upon him his clear, flashing eyes, which it seemed he
would never take off, he thought he read his own fate.
He sat glaring upon him in silence, paralyzed between
surprise, fear, and disappointed vengeance.
From the lattice Estelle had witnessed the whole
scene! the grateful but astonished councillors looking
upon their deliverer as if he had dropped from the
skies; the haughty and indignant bearing of Renault;
the cringing and terrified slaves; her wonder-stricken
and confused father, as he gazed about him, and shrunk
beneath the stern glance of the youth! All this she
witnessed with mixed feelings of gratitude, joy, and
shame; and deep indeed was the crimson that dyed
her cheek when she heard her father thus addressed:
Sir Spaniard, said Renault, sternly, after gazing
upon him as if he would convey through his eyes the
bitterness of his resentment against the author of the
deed he had been the instrument of averting; Sir
Spaniard, under Heaven thou art indebted to other
causes
than thine own mercy for not shedding the blood
of seven innocent men with the dagger of the
assassin
!
It is not enough that thou hast abolished our
sacred tribunals and overturned our laws, but thou
must bathe thy hands in the blood of the judges of the
land. If guilty of offences against the state, why were
they not arraigned before thee and tried by their
peers, according to the sacred laws of all
Christendom
?
Their holy patriotism is guilt in thine eyes.
Yet it is not for this thou wouldst do sevenfold
murder
!
Personal wrongs rankle in thy unforgiving
bosom
,
and thou wouldst make these a sacrifice to thy
wounded self-love! Thou wert driven hence in dire
disgrace three years ago, and, now that the power is
in thine hands, thou wouldst have avenged thyself upon
the whole province by the slaughter of its rulers!
And how wouldst thou have done it? Under the
sacred
guise of heaven-born hospitality; with thy
wine-cups
in their hands, and thy wine warming their hearts
and thine own too, were it flesh and not stone! And
well hast thou chosen the hour and the place! the
noise of revelry drowning that of murder, and thy
carefully-barred doors shutting out human aid, even
if the shrieks of thy victims should silence yonder
revels!
Who art thou, and wherefore dost thou beard me
in mine own halls? haughtily demanded the count,
who had by this time recovered from his first surprise
at the mysterious presence of these deliverers of the
councillors at the very moment when their lives were
staked; who art thou, that dost use language so
daring
to a chief in the midst of his own armyto a
governor in his own palace?
I am the defender of the innocent against a tyrant,
answered Renault. Lay not thy hand upon thy
weapon, Sir Knight! it will little avail thee; besides,
we intend no harm to thy person; not for love of thee,
mark! but we have made oath to a stranger who led
us hither, that, whatever we do, we will not harm thee.
Let these venerable councillors retire, and we will
leave thee to the fit society of these trembling slaves,
whom thou wouldst have made the instruments of thy
private vengeance. They are but tools, and also shall
escapethough, by'r lady! you all deserve a common
death. See that the slaves retain no weapons, and let
them go, he added, to his men.
Dismissed from the grasp of their captors, the
cringing
slaves crowded together at the extremity of the
chamber, as if yet expecting death; while Sulem, who,
from the first, had thrown himself upon his face at his
master's feet, rose up at Renault's bidding, and
presented
his colossal proportions to the wondering gaze
of his band. In his right hand he held a cimeter;
but the hand trembled, and the hideous face of the
Ethiopian betrayed mortal fear. True to deal an
assassin's
secret blow at his master's bidding, the slave
was false when open danger menaced, and now
betrayed
the cowardice of his sanguinary nature.
Sulem! cleave him to the floor; why is thy
cimeter
idle? cried Osma, roused to fury by the cool and
resolute bearing of the young chief.
Martin, said Renault, take this Goliath's cimeter
from him. He seems to have lost loyalty to his master
in his adverse fortunes.
Without a word, Sulem surrendered his weapon;
and the impression made on Renault's mind by his
submissive manner was, that there needed but a word
from himself to cause him to plunge it into the breast
he should have protected with it.
Broken, indeed, proves the reed my poor father
leaned upon; but he hath taught Sulem treachery, and
what but treachery could he have expected from him?
said Estelle, mentally, on seeing this.
Yet it will be seen that Sulem's subtlety and habits
of obedience overmastered his fears; and, from his
subsequent conduct, it will be questionable if cowardice
had as much to do with his actions as cunning.
Thou seest, Count of Osma, that thy trustiest arm
fails thee now, said Renault. But thou needest not
its aid! We are content to have saved these
gentlemen
,
whom thou wouldst have slain at thine own board,
mingling their blood with thy wine. Hath God sent
the land a demon to rule over it, that the thought of
such a crime as thou hast meditated should enter the
heart of man?
While he was speaking, the count caught the eye
of Sulem; met it with a stern reproof, and then
glanced significantly to his own hand. Sulem
understood
him; and, in reply, touched, as if carelessly, with
his forefinger, the count's signet, given to him in the
hall of audience for another purpose. Then, watching
his opportunity, at a single bound he leaped through
the door, beside which, at the lattice, was stationed the
disguised Estelle; and, before he could be arrested,
had flown past her, and was far beyond pursuit at the
extremity of the passage.
Hold! pursue him not, cried Renault to his men.
Your presence is needed here! Gentlemen, I pray
you retire while you can do it safely, he added,
addressing
the councillors; there may be nothing more
in this sudden escape than the cowardice of a
traitorous
servant. But, lest mischief could come out of it,
I beseech you let me see you presently in safety. I
lived long in this place, as you all are aware, when my
father governed, and chanced to know that there is a
concealed door behind yonder arras, which, by a
private
stairway, conducts you to the outer court of the
prisons, and thence into the street. It is not safe for
you to pass out through the palace guards as you
entered
.
Follow me, gentlemen.
Thus speaking, Renault crossed the chamber, drew
aside the arras, and exposed a low door, which, by
touching a spring, he opened. Within was a dark
stairway, faintly lighted at the bottom by the moonlight
entering from the outer door beneath.
Gentlemen, this will conduct you to the street;
thence your way is plain to your homes. I would
despatch
half of my men with you as a guard, but their
Vol. II.B
presence would attract attention, and add nothing to
your safety. My venerable father! he said to the
president, who was expressing his gratitude for his aid
in saving his life, you owe it not to me, but to a
gallant
stranger, who has not appeared on the scene to
receive the thanks that are his due. Farewell! Mount
your horses, each of you, gentlemen, and leave the
city within the hour for the fortress, where there are
brave men to receive you! The countersign of the
east gate, and which I learned from this brave
stranger
,
is `
Osma's justice
,' which liked to have been
illustrated
but for our timely presence.
Ha! knowest thou it? exclaimed Osma, with
surprise.
Mount and ride; this poor town is no longer a
place for true men. Say to Charleval, then added
Renault, in a lower tone, I will be with him at evening
to-morrow, when I shall not return to the city till we
ride into it as conquerors and avengers. Go, with
Heaven's blessing, gentlemen! he added, embracing
each as they passed through the door and descended
the staircase.
Now, Signor Count Osma, said Renault, after
they had departed, inasmuch as I have stepped between
thee and thy bloody vengeance, and the victims of thy
vindictiveness are beyond thy reach, I will leave thee
to the residue of thy feast; and, by'r lady! in absence
of the gentlemen thou didst make this supper for,
intending
it should be their last, thou shalt fain have
guests better fitting thee. So, slaves, seat yourselves
at the board! it is beseeming that slaves should be a
tyrant's guests, and it becomes a tyrant to feast only
with such. Down with ye, slaves! cried Renault,
between irony and stern indignation.
The trembling slaves obeyed, and the table was once
more surrounded with guests. But what guests
indeed
!
Osma heard the command with surprise, and
saw it obeyed with a terrific ferocity of aspect. Thrice
he looked from the table to the young chief, and thrice
from the young chief to the table, alternately, as if
questioning his senses. His haughty spirit blazed at
the insult. The deadliest vengeance flashed from his
eyes. His lips grew livid, and his brow became black
as night. Renault watched these tokens of a tempest
within him with a smile upon his lip, which was only
wanting to inspire the count with fury. Like an
enraged
tiger; disdaining his sword, he sprung upon
Renault
,
and fixed his hands upon his throat and breast
with the grasp of demoniac vengeance. Quicker than
lightning, the young quadroon grappled with him in the
same manner, and, face to facethe one with eyes
literally
blazing with rage, the other with a cool and
steady gazethey confronted each other with deadly
purpose. Several of the
courreurs du bois
sprung
forward
to Renault's relief, but he restrained them with a
look.
Unhand me, Sir Count! at length cried Renault,
who grew flushed in the face with the pressure upon
his throat, or I shall do thee mortal injury.
Never! said the count, with a malignant smile of
desperate revenge.
I have sworn not to harm thee, he continued,
speaking with difficulty.
Ha! ha! laughed the Spaniard, with hellish sounds,
as he pressed still harder upon his windpipe, and, with
his other hand upon his breast, seemed to clinch into
the flesh, as if seeking to tear through to his heart.
Thy blood be upon thine own head, then! gasped
Renault.
Spareoh spare my father! shrieked a female
voice behind them at this menace.
But, ere he heard, Renault had released his hold upon
the count's throat, drawn a dagger from his belt, and,
holding it above his breast, threatened him with instant
death. At the same time with the shriek, his uplifted
hand was arrested by a woman's bright arm passing
before his eyes. The hold it fastened upon his wrist
was slight, and he could easily have thrown it off; but
there is an indescribable power in a woman's voice or
intervening arm that instantly stays the fiercest spirit
and suspends the strongest hand. Renault felt it. His
hand remained immoveable where it had been arrested
by the light grasp laid upon it! With the most
wondering
astonishment, he beheld before him a beautiful
girl, habited in the very cloak his guide had worn
the hat itself cast at her feether superb head
without
a coveringand her bright, auburn hair bound with
a coronet of pearls and precious stones. Her large
blue eyes were turned upon him imploringly, while
with the other hand she released the relaxing gripe of
the surprised count from his throat. He gazed upon
her with wonder and adoring admiration. The cloak
the flapping
sombrero
the youthful cheek he had seen
beneath itcould it be? it was none other, he was
convinced, than his late guide! The count was her
father, then! Hence this singular regard for him,
mingled
with desire to save the councillors. He saw that
the noble daughter had risked all to become the saviour
of a father's honour, and save the lives of innocent
men! He read the whole at a glance. He now
remembered
the soft hand he had pressed, and the
tremulous
voice that at times fell on his ear. He
remembered
the language he had interchanged with her upon
love and womanly devotion. His guide was, then, a
beautiful woman! As he gazed upon her, the dagger
dropped from his hand, and, with eyes full of adoration,
he cast himself on one knee before her, and said, with
a depth of feeling that surprised himself,
Gentle maiden, forgive me the act! it was a menace
only to save my own life. But, had I known thou wert
his daughter, I would have lot him slain me before I
could have lifted my hand against him. Pardon me,
I pray thee!
I have nothing to pardon, brave youth; thy life was
endangered, and it was done in thy defence. But thou
didst wantonly draw my father's ire upon thee by
seating
his slaves at his board! she said, with something
like displeasure.
I confess my fault, he said, with a mantling brow;
but
Nay, thou hast no need to excuse thyself! Thou
hast acted with more moderation than I hoped for. Bid
those slaves leave the board, and receive my thanks
for thy courage and confidence.
She slightly blushed as she spoke; and, turning from
the handsome eyes of Renault, which were fixed
admiringly
upon her beauty, she cast herself
affectionately
upon the breast of her parent, who sternly
continued
to survey her and the disguise she partly
retained
in silence, and by his looks seemed to
understand
its object.
Away, traitress! he cried, casting her from him.
My dear father
Thou hast betrayed mebegone!
Nay, she cried, clinging to him, I have loved
thee too well to betray thee! I knew thou didst
contemplate
a deed that would tarnish thy name, and
wound thy knightly honour
And so, to conceal the guilt, hast led hither an
armed
band to blazon it to the world. Out! thou art a
poor pleader!
Nay, it was to save the world from being startled
at a deed for which men have no name, she said,
with great boldness. Thou couldst ne'er have
concealed
the crime! if indeed from earth, never from
Heaven!
Silence! thou hast done worthy of death thyself!
he said, fiercely.
I am ready to atone, then, with my life. Heaven
is my witness, I sought only thy honour, my father!
Cast off this cloak, and retire to thy chamber.
Wilt thou not embrace me?
Away! I cannot abide thee! he said, waving
his hand commandingly.
Dropping from her graceful shoulders the
roquelaure
,
displaying by the act a form of the divinest
symmetry
,
with a pale and drooping cheek she slowly
retired
from the banquet-chamber. Renault's eyes
followed
her until she disappeared, and he then felt that
she had carried away his heart.
B 2
But what have I, an accursed quadroon
I
, to do
with a maiden's love like her? Like the worshippers
of the sun, I may adore her afar off till blinded by my
devotion, and my heart is burned up by her
unapproachable
brightness. Alas! for what do I live?
wherefore do I court life? From this hour death is
most welcome! Why did Heaven give me a heart to
love, and then link me with a race to whom love is
forbidden? Beautiful maiden! I will not insult thee
by thinking of thee; yet not to think of thee were
not to exist. Thus thought Renault as he turned
from the door through which she had retired from his
ardent gaze.
So, young sir, thou art indebted to yonder foolish
girl for thy presence here to-night? By the rood!
thou didst happen in at a happy time; and not to make
thee welcome were discourtesy to my hospitality, said
the count, in a sarcastic tone.
Renault cast aside his gloomy reflections, and
looked
into the speaker's face with surprise at the words he
spoke; but a glance at his ironical lip, and hard, quiet
eye, told him how dangerous was the man with whom
he had to do.
We thank thee, Count of Osma, for thy words,
he replied, assuming the same subtle tone; but,
having
witnessed the display of thy hospitality once this
evening, will be so uncourteous as to decline troubling
thee for farther exhibitions of it.
At this moment the bolts and bars were suddenly
removed by some persons outside the door leading
into the hall. Osma's eyes lighted up with pleasure
as he replied,
Thou shalt not depart till thou hast tasted it,
nevertheless
.
The doors were thrown wide as he spoke, and
Sulem the Moor, with a score of men-at-arms, rushed
into the chamber.
Sulem, thou hast redeemed thy cowardice, said
the count to him; and then shouted aloud, Seize and
disarm these traitorous rebels, who would-beard their
governor in his very banquet-chamber! If the dogs
resist, cut them down!
Renault was not taken unawares; the noise of the
moving bolts and the elated voice of the Spaniard
prepared him for a hostile surprise. He gave a single
command, and his brave
courreurs du bois
formed
themselves
,
with drawn swords and pistols levelled, on the
opposite side of the table; and, when the door was
thrown open, they were ready to meet and resist the
expected assailants. While the last word of
command
was yet on the count's lip, Renault wound a
startling peal on his bugle, and, in answer, had the
satisfaction to behold through the door green plumes
waving beyond and above the helmets of the
men-at-arms
,
and near the door to hear another bugle reply.
Stay, Count of Osma, he said, with a smile, and,
ere you seek to enforce your command, tell me the
meaning of yonder cluster of green plumes!
Osma looked into the hall, and saw with dismay that
his men-at-arms were closed upon from the rear by a
band in the same uniform with those within the
banquet-chamber
.
Hold, men-at-arms! he cried, on seeing this
superior
force; treachery and rebellion hath the better
of it this night. Let these retire, if they will,
unmolested
.
Thou hast done well, Sir Spaniard, said Renault,
haughtily, and hast avoided a second scene such as
I believe thou wert a party to three years ago! The
count replied with a look of deadly hostility, and, as
Renault led his band from the chamber, he scornfully
asked.
Pray what do men name thee, good youth, that I
may know to whom I am indebted for this visit to my
banquet-room?
My name is Renault the Quadroon.
Ha! he exclaimed, with unfeigned surprise, and
then added, with a peculiar smile, that had, he knew
not why, a most extraordinary effect upon Renault, I
have lately heard of thee. Go, and I will remember
thee and
thine!
Renault had, with his men, passed through Osma's
minions, and joined the rest of the band without, before
the last words of the Spaniard, which rung
forebodingly
,
flashed in their full meaning upon his ear.
On thee and
thine!
he repeated, with alarm.
Azlie! Hath he seen her? Martin, he cried to
his lieutenant, when we gain the Place d'Armes, ride
with the band to the rendezvous, and remain till I join
you. Something evil will come of this night's work,
I fear me!
In a compact body the band of
courreurs du bois
marched down through the hall, which had been
nearly
deserted by the alarmed citizens on the approach of
the men-at-arms, and, gaining the square, mounted
their horses and galloped to their rendezvous; while
Renault, on the wings of apprehension and mistrust,
rode to his own abode, which he had not entered since
his departure a little after midnight of the night before.
CHAPTER II.
SCENE BETWEEN THE COUNT AND THE ASSASSIN.
The
Count of Osma, without a word of explanation,
remanded his guards to their station in the
Plaza
before
the palace, and was left only with Sulem and the
slaves. Sending the latter away, he paced the
chamber
which had been the scene of such varied events, as
if to get time to calm his thoughts. At length the
agitated and violent character of his face settled down
into a still expression. Not a trace of anger, or
vindictiveness
,
or disappointment remained. All was
calm save the eye, which shone with a triumphant
light. He had formed a plan to avenge himself upon
Renault, against whom he concentrated all his
displeasure
towards his daughter, and his vengeance at being
thwarted in the assassination of the judges.
Follow me, Sulem, he said, leaving the chamber.
Traversing half the length of the paved passage
along which Estelle had guided Renault and his band,
he opened a door at the left, and entered a small but
elegant cabinet, with which communicated a sleeping
and ante room.
Didst thou not tell me, slave, that this lovely
quadroone
,
Azlie, had a brother Renault, a youth in great
favour with the town's-people, and of late leader of a
party hostile to Spain?
Even so, cadi.
Of whom learned you this?
Of the same porter at the gate of their dwelling,
answered the Moor; for, obedient to his master's
orders given at the door of the Cathedral, he had, at
an indifferent, careless pace, followed Azlie to her
threshold, where, seeing the old porter take a look
out into the street before closing the gate after them,
he skilfully detained him, and, by shrewdly-put
questions
,
learned everything he desired to know of the
quadroone family. He then returned and reported it
to the count, who, involved in the busy affairs of the
day, scarce questioned him at the time beyond his
relation
,
though by no means indifferent to his
communication
.
He was now free from his engagements,
and, as his sudden passion for the fair quadroone was
stronger than his resentment against the brother, he
banished from his breast all else, and gave his mind up
only to its gratification. He reflected a few moments
after Sulem had answered, and then observed abruptly,
Said you not one spoke with you in the hall who
desired to see me on matters of moment?
He bade me say he could serve your excellency
better than a score of men-at-arms if you would give
him audience.
Did you bid him wait?
Nay, I was hastening with the guard to your
relief
Well, well, enough. Go, now, and see thou return
not without him. Stay! Heard you aught to-day of
the whereabout of this eccentric youngof Don
Henrique
I mean? He seems to delight in mystery.
Nothing beyond the words of the dark woman.
Go!
Left alone, Garcia of Osma threw himself into a
seat, and began to think over the events of the
evening
.
He had been thwarted in his deliberate and
coolly-planned attempt to assassinate the provincial
rulers
.
Did he hope to do so black a deed in secret,
and to escape after without suspicion, and walk among
men unmarked by the finger of detestation? No. He
was willingthe deed doneto publish it! and,
trusting
to the protection of the army he commanded, defy
the province. To his own king and the Spanish cortes
he was the representative of his own person, and the
only source through which his personal acts could be
officially recognised. He was now foiled indeed; but,
inwardly determining that his vengeance should yet
have its victims, he banished for the present these
reflections
,
and passed the time until Sulem's return in
the contemplation of the enchanting quadroone,
resolving
to combine his revenge towards Renault with his
passion for her.
Sulem had heard from the porter of Renault's pride;
and the count's knowledge of character plainly told
him that the high-spirited youth would scarce resign
his sister to an open enemy, though of so high a rank
as himself; and that, in pursuing his passion, he was
best bringing about his vengeance. But Ramarez of
Osma was not a man to let a deep affront be atoned
for alone by moral punishment however degrading.
Not only dishonour and contempt did he hope to heap
upon Renault through his sister, but he was sure never
to rest until he had also added his blood.
While he was meditating on this theme the Moor
reappeared, and ushered in a short, swarthy man,
with restless, snaky eyes, that seemed ever watchful
with suspicion. His dress was a blue frock, thickly
adorned with bell-shaped silver buttons, the breast and
cuffs of it covered with needlework. His
low-crowned
hat was worn with a cutthroat air above his eyes,
and his smallclothes and hose were of one piece, and
fitted tightly to a pair of spindle-legs, that had a gliding
rather than walking motion. He wore scarlet
morocco
slippers, a scarlet sash about his waist, and a
scarlet
bandanna kerchief loosely wound about his neck.
He looked a thorough-paced villain; and his thin, wiry
fingers had a constant and nervous clutch against the
palm, that reminded the observer of stilettos and
midnight
murders. Osma measured him at a glance, and
seemed, by a sort of freemasonry and affinity of
brotherhood, to read him at once. Without hesitation,
he said instantly to him,
You are the man I want.
I thought so, said the other, with a cold laugh.
You thought so, villain! repeated Osma, sternly.
I heard you had some matter to settle with the
quadroon Renault.
Who told thee?
My own wits, with the aid of my eyes and ears.
What is thy name?
Rascas.
Rascal, rather, if I might read it in thy face.
We should be cousins, then, for I read it in thine
to-day.
Ha! this is too bold, sir! cried the count, half
drawing his sword.
I am here to serve a bold man.
Go tothou hast as much brass as villany in thee.
In what wouldst thou serve me? he demanded,
eying
him sharply.
With my dagger.
Thou hast as little grace of speech as of visage,
sirrah.
And am, therefore, fitter for deeds.
Wherefore hast thou sought me?
To aid thee in thy vengeance and thy passions.
Dost thou know this?
I was in the Cathedral to-day, he answered, dryly.
And now do I remember I met thee in the street,
signor, said Sulem.
When thou wert coming from gossiping with
Renault's
garrulous porter, he answered, significantly.
By the rood, Monsieur Rascas, thou art invaluable
if thy discretion measure thy subtlety.
Gold will buy secrecy.
Be it so. Sulem, place in his hands an onza of
gold. Thou shalt have this, sirrah, so long as thou
servest me faithfully. But, if thou prove false to me,
I shall not be backward in changing it for steel.
Thou art never backward in its use, if men lie
not.
Thy tongue is flippant, sirrah.
I did but allude to thy soldierly skill, signor,
answered
Rascas, with an ironical leer.
Thou knowest more than thou wouldst seem to
know of me.
We have met in Spain, signor.
Ha! When?
On the night the southern tower of the castle of
Osma fell into the sea.
The count started with an exclamation, and for a
moment eyed him fixedly.
Wilt trust me, signor? asked Rascas, with a
confident
smile.
Yes, yes. So thou speak to me no more of this.
Thou hast been a wanderer since
That night's work, dost thou mean?
Speak of it again, and thou diest.
Why, blood-letting afterward I took to so kindly,
that Spain became too warm for me, and I have since
been a traveller on other men's purses. But this
province
hath no wealthy hidalgoes; and I was wellnigh
impoverished and tempted to take to the highway,
when your excellency came and filled me with hopes;
for, by mine honour, though I have done a kindly deed
for many a cavalier since, I have never served so free
a hand as thyself.
Thou art a rare villain, sirrah; and I marvel thou
art unhung.
The devil hath sworn I shall not hang till a
greater
rogue than I be found to hang with me, said the
professional assassin, with a forward and bold bearing,
that caused the Count of Osma to bite his lip with
shame and vexation; for joint crime is a leveller of
all distinctions of rank, and he keenly felt it to be so.
Rascas, thou hast done well in coming hither; I
have need of thee, though not of thy dagger, this very
hour, he said, in a grave tone, that gave him to
understand
it was time for him to restrain his freedom
of tongue, and devote himself to the will of his new
master. Your knowledge of this city and people
will be of infinite use to me.
Speak, signor! he said, with attention.
In a few words the count detailed the scenes that
had transpired in the banquet-chamber, much of which
the wily villain had learned through listening, and that
spirit of ever-active suspicion which caused him to
know, as if by intuition, everything that passed around
him, if by any means he might work mischief out of
it for his own ends.
Now, sirrah, I would have you bear this note, he
said, writing it as he spoke, to the colonel of my
cuirassiers in the barracks. It is a command for him
to mount and follow you with sixty horse. These
station at the eastern gate, and, if not too late, take
these councillors prisoners as they ride forth. Here
is a new countersign for the night, Sulem, he
continued
to his slave, which bear to the captain of the
palace guards, and command him instantly to have it
delivered to all the posts; then go thyself, and, on thy
life, see that every barrier be closed for the night save
the eastern gate. Fly, and, having done my bidding,
hasten back hither.
It shall be done.
Now, Rascas, I depend on your sagacity and
cunning
,
as much as on the courage of my cuirassiers, to
seize these rebellious judges. It is not half an hour
since they left, and it will take time for them to
prepare
and get to saddle. If they have passed the gate,
pursue them.
Vol. II.C
What shall be done with them, signor, if taken?
Cast them into the keep of the prison, and then
bring me word. See that it is done without parade
or show of tumult. Away with thee.
The assassin glided from the apartment, and when
his light, swift tread ceased to reach his ear, the Count
of Osma threw over his rich banquet dress a sable
velvet cloak, and covered his brow with a black
Spanish
bonnet without a plume; then exchanging his
dress sword for a short hanger, and concealing his face
to the eyes with the folds of the mantle, he left the
cabinet, and, entering the marble passage, paused an
instant, as if undetermined which way to go. At
length he exclaimed,
A guerdon of thanks to this Renault. Yonder
private door, which he opened for the escape of the
councillors from the banquet-room, will aid my secret
departure from the palace.
He was about to turn in this direction, when the
light from Estelle's door arrested his eye. He
changed
his purpose instantly on seeing this, and walked
rapidly and noiselessly towards her apartment. The
door was ajar, and open wide enough to admit him.
He softly entered the antechamber, where two of her
slaves were sleeping on mats laid before the inner
door of her toilet closet. This door was open, and
all was still within. He entered, and beheld his
daughter kneeling beside an ottoman, on which her
head rested, her face laid on her snowy arm, sleeping
like a child. A tear was on one cheek, and a liquid
drop glittered with trembling lustre upon her long
eyelash
.
He gazed upon this sweet picture a few
moments
,
and his face grew sad and tender.
Poor child, thou hast wept thyself to sleep! he
said, half audibly. She hath but acted like a loving
daughter, to save a guilty father from what she
esteemed
a crimenot understanding I have power
of life and death! Sweet child! Thou lovest me,
Lil, and thou art, of human kind, all my stern heart
yearns to! I have too often wounded thy generous
spirit. I will forgive thee when thou wakest, for thou
art unhappy.
He stooped and kissed her, and the touch of his
lip instantly awoke her. She opened her eyes, and,
seeing who it was, and the kind look with which he
was bending over her, threw her arms around him,
and, joyfully repeating my dear father, burst into
tears.
Nay, Lil, thou hast my forgiveness, he said,
affectionately
.
Thou art ever kind to me, dearest father! Oh
that thou wert not thine own enemy!
Thine error is, child, that thou judgest my acts as
a conqueror and governor of a rebellious province, as
thou wouldst do those of a private person. Does the
king commit a crime when he condemns a traitor
to the scaffold? Is a judge a murderer who
sentences
the murderer to death? These men have done
deeds worthy of death. They have strengthened the
resistance of the colonists; have been the fomenters
of sedition in the town; and have not only refused to
surrender their authority and the seals of the province,
but have traitorously dissolved their body, and, by the
act, placed themselves in the attitude of rebels. 'Fore
Heaven! they are well worthy of death.
There is the tribunal of the Cabildo, my father,
where they should have been arraigned.
The judgment of the Cabildo is but the echo of
my own, girl. I adjudged them worthy of death
in the tribunal of my own mind, the Cabildo would
have done the same.
Nevertheless, thou wouldst have escaped the
odium
of the act, and not taken into thine own hands the
duty of the public executioner! she answered, with
animation.
Thou hast well spoken, child, he said, with a
changed manner, after a moment's thought; they
have now escaped. If taken, they shall be arraigned
before the tribunal of the Cabildo, as you desire. I
ought to thank thee I did not make my
banquet-room
a slaughter-house for the rebels, he continued,
smiling and tapping her cheek; but I would have
made an example of them to the people, and every
hour's delay was dangerous, inasmuch as rumours
reached me that they were already conspiring against
my power. The
escapade
of three hundred horsemen
through the eastern gate before dawn reported by the
captain of the guard, I have reason to think they had
something to do with. Now, my daughter, I have
forgiven
thee this once for thy filial love; but let not
any future interference in my affairs call from me
harsh chidings where alone I would speak the
language
of affection. Seek thy couch! To-morrow I
will have an entertainment for thee to receive the fair
signoras of the town, who, doubtless, desirous of
following
the example of their lords, would gladly throng
hither to pay homage to thy rank and beauty.
Nay, father, I need it not.
It becomes our station, daughter, to endure the
ceremony; besides, he added, with a smile, I would
see, with a father's jealousy, if Louisiana has
loveliness
to match thine. Seek thy couch early, that the
rose in the morning may take the place of the lily
now on thy cheek. Good-night,
mia alma
, he added,
kissing her.
Then, casting his mantle about his noble form, this
subtle, designing, intriguing manthe more dangerous
for the virtues that mingled with his vicesleft the
chamber, and traversed the paved passage to the private
banquet-room. He was about to enter, when a voice
within arrested his steps. Advancing cautiously
forward
,
he saw through the partly-open door a
singular-looking
being sitting in his own state-chair, at the head
of the gold and silver piled board, with a goblet of wine
in one hand and a pineapple in the other, alternately
sipping of the wine and eating of the fruit, keeping up
a running soliloquy between. His dress consisted of
a yellow doublet, spotted with black fleur-de-lis;
scarlet
breeches, and a high, conical cap of flaming red.
His shape was ludicrously deformed, a hump-back
here, and a bandy-leg there; while the count
wondered
at his physiognomy, having never before beheld so
extraordinary a one. He, moreover, seemed drunk.
Now I would steal this gold cup an' I knew it to
be gold, he soliloquized, surveying the goblet
wishfully
;
but gold hath a look o' brass; and, were I to
steal a brass goblet for a gold one, I'd hang myself for
an ass. Here be a silver tankard; that has a good
complexion and genuine. I'll put that in my pocket,
he said, suiting the action to the word. There is a
gold salt-spoon; verily it doth look like brass; but, an'
it were not gold, methinks cousin Spain would not
have it. I will take it at a venture; and, as the
saltcellar
is of no value without the spoon, like a mortar
without pestle, I must needs let it keep company with
the spoon. I would gossip Boviedo were here. He
could tell me an' these platters be silver. An' I thought
so, I would have the largest, and cut it up into
twelve-penny
bits. This bottle is out, but here is one that
hath a cup gone out o' it; I will e'en fill from it. 'Tis
strange I am not drunk! Had I brains like other
men for the wine to get into, I had been dead drunk
two good hours agone! Cousin Spain hath made a
bountifula bounteous supper, he said, surveying the
gorgeous board; it were a lucky hour I found my
way in here, and especially discovered this snug
supper
,
after my false subjects had left me for drunk in the
other room. 'Tis true (this wine hath flavour!) I did
roll off the table; but wine that doth not put a true
man on his back hath water in it(Ah! this is rare
wine; here's to cousin Osma's health!)but I got to
my feet again when I had laid long enough to do
credit
to the vintage. (This is grown in Madeira, or
Gobin
is a fool.) I would cousin Spain were here to
hob and nob; 'tis dull work drinking alone; it will
take till daylight to put all these seventeen bottles o'
wine 'eneath my belt. (I shall never love any other
wine save cousin Osma's after this.) I can get drunk
nine times at a sitting on't, and go home sober. Out
on the vile trash gossip Boviedo and I were sopping
C 2
our insides with last night! If a man get drunk on
it, he lieth twenty-four hours like a hog, and waketh
up with his head split in two. Here's to cousin Osma,
and may he never want good wine, or Gobin to drink
it for him! he added, emptying his goblet for the
third time since he was first discovered by the count.
Here's to cousin Gobin, who shall never drink bad
wine while Osma can give him good, responded the
count, amused at Gobin's soliloquy, and instantly
appreciating
and chiming in with the humour of his
character
.
He had entered the chamber before he spoke,
and, advancing unseen to the table, had a goblet already
in his hand, when Gobin looked up and beheld him.
Art thou cousin Osma? he asked, with ready
self-possession.
None other, gossip Gobin. Dost thou love wine?
Doth an unweaned child love its mother's milk?
he answered, without being moved by the sudden
appearance
of the governor.
How many goblets hast thou emptied, gossip?
asked the count, smiling.
When I get this and another down that I shall soon
pour out, cousin, I shall have seen the bottom o' it
eleven
times since I adjourned to this room.
Hast thou been feasting in the hall, too?
Wouldst thou have a man stuff his gullet with meat
when wine abounds? I have been
bibing
, cousin, not
feastingno, by my mother's beard!
And how many cups didst thou put down there?
Nineteen, cousin, and should ha' rounded the score
had I not tumbled off the table.
How comest thou here, then, in such sober guise?
The goodness o' the wine, cousin Osma, I got
drunk upon. I slept twenty minutes like an infant,
and got up as fresh as if wine had not crossed my lip
for a twelvemonth. Finding my compatriots fled, and
seeing a door partly open, I ventured in, and soon made
myself at home here.
So I perceive, worthy Gobin, and am glad thou
lovest my wine. Art thou in service in the town?
I am a gentleman of leisure, and live by mother
wit, he answered, gravely.
Wilt thou take service with me at wages? Thou
shalt serve at court.
Nay, folly is at a discount in courts. Nothing
hath merit nowadays but wine, he answered,
emptying
his cup.
Thou shalt drink such wine as that at thy dinner
each day, said the count, taken with a sudden humour
to attach him to his household.
I have a conscience at swearing allegiance, cousin.
Thou shalt not owe allegiance save to mirth and
folly. Our palace is somewhat grave, and we would
make thee master of mirth. Wilt thou serve me?
Verily will I do't, till I find a master who keepeth
better wine than thou dost. Let us take a goblet upon
it, gossip.
The count drank to him by the title of Bacchus the
Second, and then was about to deliver him, with the
deserted banquet-halls, to the care of his master of
the ceremonies, who chanced to approach at that
moment
,
when Gobin drew from his vest a small folded
and sealed paper, saying, with a drunken hiccough,
Speakin' o' Bacchus, gossip Spain, reminds me
that a womankind made me a Mercury, and bade me
place this in thy hands ere I touched goblet to lip.
Thou seest I have most faithfully done her bidding!
A most trusty messenger, said the count, taking
the note from him.
With an eager and surprised eye, he read the
superscription
to The most noble Count Ramarez of Osma,
in a strong but evidently female hand. He tore it
open.
Ninine, the mother of the Quadroone Azlie, has
witnessed the noble Count Osma's admiration of her
daughter. If agreeable to his excellency to grant her
an audience in his own cabinet, the intimation of his
wishes will be a command to
Ninine
,
The connt read this extraordinary, but in that clime,
in that day, no unusual document, with a degree of
gratification
he could not conceal.
This is far beyond my hopes! Fortune hath
favoured
me strangely, he said, half aloud. How well
hath that handsome, intriguing mother read my deep
passion! This is my first lesson in the romance of
this Western Ind. I will go to this interview, and,
thanks to my cousin Gobin, I shall not have to trust to
stratagem, as I was about to do, to gain admittance
beneath
the same roof with this divine Azlie. Now are
love and revenge both in my grasp.
He threw aside, as he spoke, the arras that concealed
the door through which the councillors had escaped,
and, followed by his Cuban bloodhound, descended
the stairway to the street. Here he carefully and
effectually
enveloped his features and person in the folds
of his mantle from the scrutiny of passers-by; for at
that early hour, nine o'clock having just struck, the
Place d'Armes and streets adjacent were filled with
revellers retiring from the banquet, and citizens, male
and female, drawn forth either by curiosity or the calm
beauty of the night. Then, taking his way for a short
distance along the shaded wall of the prison, he turned
into a side street and disappeared.
CHAPTER III.
TWILIGHT SCENE BETWEEN LOVERS.
After
the departure of Renault from the couch of
his sleeping guest, Don Henrique (for back to this
period
does the story now return), the senses of the
wounded cavalier, it has been seen, were lulled to
sleep by the soft and distant music of the mandoline
and co-mingling voice of Azlie. When he awoke,
the golden sunlight of a tropical afternoon shone aslant
into the court, and the atmosphere was of a still, dreamy
character, that seemed to invite to indolent repose all
living things. It was the voluptuous hour of the
siesta
,
when the dwellers in southern climes resign themselves
to the drowsy influence of the time, and households
and cities are buried in the deep repose of midnight,
until the evening breezes, that stir the lethargic air,
awaken them with renewed life and energies. But
Don Henrique required no sleep. Twelve hours of
undisturbed rest had invigorated him. He felt free
from pain, and all trace of suffering and illness had
disappeared
.
His spirits were fresh and elastic as his
body; and, save from the remembrance that he had
recently lost blood, he would not have known that the
usual condition of his bodily health had been
interrupted
.
How perfectly well I am! he said, on opening his
eyes. If it were not that I am here, added he,
looking
around him, I should believe I had been
dreaming
of conflicts and wounds, of illness, and of a lovely
maiden watching my pillow. How my heart bounds
at the recollection of her scarcely earthly beauty! I
am now well, thanks to her tender care, and that of
her brave and gallant brother, and have no farther
excuse
for intruding on their hospitality. I must depart,
yet would, methinks, lie wounded here for ever, for
her gentle company; I will see her ere I go, and thank
her for her charity, drinking in the while Love's
poison
from the well of her dark eyes. Ha! I have slept
well! There sounds five o'clock, with a thick, muffled
tone, as if it would not wake the slumbering town.
How still is all, save the falling of the water in the
fountain, and the hum of flies that seek the shade to
sport in! It is quiet as midnight! Even the birds,
that last night made the orange groves without
eloquent
with song, are now hushed! I will take this
time to loiter about the court and pleasant cloisters of
the mansion; for these Orleannois have a delightful idea
of domestic luxury, and a most perfect taste in the
unison
of the useful and ornamental: surely this very
room hath no equal in Spain! Yonder carved and
gilded corridors, with their Venetian blinds and
latticed
sides, invite to walk; while the music of falling
water, and, by moonlight, the singing of birds, and the
pleasant groves of orange-trees, are present to delight
the ear and eye. I will go and loiter there until my
lovely hostess or her brother awake; for methinks I
myself am the only one not sleeping in the town!
He arose when he had thus soliloquized, and, as he
did so, a slave, whom he had not hitherto seen,
advanced
from a recess with a bowl and ewer of iced-water
in his hand, and, silently kneeling before him, held them
for his service; another followed, bearing a snowy
napkin, and holding a silver tray, covered with vessels
and instruments for the toilet of the most elegant and
costly description. His surprise at their sudden
appearance
did not prevent him from making the
intended
use of their services; and having performed his
ablutions
and made his toilet, he resumed his weapons.
Then, placing his Spanish bonnet beneath his arm, he
was about to demand of them whether their master
had returned, when, to his surprise, he found he was
alone.
These slaves appear and disappear like magic,
he said, vexed at their departure before he could learn
anything of either of his youthful hosts; but, by'r
lady! they are bearers of sweet odours, and are skilful
at a cavalier's toilet. Jove ne'er had his beard
perfumed
with such rich scent as the rogues have laid
upon my mustache withal! If they had ended their
handiwork by leaving me a cup of coffee or a
Here am I served with a wish on my lip! he cried,
as two more slaves, bearing salvers with coffee and
delicate refreshments, at this instant appeared. This
is hospitality indeed, where one no sooner wishes than
his desire is gratified! These ebony gentlemen shall
not escape, like their fellows, unquestioned, he added,
as he seated himself to the sumptuous repast they
spread before him.
Now, garons, he asked, when he had completed
his grateful meal, to which his long fast enabled him
to do justice, turning to the slaves behind him, prithee
tell me by whose orders I am thus princely
entertained
?
The slaves crossed their hands upon their breasts,
shook their heads, and then touched their lips with a
fore finger.
Are the rogues dumb, or know they not my speech?
he asked of himself. Where is your master? Say
his guest would speak with him!
They again made a gesture rather of ignorance of
his words than of mysterious silence, as he was
disposed
to attribute it to at first, and then, making an
obeisance, silently removed the salvers from before
him and disappeared from the room.
I clearly see I cannot increase greatly in
knowledge
from these speechless slaves of my hospitable
entertainer
,
and must fain be patient till he choose to
make his appearance in person. I feel in better health
and spirits than I have done since I left Spain. There
is magic in a maiden's nursing, or strange health is in
this southern air! I will forth into the court, where I
see the wind is slightly moving yonder acacia top,
and inspire it. Perchance fortune may favour me also
with a sight of the fair girl, whose image Sleep, with
noiseless burin, has engraven indelibly on my heart.
I certainly am fascinated with her beauty, and most
truly has she impressed me with feelings to which my
heart has been hitherto a stranger. This may be, and
may not be love. Time will determine. Then her
condition! Ha! I had wellnigh forgotten it. A slave
at least the
child
of a slave! the offspring of guilt
and, andit will outwith Ethiopian blood in her
veins! This, then, is she who has touched thy heart,
Henrique! Can such a one be loved by thee? No,
not if she were guilty of her mother's bondage and of
her slavish descentNo! But is she guilty of these?
Is she not as fair and glorious in virgin beauty as if
descendant from a long line of European kings? Do
I love her, then, or hate her for the acts of the
generation
before her, or for the blood of her ancestors, so
long as she bears none of either in her own person,
but appears a creation of all beauty, grace, and purity?
Besides, if I do love her, as I begin to suspect I do, I
love her for
herself!
Had she risen, all lovely as she
is, from a fountain, or bounded from an opening
rosebud
upon the ground (mortal save in birth), would she
not have been worthy to be loved and even adored?
What is it to me if she is now in all else this very
thing, whether she be derived from kings or slaves, or
sprung from a rose or a fountain, without father or
mother? But this is weak sophistry for the test of the
world, and, I must confess, my heart hath more to do in
framing it than my head. Nay, I must see her again,
and either break or more firmly bind the chain her
singular beauty has flung around me.
Don Henrique then idly lounged from the apartment
which had been the scene of events so interesting to
his heart, sensibly touched by the beauty and condition
of the lovely quadroone, and entered upon a spacious
corridor, that was continued along the four sides of the
quadrangle, and protected from the sun by lattice-work
constructed between the snow-white columns that
supported
it.
This lattice was thickly covered with flowing vines,
which, tastefully entwining around the columns to their
capitals, fell gracefully down to the ground again, or,
artfully fashioned into festoons, swung from pillar to
pillar. At intervals were open arches communicating
with the court, which was ornamented on every side
with dark-polished leaved shrubs, growing in gigantic
urns, and bearing magnificent flowers on stately stalks;
while lesser plants, in porcelain or marble vases,
formed
everywhere tasteful walks and figures, and orange,
althea, lemon, acacia, and other trees, planted in
groups, cast a cool and almost impervious shade
beneath
.
In the midst stood a fountain of white marble,
the spray shooting upward from a lion's mouth, and
descending upon a statue of Niobe. The soft, hazy
sunlight fell upon the scene, and gave to the whole a
rich Oriental character, that was in harmony with the
youthful cavalier's feelings. He approached the
fountain
,
and startled from their sunny slumbers in its basin
troops of gold fishes, while, at his footstep, beautiful
birds, with a quick, musical chirp, flitted from the
branches of a laurel near the fountain, and sought a
retreat in an orange-tree on the farther side of the
court.
This is indeed a paradise, as I conceived when I
first waked from insensibility after being brought
hither
,
he said, seating himself upon an Indian settee
placed beneath the laurel-tree; how little do we
Europeans
know of the voluptuous life of southern climes.
I shall have rare modes of luxury to bear back to
Castile
!
and, if I could carry with me this houri of my
paradise!and, pray, what shall hinder me?if I can
persuade her to fall in love with a wandering cavalier,
as I have certainly done with her. Ay de mi! I will
neither say nor gainsay, but let love take its course.
If Heaven has paired us above, we shall surely be
wedded below. So I will e'en leave it to Heaven,
devoutly
trusting it will side with my heart's hopes.
Thus mused Don Henrique as he sat by the fountain,
and his thoughts continued to flow in this current,
aided by his recollection of all that Renault had related
to him, until, imperceptibly, evening stole over the
spot, and he was aroused from his meditations by the
first notes of the nightingale singing to an early star.
He rose with the intention of returning to the
apartment
he had left, but, seeing that the openings to the
corridor between the pillars were alike on every side,
he was at a loss to distinguish that by which he had
issued
;
after a moment's reflection, he walked towards
the verdant arch by which he believed he must have
entered, and was about to pass through into the
corridor
,
when he discovered that the door that should have
answered to his own was partly screened by a circular
curtain, and much smaller than the stately folding
leaves that led to his apartment.
Vol. II.D
He was about to retreat, when a voice within
thrilled
to his soul. It was that of Azlie. It was the first
note of a song, which, in a low, plaintive, and most
touching voice, she sang throughout, while he listened
entranced. It told the story of her fate, and his heart
wept for her. It told that she loved him, and it
bounded
with strange joy. It told of despair, and he could
scarcely restrain the impulse to spring forward, cast
himself at her feet, and bid her hope and live. Her
voice accompanied no instrument, but flowed a simple
strain of liquid, vocal melody, natural and warbling,
but of that power which fills the soul with those
exquisite
sensations that have caused mankind to place
oral music in the highest order of intellectual and
human
efforts. These are the words he listened to:
Love bringeth each other young maiden
A world of joyance and bliss;
But, alas! to me cometh laden
With nothing but wo's bitterness.
Wo's me!
He goeth with smiles in his eyes
To all other hearts, far and near;
But to mine cometh laden with sighs,
To mine ever comes with a tear.
Wo's me!
Oh! why will he come to my heart,
And fill me with grief and despair!
Cruel Love! I prithee depart,
And to grieve my bosom forbear!
Wo's me!
Thou hast shown it the image of one,
Whom for me 'tis guilt to keep there!
Oh! what hast thou cruelly done,
In so wickedly guiding him here?
Wo's me!
His eyes thou hast filled with a charm,
His voice to my heart made a snare;
Oh! why hast thou wished to me harm?
LoveLove thou! I bid thee beware!
Wo's me!
Thou'st kill'd me, false Love, with thy dart;
My heart with sorrow is torn;
Thou hast acted the cruellest part,
In making me love but to mourn.
Wo's me!
I mourn for the calm of the tomb
My spirit will soon be set free
To soar where affection doth bloom,
Where true love requited shall be.
Joy's me!
The voice trembled, and seemed most full of sadness
as she sang the last stanza.
Drawn insensibly nearer the door, lest one sweet
note or accent should escape his entranced ear, Don
Henrique found himself, when the song ended, standing
within a step of the crimson curtain, which, half
withdrawn
from across the entrance, exposed a part of the
interior. It was a lady's boudoir he saw at once by
the hundred little delicacies that met his eye.
Silence had followed the music of the plaintive voice.
His heart was touched by its echo still. He felt the
influence, too, of the hour and time. It was twilight;
the soft, rosy light shed a delicate lustre over
everything
around him, and touched his feelings with the
subdued harmony that prevailed. It was the hour of
tender thought and gentle feelings: for sadnessfor
tears. Who has not experienced the power of
eventide
?
Who has not loved to sit by the deep-shadowed
casement, through which is faintly reflected the
western
red of the just departed sun, and give wing to
thought? How gentle are the images that come then,
whether of memory or of fancy, to the soul! How
sad, how tenderoften how full of quiet and pleasing
melancholy! How the heart loves to lose itself in the
misty, dreamy world of its own creations! How
often
does religion, like gentle dew from heaven, then fall
upon it, and how naturally do tears then come into the
eyes! Most sacred hour! Sabbath-time of the day!
How the heart loves its still communion with itself
then, save in the bosoms of the dark and guilty. To
such twilight is, indeed, a fearful time. They fly it,
because they tremble to yield to a power which
compels
them to hold converse with themselves. With
such, the sun is no sooner set, than the sacredness of
the hour is desecrated by the intrusion of artificial
light. Oh! who that is innocent in heart, or does not
shrink from the knowledge of himself, and knows the
blessed influence of the twilight-time upon his own
feelings, would consent to part with its sweet pleasure,
and deprive himself, in this world, of an enjoyment so
intellectual and spiritual, that it may be termed a
foretaste
of that which is to come!
Don Henrique's feelings were in tone with the hour,
and the touching melody of Azlie's voice filled his
soul with the tenderest sensibility. He desired to
mingle his feelings with hers! To sooth her grief;
and, it must be said, to be once more, if but for a
moment
,
within the influence of her beauty.
Involuntarily
he laid his hand upon the curtainhesitated
became irresolute; and then, as if imboldened by his
love and the favouring hour, he gently lifted aside the
drapery.
Within was Azlie, kneeling before a small
household
shrine, her face buried in her dark tresses, which
were dishevelled, and fell with the negligence of grief
about her scarcely veiled neck. She was apparently
in silent prayer. Her whole form was instinct with
life, and heaved with strong emotion. At intervals, a
faint moan reached his ear. On the altar burned a
silver lamp, diffusing an odour of incense throughout
the boudoir. The richness and luxury of the
apartment
scarcely arrested his glance; his gaze rested on
a single object, and, save the lovely worshipper, he
saw nothing. He even stilled the beating of his heart,
and, softly approaching her, removed his bonnet, and
kneeled by her side. Oh, love! what limit has thy
power over the heart! For a few moments he knelt
by her, and then, in the softest whisper of tenderest
solicitude and sympathy, breathed her name.
Dearest brother! she said, in a tone of grief,
without lifting her head, you have come to see me
die!
Nay, sweet Azlie, if love hath broken thy heart,
love shall mend it again for thee. Dry up those
starry
fountains of tears, and love shall henceforward visit
thee `with smiles,'  said Don Henrique, speaking in a
tone so frank and generous, so soothing and tender,
that her startled surprise at finding, instead of her
brother, the young Spanish cavalier kneeling by her
side, was in a measure lost in the words he spoke.
She at first lifted her head and looked upon him
with wild alarm; but, as he proceeded, convinced by
his words that he had heard her song, and knew the
state of her heart, this emotion changed to one of
maidenly shame. Her brow and bosom glowed with
crimson; she attempted to say something, but her
voice failed her; the blood rushed back to her heart;
a deadly paleness overspread her face, and she sunk
forward with her forehead upon the altar step. He
thought she had become insensible, and cried with
alarm, catching her in his arms to arrest her fall,
I have killed her by my imprudence!
Then, snatching up a flask of
eau de vie
, he was
about to bathe her forehead and hands freely, when,
finding herself in the arms of the young cavalier, the
fugitive blood hastened again to restore the brightness
to her cheek and lip, and, rising with a dignity most
becoming, she said,
I thank thee, signor, for thy proffered aid. Pray
leave me! I have permitted a secret that I meant
should have died with me to escape me, and can only
atone for it by the deep maidenly shame that now
burns my brow. Leave me, I pray thee, signor; and
if thou art as good and generous as I believe thee to
be, forget that thou hast ever seen me!
Dearest lady, he cried, in a tone most
impassioned
.
Nay, mock me not, signor!
I am a quadroone!
Heaven is my witness, lovely maid, I meant thee
no mockery. I know thy history, thy condition, and
its penalty.
Then why art thou here? Fly and leave me for
ever! It may not be that thou shouldst remain here!
Dearest. Azlie! he said, with deep feeling, I
have been the involuntary listener to your confessed
D 2
love! Nay, turn not so deadly pale! Here, on my
knees, I swear to thee 'tis requited.
I may not listen to thee without guilt; thy love is
shame and infamy! I pray thee leave me.
Thy heart swells in thine eyes while thou biddest
me go, dearest Azlie! Wherefore be so cruel? I
love thee.
It is because thou lovest mebecause thou art
loved by me, she said, with fervour, that I bid thee
go!
Dearest and loveliest of women! he cried, taking
her hand, let there be no dissimulation between thee
and me. Accident has betrayed our mutual loves.
Let us not mutually fill the cup of each other's misery.
Heaven hath made us for one another, and I beg thee
seek not, to thine own evident pain, to avert its
decrees
!
Nay, signor, Heaven never hath decreed guilt, nor
will it let the strongest love of mortals hide crime
committed under it. Go, I entreat thee! Each
moment
thou lingerest here is fatal to my peace.
Crime! What mean thy words! Is it guilt to
love?
A quadroone
, she answered, with a supernatural
effort at maintaining sufficient firmness.
That word has given the key to all thy language
and bearing, he said, with a countenance expressive
of delight. Thou hast done me wrong, sweet Azlie.
On such love as I offer, Heaven will smile. Here,
kneeling at thy feet, I ask thee if thou wilt become
my bride?
Thy
bride!
she repeated, with a voice half
trembling between hope and doubt.
My honourable wife! he said, solemnly, taking
her hand and fervently pressing it to his lips.
Wifebride! his honourable wife! said he? she
repeated, unconsciously, aloud, as if lost and stunned
by the strange words that fell on her ear.
Even so, sweet Azlie! Nay, look not so wildly!
Keep thy reason to her seat! Wilt thou become my
wife? and he kissed her brow.
A wife, and the wife of him my soul loveth! said
she, with deep joy.
Yes, be my own sweet wife.
'Tis more joy than my heart can hold, she cried,
with the most exquisite happiness in her voice and
face.
Then pour out its fulness into my bosom, he said,
clasping her yielding form in his arms, and imprinting
upon her lips the seal of his pure and honourable love.
Who may truly describe the happiness of two
hearts thus united by the tenderest union of kindred
souls! How perfect had been love's work in those
hours of watching, when, bending over his pillow, she
drank in the delicious poison of her love! Her
touching sorrows and gentle beauty, as she kneeled
by the altar, had sealed for ever the passion that had
entered his bosom when he awoke and beheld her
sleeping beside him! Love had done much, very
much, in a few short hours; but his work can be done
in a day-or in an hour's time, and by a single glance
as well as in years of uninterrupted fellowship.
Azlie
suffered his arms to enfold her for a momenta
moment so happy that it compensated for all her life's
sorrows; and then lifted to his her tearful face, through
the April clouds of which struggled the sunshine of
her happy heart. He gazed on her with tender
rapture
,
and again pressed her to his breast.
My own sweet Azlie, he exclaimed, looking
down into her soft, grateful eyes; if I have made
thee happy, thou hast made me happier still. Many
maidens of many lands have I bowed down before in
wondering adoration of their beauty, but never
before
has woman received the homage of my heart!
It has remained for thy retiring and modest beauty
for thine eyes' witchery and thy voice's fascination
for the charms of thy mind as well as those of thy
person, to command the worship of my spirit. Thou
knowest me not; yet thy love, as it ever does in
woman
,
has ennobled its object. But fear not; thou hast
placed thy affections on one who is not unworthy
thyself
,
or the purity and fervour of thy affections. Thy
eyes, I now see, would ask me who I am. Thou
knowest me to be a Spanish cavalier and gentleman.
Call me Don Henriquenay,
Henrique
were sweeter
from thy lipsand thou shalt, ere long, know what, but
for reasons connected with thy safety, and that I may
in secret observe for a time the doubtful conduct of
another, I would now reveal. I pray thee, for the
present
,
sweetest, let me be to thee Henrique.
Love hath no name nor rank! Be minelove
me still, as thy eyes tell me thou dostand I seek to
know nothing beyond
that thou lovest me!
she said, in
a tone so musical and soft that he rapturously kissed
the lips that distilled such melody.
She withdrew blushingly from his embrace, and a
melancholy expression passed over her features.
What is this, dearest? If my love hath offended
thy virgin propriety, I pray thee pardon me, for love's
offences should have for excuse its love.
Thou hast not offended me, signor, she
answered
;
but, without lifting her large black eyes from the
ground, as if sadness sat heavily on the fringed
eyelids
,
thou hast scarce offended; but I have thought,
she added, with artlessness, that thou wilt not forget
my conditionand despise where now thou lovest.
Dost thou believe I love thee, then? he asked,
with fervour.
My heart tells me so. Nay, methinks I could not
love thee as I do, didst thou not love me, she
answered
,
lifting to him her eyes, that were bright with
affection
,
and then dropping them again upon the floor.
Then, if thou believest this, he answered, with
passionate earnestness, why fear that my love shall
cease? Thou doest me wrong, dearest, said he, with
a countenance so full of sorrow that it was apparent
his heart and happiness were bound up in her.
Nay, then, I will not doubt; yet, if thou wert as
constant and strong in thy love as I, thou couldst
never
but love; for methinks, dearest Henrique, she
said, placing a hand in his, and looking up into his
eyes full of trust and confidence, if I were a
princess
,
loving thee as I do, I should not cease to love
thee shouldst thou prove to be aslave! nay, a bandit
of the forests or a pirate of the seasthy hand
steeped
in bloodthy brow crossed with guilt!
Couldst thou love such a one?
If he had won my virgin heartnot knowing him
to be other than he seemedwhere my heart was
given
,
there would my love be!
Thou art a noble and true-hearted woman! Thou
hast scarce loved a sea-pirate or a chief of Ladrones,
my sweet Azlie, he said, smiling; methinks love
which is so true as thine should have better reward.
I need none, save to know each day thou lovest me
more than thou didst the last.
Dost thou also wish to have me proved an honest
man?
The wish could not be in my breast were it not
the offspring of suspicion.
And dost thou not suspect me?
No. Wert thou false and guilty, thou couldst
never be so dear to me!
This is confiding, trusting, dear woman's
reasoning
;
it is this with which she stills those unworthy
doubts that may not exist where love is. To her
the bright moon is all light and purity, forgetting that
the portion turned from her eye is dark and all
unillumined
,
he said, rather addressing himself than her.
Now, as thou hast trusted me, dearest, and believest
I will honour thy deep affection with my hand as I
have done with my heartas all doubts, and fears,
and apprehensions are to be buried under hope and
love, truth and troth, let us banish every thought that
can ruffle the placid bosom of our affections.
Thou hast made me happy, my Henrique, by
lifting
me to thy heart, and elevating me above that
humiliating
consciousness of degradation by birth and
condition which ever, like a chain about my soul,
bowed my spirits to the earth. 'Tis a strange delight
for me to hold equal communion with one whom by
education I have been taught to regard as
Nay, he said, seeing her blush and hesitate, I
do not verily believe thou art of this race! Renault
suggested it by a word he let fall! The beauty of that
eye; the delicate damask on that cheek, which the sun,
in ripening, hath just browned, like a rare peach he
would dye with his favourite shade; those coral lips,
and that mouth full of liquid pearls, like the ivory keys
of some rich instrument, giving out music whenever
you speak; those eyes, like the starry, midnight sky;
those lily hands
Nay, nay, Signor Henrique! I prithee stop, she
cried, laughing, and laying the hand he would have
taken
to illustrate his words upon his lips. He
imprinted
a kiss upon the fair member as it came in contact
with them, in retaliation, and then continued,
Truly, my lovely one, I do believe thou art of
other blood than that thou thinkest.
But my brotherhe is even fairer than I, she
said, her eyes at first sparkling with the hopes his
words inspired, and then dropping with doubt,
showing
that she felt she could not entertain a hope so
unexpectedly
and strangely started.
Fairer than thyself for a man where his bonnet
hath protected his temples from the sun. Yet his father
is known, and he hath told me his quadroone-mother
is scarce darker than he has seen Spanish ladies.
She is my mother also. My father may have
been a fair man, even as this Marquis of Caronde.
Do not, I pray thee, excite hopes, signor, that have no
other foundation, alas! than in thy wishes, she said,
sighing.
Nay, I could love thee no more wert thou to prove
a Princess of France.
I fear thou hast repented thy love for a
quadroone
,
and wouldst fain defend it by seeking to make
me what I am not, one of thy own race, she said,
with gentle reproof.
Thou dost me injustice, dearest Azlie! I love
thee with all my nature; and it is my great love that
would do this for thee. Wert thou an angel, as
almost
thou seemest to me to be, my love would have
thee a seraph, and, being a seraph, I would see thee,
for the love I bear thee, still more than a seraph.
Love, and not my foolish pride, would prove thee to
be more than thou believest thyself to be. Dost thou
believe I speak truly, my little trembler?
Forgive me that I doubted thy love for an instant.
If I perchance offend again, let it not be forgotten by
thee that this sudden happiness of thy love hath
weakened
my poor heart. Hast thou not seen a
weary-winged
bird, who, after a hundred leagues of restless
flight above the wide sea, cometh suddenly o'er the
must of a stately ship, and, for joy at the unlooked-for
resting-place, hovereth long between hope and fear ere
he settle upon it; when, finding it secure, he folds his
long-spread wings, and fearless sleeps upon the
rocking
perch. I am this weary bird, and thou my stately
bark! Bear with me a while; I will, ere long, rest in
thy heart, whence nor fear, nor the rocking of the
waves of doubt or of mistrust shall move me!
While thou speakest, I think thee each moment
lovelier and more worthy of my love! he said,
folding
her to his heart. Now, I prithee, sweet, tell me
wherefore I found thee weeping when I came, like a
rude wooer as I am, into thy boudoir.
Thou hast all my heart, Henrique, if I may call
thee thus, signor, as my heart prompts me to do, and
thou shouldst know its griefsnow griefs no more!
My mother hathnay, I know not how to speak of
aught connected with my condition with maidenly
propriety
Thou wouldst speak of the young Marquis
Caronde
,
doubtless. I then know thy story from
Renault
.
Not of
him!
Yet, as thou knowest the nature of
his persecution, I may tell thee, without the necessity
of embarrassing detail, that my mother hath taken
offence
at him, and is now determined to avenge herself
for her disappointment by surrendering me to the new
Spanish governor, she said, trembling, as she thought
of the count's looks that morning at mass, of his
power
,
and her late helplessness.
To Osma! he repeated, with astonishment and
indignation. Hast thou seen him? Hath he belield
thee? he asked, with the most intense eagerness.
This morning in the Cathedral, she answered.
She then briefly informed him of what he was before
ignorant, that the captain-general had gone to mass at
the head of his troops, and that her mother, on
hearing
the order for the citizens also to attend, had
commanded
her to go with her, without explaining to her
the reason for her wishing it; that, on arriving there,
she sought a conspicuous place to kneel with her, near
the spot reserved for the governor, whose attention
was soon drawn to her, by her mother's obvious desire
to attract it.
By thy incomparable beauty rather, he said,
gazing
on her with a lover's admiration as she told her
embarrassed story.
Seeing I became the object of his regards, I
trembled
with foreboding of coming evil, continued
Azlie
.
My mother's voice and manner terrified me.
My veil concealed my tears, and I returned home to
weep and pray. Renault was absent, and my mother
remained with me, threatening, entreating, and
commanding
me to submit to the fate she had destined for
me.
Poor child! thou hast been persecuted indeed.
Didst thou not, gentle girl, then think of the guest
beneath
thy roof? he asked, with a smile.
I did, and was tempted to fly to thee and seek
protection, for my mother had threatened I should
soon see my Spanish lord beneath her roof.
And wherefore didst thou not, dearest?
Becausebecause she blushed and was silent.
Because thy love held thee back, was't not? he
asked, tenderly.
How dost thou so well read my heart ere thou
hast learned its language?
Because it is translated in thine eyes. Now I will
tell thee, Azlie, I had more than suspected mischief
would come to thee from Count Osma, but rather by
his own discovery of the fair treasure his new
province
held, than through the unnatural agency of thy
mother; therefore did I determine to remain unknown
here, till I could ensure thee, for thy brother's sake
(for I knew not then I should love thee as I do),
protection
.
It becomes me more than ever now to
preserve
this secrecy, and even from thee to withhold my
name till I can claim thee as my bride. Where is thy
noble brother?
He hath not returned since he left after midnight.
I would see him, that I may give him a brother's
hand, and, together with him, plot against this scheme
of thy mother's. Hath she had communication with
Osma since mass?
No; yet I left her writing half an hour ago, an
unusual
occupation with her, and suspect (for fear is ever
active) that I am the cause.
And Osma the object of the correspondence, I
doubt not. Hath she sent a messenger away? Ha!
there is a footstep without the window, and yonder
glides a dark figure into the avenue.
It must be
she
the sorceress, exclaimed Azlie,
with surprise.
And the servant of thy wicked mother? he
demanded
.
Nay, harm her not, she cried, holding him from
the pursuit to arrest her; she is no friend of my
mother, but a foe! She must be here for good to me,
and not evil. I have thought several times that I
heard a noise of some one moving without.
She has been a listener to our conversationnay, a
witness of our pledged loves.
Fear no evil from her, whoever she may be; she
has taken strange interest in me, said Azlie. In a few
words she then related to him all that she knew of her.
Vol. II.E
It is very strange; this relation confirms me more
than ever in my opinion that thou art not of the race
thou
Cease, Henrique, she said, playfully; I shall
again accuse you of thinking me unworthy of your
love, which, indeed, is too true!
Thou art worthy of all loveto share a throne
with me, he said, with affectionate enthusiasm.
She looked up gratefully into his face, and was about
to reply from the fulness of her heart, when an object
suddenly darkened the window. Both turned quickly,
and beheld, looking in upon them, a broad, laughing,
impudent visage, that seemed infinitely to enjoy their
surprise. The Spaniard laid a hand upon his weapon,
but the risible expression of the intruder's face
instantly
excited emotions in him opposite to those of
personal alarm, and, recognising in him Gobin the
First of the council-chamber, he said, gayly,
Welcome,
bon cousin
. Have thee grace!
Gobin, what do you here? asked Azlie, smiling,
yet vexed at the intrusion.
Gramercy to thee, cousin Spain! answered
Gobin
,
leaping into the room, and paying no heed to the
question. An' I saw not thee killed last night, wi'
seven inches o' steel 'neath thy ribs, may I ne'er drink
a goblet wi' cousin Osma to-night.
Thou wilt then go dry; for truly I am alive, as
thou seest, cousin Gobin.
Tell me thy secret o' coming to life again wi' a
hole through the body, and I'll teach thee a trick I
know at marbles, cousin Spain! Name thy
chirurgeon
!
Out wi't, gossip!
Thou seest here both the chirurgeon and the
charm, he said, looking at Azlie.
Then will I have her burned for a witch, an' she
do not presently use her witchery to heal my
finger-joint
.
Dost see? I got it shot off i' the wars! An'
I were not sent for by mother Ninine, I'd recount thee
the exploit. But I ha' a friend at home, a rogue that
hath his valour in his tongue, will tell thee it some
day. He hath a rare wit at a lie, and I have learned
a round way at it from him.
Didst thou say my mother had sent for thee?
asked Azlie, interrupting him as he rambled from one
subject to another, after his light and wandering
manner.
Marry, did I, sweet hyacinth! Am I not a
messenger
to and from? Goeth a billet save through
Gobin's fingers! Cometh a love-gage that Gobin hath
not the handling o't? Hath a maiden got the love
fever, doth she not send for Doctor Gobin? Doth a
youth pine for love, an' I have not the secret o't?
Marry
,
Gobin hath been sent for, and what's the world's
matter if he have? Here's matter, indeed, that two
lovers within the town's walls are come together, and
Gobin never the wiser.
Thou shalt have little reason to complain that thou
art never the richer, said Don Henrique, placing a
purse of gold in his hand, at the same time covertly
admiring the confusion of Azlie at Gobin's free words.
This hath weight, and needeth no tongue to speak
for it, said Gobin, weighing the gold in his palm.
Thou art a cavalier of metal; and, before I saw the
colour o' the coin thou didst carry, I made up my mind
that sweet hyacinth should have my consent to love
thee. Methinks, cousin, next to a woman's bright eye
cometh a broad gold piece.
Thou showest thy discretion and taste,
mon cousin!
And in that thou hast discovered these virtues in
me, thou hast more wit than ordinary. All men have
not wit. The run o' mankind are demi-witted; I will
show you three fools out of every five men you take
me in a crowd. Wherefore do such men call Gobin
a fool, marry? Verily, because, unlike them, he hath
a golden vein o' wit streaking his folly, while what
they have, like a little treacle in gingerbread, is so
thinned by spreading, that I will find you a green
lemon that hath more sweetness in't.
Let thy wit, then, manifest itself in thy discretion,
good fool! said Don Henrique; thou didst most
truly behold me fall wounded. I am restored by good
nursing to the sound state you see me in; this gentle
maiden hath enemies, and I am now here to protect
her. If, as I think, from thy words and manner
towards
her, thou hast a regard for her, I pray thee
keep secret my presence here. I trust to thy honour
and friendship for Azlie to do this, rather than to the
trifling gift of gold thou hast received from me; for I
am assured
mon cousin
Gobin will scorn bribery.
Verily, cousin Spain, thou art a
bueno caballero;
and if I betray thee or my sweet hyacinth, may I not
touch goblet o' wine the night with gossip Osma.
Wilt thou see the Spanish governor this night?
Dost thou not fear for thy head, as ex-governor Gobin?
Head never sat safer on a pair of shoulders! Hast
thou not heard he giveth a banquet to the bloods o'
wits o' the town! If Gobin stay away, folly would
reign.
To his surprise, Don Henrique then learned from him
that a proclamation for a public
leve
had been sent
out, and that all the town were at that moment
flocking
thither.
Go to her who sent thee; when thou hast thine
errand, come this way secretly ere thou deliverest it.
CHAPTER IV.
SCENE WITHIN THE PALACE.
Gobin
instantly departed through the window, and
gliding along beneath a hedge of altheas, came to a
winding walk terminating at a lattice on the other side
of the
casa
inhabited by the quadroone-mother. Here,
silent, stern, and plotting, she had been impatiently
waiting since the return of the servant despatched to
seek for Gobin, whose tact and address in any private
mission rendered him the fit instrument of an
intriguing
woman.
Where hast thou loitered, Gobin? The sun hath
been down half an hour, and yet thou didst promise
me to be here with his setting.
Wouldst have me slave to my words? asked
Gobin
,
as he approached her; because my tongue hath
said `trot,' must my feet trot, forsooth, unless they
have a mind. A man's tongue hath its own work to
do, and so have his feet, and other corporeal
appendages
.
Hist! I have a message for thee to take.
Give it me,
maman!
I will send it by the king's
trumpeter I have at home, who hath taken service with
me; for I have a banquet on hand myself.
Nay, thy voice is too loud! This I would have
thee do demands secrecy. Be trusty, and I will give
thee a gold clasp for thy silver chain. I would have
thee bear this
pacquet
to the palace, and place it
privately
in the hands of the Spanish governor.
Never errand chimed better with a man's will,
maman
!
I am on foot thither, to pay my respects to
cousin Spain, and hob and nob wi' him o'er a flagon
of Oporto. Since I ha' been i' the wars I ha' taken
to Portit has such a bloody complexion. Ne'er see
a man drink Port but thou mayst safely swear he hath
smelled gunpowder.
Out upon thy fool's prate, Gobin. Hie thee with
this to the Governor Osma, and be thou speedyand
secret as speedy. Go, as thou camest, by the garden
wall.
Thou hast the highest wall i' all the town to get
over,
maman;
thou shouldst ha' a gate cut i' it.
There is a gate, Gobin, she said, smilingly, but
'tis known to no one save myself.
It must be one o' the stone pannels, then; for I
ha' looked it all along for a place to put my toes in,
and thought, if thou wouldst swing one o' the slabs on
a pivot or a brace o' hinges, 'twould be a charity for
the urchins that love oranges and nectarines. An' I
E 2
had not learned to climb when I was a boy, I had lost
the eating o' much nice fruit I ha' had the enjoyment
of.
Thou art a rogue, and hast already paid thyself
thrice over for thy service, Gobin! But go now, and
be secret, and I will load thee with fruit.
Five nectarines, seven sweet oranges, and a
pineapple
,
with three pounds of grapes,
maman
, in the
morning, for me! I drink wine to-night, and fruit
hath a pleasant flavour after. I saw a hawk in thy
dovecote but now,
maman!
he added, with that
singular
want of
morale
and love of mischief so
characteristic
of that class in whom reason and folly are ever
at odds; each alternately holding the supremacy for
a moment, but with such uncertain tenure that they
can at no time be trusted, and are ever as variable and
uncertain as the winds.
He bounded from her with a laugh of cunning and
intelligence as he spoke these mischievous words,
which for an instant seemed to convey to her
something
more than his usual jesting way; for her lips
parted, and she bent forward as if to demand an
explanation
.
But his instant disappearance and the
engrossing
subject of her thoughts left no room in her
mind for so slight an external impression; so, giving
full scope to her ambitious fancy, she threw herself
back upon her
fauteuil
, and was soon lost in the
contemplation
of the results of the bold step she had
adventured
.
Knowing the human heart well, she had
little doubt of the most triumphant issue of her hopes;
and she now began to look complacently to the
consummation
of her revenge upon the young Marquis of
Caronde, to the punishment of Renault's pride, and
Azlie's most singular rebellion. She did not fail, also,
to contemplate the personal consideration she should
receive from her association with the governor; a
consideration
which had as deep a seat in her ambitious
soul as any of the other contributary motives. She
was, also, herself a beautiful woman still; and there
was not altogether absent from her mind a secret
consciousness
of the power of her own matured charms,
and the probable influence they might have over the
paramour she sought for her child; which influence
she found herself already studying how to use, when
acquired, to promote her own aspiring and covetous
views. Thus did this dangerous and wicked woman
plot the misery of a lovely girl, and in the secret
closet
of her heart hatch rife iniquity.
During Gobin's brief absence, Azlie gave Don
Henrique some insight into his singular character, and
assured him of his devotedness both to herself and
Renault
,
so far as a creature like him was capable of
having fixed attachments.
Hast thou a message, Gobin? he asked, when the
fool reappeared.
A message in a notebut not a love-billet, gossip,
for there be a gray beard o' the one side, and full two
score o' years on the other, answered Gobin,
showing
the outside of the pacquet that had been intrusted
to him.
It is to Osma, as I suspected, said Don
Henrique
,
with a flush of indignant feeling.
Heaven now preserve me from evil! ejaculated
Azlie, clasping her hands together and prayerfully
lifting
her eyes.
Nay, tremble not, sweetest! Thou hast no cause
for fear.
Not for myself alone, but for you also. If this
dreadful Spaniard should exert his power, he will make
you the first sacrifice.
Do not, I pray thee, give way to fear, Azlie.
Osma hath no power to harm me; and my love shall
shelter thee beneath its wing. Go, good fool! bear
the letter as thou art commanded to do, he said,
without
taking the note from Gobin's hand, though
questioning
if the circumstances did not authorize him to
read it. But his purpose was sufficiently answered in
noting the superscription, and in satisfying his mind as
to the nature of the quadroone-mother's
correspondence
.
Now, sweet Azlie, let not this trouble thee, he
continued, after Gobin disappeared in the darkness of
the orangerie, turning and affectionately embracing
her; neither thou nor I shall come to danger. It
only becomes me to guard the more carefully thy
safety. Prithee is it not time thy brother Renault
were returned?
He should have been here at noon.
Remain in your room, that I may feel while I
am absent that you are in safety, and await my return.
If he come, say nothing to him of this notenay, nor
even of our love, dearest! I will myself open it to
him. And bid him wait here, and leave thee not until
I come. I will go out and observe the conduct of the
governor, and learn the issue of this matter between
himself and thy mother. Now bless thee, and let
thy thoughts run only on happiness and me. If thou
art in danger, a thousand swords at my bidding will
leap from their scabbards to defend thee! So content
thee, sweetest! I will not be long away. Hast thou
no cloak and slouching bonnet of thy brother's, for I
would do secretly what I contemplate?
She soon furnished him with these, nor by word or
look betrayed any doubt, at such a moment, of his
truth and constancy. She measured his love by her
own.
Parting tenderly from her in whom his soul seemed
to be bound up, as hers truly was in him, he entered
the garden, and, traversing the shaded avenue in
which Gobin had disappeared, he came to a high wall,
which he scaled by fastening a cord Azlie had given
him to a catalpa that grew against it, and lightly
descended
into an obscure lane on the other side. Upon
gaining one of the principal streets, the current of the
citizens hastening to the
leve
indicated the direction
of the palace and the Place d'Armes.
Wrapped in his ample cloak, and with his sombrero
slouched above his eyes, he rapidly glided along by the
wall to shun the light of the moon, which was just
rising
and flooding the city with light. Arrived at the
square, he mingled with the banqueters and entered the
hall of audience. Avoiding the sight of Osma, who
sat receiving the homage rather than congratulations
of the citizens, lest he should be haughtily commanded
to come forward and do him honour, he remained in a
distant part of the hall, and silently witnessed the
stirring scene around him. The interview between
the count and the councillors did not escape him, and,
when he retired with them to the private
banquet-chamber
,
he suspected treachery would come of it.
For a moment he forgot the object that brought him
thither in his anxiety for the safety of those
gentlemen
;
and, having succeeded in gaining the door just
after they entered it, he was near the president when
he gave the message to the young
courreur du bois
.
He did not hear its purport, but the president's
manner
confirmed the suspicion which he had entertained,
more from his knowledge of the bitter vengeance of
Osma's character than from any open betrayal of his
intentions by his conduct. He was about to speak to
the president and warn him, but his instant return to
the banquet-chamber prevented him.
At least there is no present danger to be
apprehended
,
he said, mentally. He has now another
passion than love to gratify, and, till his vengeance
against the councillors be satisfied, he will scarce give
himself to intrigue. Methinks I did allow my sense of
honour to go too far in letting that missive pass to him
with the seal unbroken. I must how let watchful
sagacity
discover what honour then forbade. I know
Garcia of Osma well, and am assured he hath a
determination
to harm these councillors. Dare he poison
them in their cups? I will, at least, try to save them,
and must risk discovery in doing so. Ha! there is
Montejo!
At this instant his eye rested on a young Spanish
officer, in the uniform of an
aiddecamp
, lounging with
one or two other cavaliers through the room.
Montejo! he said, in a low whisper, and, adroitly
leaving a ring in his hand, he crossed over to the other
side of the room without being regarded by the others.
The young officer started, glanced at the signet, and,
with a look expressive of delighted surprise, left his
companions, and was soon in the shadow of a column
by his side.
Montejo! said Don Henrique, lifting his hat a
little way from his face and exposing his features,
start not; thou seest in me no ghost!
It is thyself, then? he exclaimed, embracing him.
I knew the signet, but ne'er dreamed thou wert the
bearer.
Gracios-a-dios!
Osma gave out that you
were lying ill sorely wounded, and even Garcilaso
mourned you dead! This is a miracle.
I was stunned rather than wounded, and am now
nearly quite as well as before the affray. How is
brave Garcilaso? A stouter soldier is not in all Spain.
Heaven keep breath in him, and soon give him back to
us, for I do owe my life to him.
He hath good attendance, and will soon be in the
saddle again? Where hast thou hid thyself?
Montejo! said Don Henrique, gravely, I must
give thee my confidence, and have, in return, thy faith.
I am thine in all things, my Henrique, he
answered
,
with enthusiasm.
I have reason to remain disguised and concealed,
that I may defend innocence and punish this guilty
Osma. Scarce one sun hath rolled over his head
since he came to the government, ere his restless spirit
began to seek out mischief. There is a fair being in
this town, sister to a citizen who bore me wounded to
his house, whom I love.
Love, Don Henrique!
Nay, will make my wife, so soon as the obstacles
my careful father hath put in my way shall be removed.
'Till then 'twere dangerous, as thou knowest, to both
of us to have our secret divulged.
Ye would both be soon united in Heaven by the
headsman, methinks.
I make thee my confidant, Montejo, and may need
thy services. Osma himself hath seen her at mass,
and thou knowest what will be the consequences if he
be not counter-met at every point.
May I ask who is this wonderful creature that
hath captivated a heart which the brightest beauties of
Madrid have sought vainly to win?
Thou shalt see her anon. Meanwhile, I would
ask thee if thou dost suspect nothing hidden beneath
this banquet, and especially the private entertainment
for the councillors?
Verily I did think, when I saw them enter there,
they would scarce come out without Osma's having got
something out of them.
Dost thou know him so welland is this the depth
of thy suspicion?
He hath no motive to imprison them now that the
town is his, save in punishment for their resistance,
and in vengeance for his former defeat.
There thou hast it! Those men will scarce
behold
another sun rise unless we save them. I read
their doom in Osma's eyes.
Thy lady-love's father is one of them, by my
beard!
Nay, it is for humanity's sake, and that Spain may
have no more blood to answer for than need be shed.
I count upon thy aid. Here now is Loyola, he added,
as a stout Spanish captain, with bold and pleasing
features
,
came near. Speak to him, and let him know I
am here.
I and my men are at your service, signor, said
the captain, coming up and addressing him after
Montejo
had spoken a few words with him. Heaven be
thanked those knaves did not wound thee to the death.
To all, save thyself and Montejo, I am still
confined
to my couch with my wound. I know your
affection
for me, and that you may be trusted.
Till death, answered both in the same voice.
I have reason to believe Osma meditates a crime
that will bring lasting shame to the Spanish arms. It
must be prevented. Go, select fifty of thy command,
and march them to the court between the palace and
the prison. As I came by, cautiously inspecting the
inlets to the palace, I noticed a small gate which leads
to a dark stairway, and which I am assured, from the
position of this inner banquet-room, has communication
with it. Go! thou wilt find me there to receive thee!
The captain departed, and Montejo and Don
Henrique
,
after some farther conference in reference to
the course ultimately to be taken if action should
become
necessary, separated, the former going to his
duties
as warden of the city guards. It was a few
moments
after Montejo left him that Don Henrique so
opportunely aided Estelle in the rude attack made upon
her life by Rascas.
When Don Henrique at length arrived at the
postern
,
he immediately paced before it, waiting for De
Loyola until the third of an hour had elapsed, when,
being anxious for the safety of the councillors, and to
confirm or remove his suspicions, he entered the
passage
and ascended the staircase which he had believed
to communicate with the banquet-room. He listened;
but the door was so solid, and being also curtained on
the inner side, he could detect at first only the
indistinct
sound of tongues, and occasionally the louder
accents
of Count Osma. Soon he heard the noise of
commotion, the tramp of many feet, and plainly
distinguished
the stern voice of Renault. He then
attempted
to force the door, but in vain. He, however,
learned enough to be aware that the councillors had
indeed been in danger, and that they had been rescued
by some other hand than his own; and this he knew must
have been that of Renault. He remembered, too, that
the messenger he had seen the president despatch from
the hall wore a uniform similar to the quadroon's.
Renault hath done this, he exclaimed, and
Osma
is his prisoner! My presence will be necessary
to prevent revolution or carnage arising out of it!
Making another effort to force the door, and finding
it unavailing, he descended the stairs with the
intention
of gaining the banquet-room by the front of the
palace. As he reached the last step, the door above
suddenly opened, and the councillors appeared.
Withdrawing
himself within a dark recess at the foot of the
passage, he there remained until he saw them pass
forth in safety. He then reascended to the half-open
door, and, perforating the intervening arras with the
point of his dagger, witnessed the whole subsequent
scene, prepared to appear in it if his presence should
prove necessary, and, by his influence over Renault,
prevent evil consequences from breaking out of this
angry state of things.
De Loyola had in the mean while arrived, and
secreted
his men within the dark shadow of an angle of
the prison wall, ready for action and instant service.
The subsequent events all passed under Don
Henrique's
observation; and, while he commended the
extraordinary
forbearance of Renault, he felt the
strongest
indignation against the thwarted noble.
Nature hath made Osma a cutthroat, but fortune
hath made him a governor, he said, as he looked
upon the scene. Had he done this thing, he should
have answered for it with his head, or justice hath
taken wing and fled from Spain! Ah, love hath had
a hand in it, he added, as he saw Estelle appear,
half disguised, and throw herself between her father
and Renault. I thank Heaven I did her such good
service in the hall. She was then, doubtless, seeking
these brave men, whom she hath guided by that secret
way. Providence hath these councillors, or Spain's
honour, or both, under its most marked protection.
Surprised, astonished, and indignant at all he had
been an unseen observer of, and having, from what
passed before him, got a key to all else connected
with the count's treachery, and the means by which it
had been so signally defeated, he was tempted, after he
saw him left alone with Sulem, to enter and confront
him, and on the spot challenge him to wash out with
his blood the stain he had put upon the knightly
honour
of a Spanish noble, as well as the reproach his
country had suffered through his discovered
treachery
.
But the conversation that followed between him
and the slave, in relation to Azlie, bound him to the
spot with a burning ear; and when he saw him depart
Vol. II.F
with the Moor to enter his cabinet, he prepared to
draw aside the hangings and follow, lest he should lose
sight of him, when the presence of Gobin caused him
again to draw back.
He was compelled to amuse himself with the fool's
solitary banquet and soliloquies for a few moments,
trusting he would soon take his departure, or fall
overcome
with wine beneath the table. His patience at
length became exhausted, and he was about to
discover
himself, when he heard the footsteps of the count
approaching the banquet-room. He was rewarded
for his delay by witnessing his interview with Gobin,
and the delivery of the quadroone-mother's note.
Anticipating
the count's movements from the words he
let fall, as well as from the expression of his
countenance
,
he hastily descended the staircase, and
withdrew
in the shadows at the foot of it as Osma himself
appeared at the head. The latter came down, passed
the spot without perceiving him, and pursued his way
towards the dwelling of the quadroone-mother.
An idea, bold as it was congenial to his feelings, was
instantly suggested to Don Henrique's mind.
Crossing
the court to where the men were posted, he called
the captain aside.
Now, my brave De Loyola, doubtless thou wilt be
grieved to know that there will be no fighting to-night.
The occasion for which I called thee out is passed.
But I have yet something for thy love to do for me.
Name it, signor, and it shall be done, if it were
to put Osma himself under arrest.
Nay, thou traitor! 'tis a love matter. I have
been made captive by a maiden here, and, in revenge,
would make her captive also. Thou knowest the
captain
of the brigantine I came in hath a friendship for
me.
He would put himself under thy orders to sail to
the moon! said the captain, divining his intentions.
I believe thee; I would have thee seek Montejo,
and send him on board, with all secrecy, and tell
Captain
Estecheria I will be on board within the hour;
and that, before midnight, he must be ready to weigh
anchor for Cuba, and thence to Spain.
Spain
Viva!
Would to Heaven thou wouldst
take all thy good friends with thee! said Loyola, in
the warmth of his feelings at the recollection of his
country.
Thou shalt come, and also Montejo, and all who
love me better than Osma. Come with me till I
show thee where I would have thee meet me with thy
men, lest I should fall into danger by the way. Then
go on thy errands, and in an hour await me by the
garden wall I will presently show thee.
De Loyola accompanied him within sight of the
garden, and then parted from him with a promise to
return before the expiration of the hour.
Be silent and speedy, my brave friend! he said,
turning from him and hastening forward after the Count
of Osma, whom he saw at the same moment turn into
the lane that bounded the wall, in company with one
who met him there. A troop of cavalry, at the same
instant, came thundering from the quarter of the
barracks
,
passing him at a round trot in the direction of
the city gates.
Scarcely heeding the circumstance at such a moment,
save that he was detained by its passage a few seconds,
he hastened forward into the lane, and saw Osma and
his companion, who had evidently been waiting for him,
disappear through a gate in the wall. Approaching
the spot, he looked in vain for the same entrance, but
in the whole surface of the wall none was apparent to
his eye. Wondering not a little at the means by which
he had effected an entrance, he flew to the cord by
which he had himself descended, and scaled the wall,
not seeing that he himself was dogged by a third
person
.
He then cautiously followed the path that he
believed
must lead to the apartments of the
quadroone-mother
,
which, as he suspected, he beheld Osma in the
act of entering. Satisfied with this hasty observation,
he hastened to the boudoir he had left two hours
before
to play the spy upon the crafty count. Without
alarming Azlie with the knowledge of the presence
of the Cond, whom he expected soon enough to
appear
in her apartment, he seated himself by her side,
and amused her with light conversation, while, like a
brave man, he prepared himself to receive the guilty
intruder.
CHAPTER V.
SCENE WITHIN THE GARDEN-WALLS.
The
individual with whom the Count of Osma
stopped
to communicate in the street near the garden was
a confidential slave of Ninine. He led him to one of
the slabs fixed like a pannel in the centre of each
section
of the wall, and, having touched it about an inch
from the lower corner, it swung inward, and admitted
them into the garden. The slave then led the way
rapidly towards the
casa
. With his hand upon his
sword-hilt, as if guarding against treachery, followed
the bold and wicked count, who, in the pursuit of the
object of his passion, was singularly blind or
indifferent
to the danger of trusting himself abroad in a
hostile
city at such an hour unattended. He was rapidly
conducted through the windings of the thickly-planted
garden, whose trees and plants loaded the atmosphere
with the most delicious odours, while the disturbed
songsters of the fragrant groves flitted from branch to
branch at his advance, emitting tremulous and broken
notes.
When the slave came near the window that opened
from the ground into the luxurious apartment of the
quadroone-mother, he stopped silently and pointed
towards
it. Then, crossing his hands upon his breast,
stood in a statue-like attitude. The count passed him,
and proceeded towards the Venetian casement, which,
partly open, showed within a gorgeous chamber, softly
lighted by shaded lamps of roseate hue, shedding
around a soft and subdued twilight of the richest and
most seductive character. Ottomans, lounges, and
fauteuils
of crimson velvet and silk, with carpets from
Turkish looms, met the surprised glance of the
Spaniard
,
who, not unused to luxury, had scarce beheld in
Spain more splendour than now flashed upon his eyes
through the half-open lattice. On a lounge near the
window, the evening breeze just lifting the raven curls
from her temples, reclined Ninine, the beautiful
quadroone-mother
.
Her alert ear caught the sound of
approaching
footsteps. With a triumphant flush of joy
she rose, and with an air of indolent grace, that
became
her voluptuous and languid beauty, threw open
the blind, and beheld her expected visitant.
A fair eve to thee, noble signor, she said, in the
easy, self-possessed tone of one who felt that her own
charms as well as the object of his coming placed
them upon an equality.
And a pleasant one to thee, he answered, with that
air of finished gallantry which marked him as one of
the most courteous cavaliers of his time; and he
kissed
her extended hand ere he seated himself on the
same lounge by her side. By my knighthood! thy
charms rival thy daughter's!
Hast thou come to woo mother or daughter?
she asked, with a gratified smile, that threatened to
beguile him from his first purpose.
Nay, tempt me not, sorceress, he said, smiling,
I would fain see this Haide! If I have to answer
for worshipping other than the Blessed Mary this
morning, thou shalt come in for punishment also. By
the rood! thou didst do a sacrilege in taking so much
beauty with thee to prayers.
It was that I might offer it on the altar of thy
love.
Thou hast full confidence in her charms, and, i'
faith! in my susceptibility. But thou didst send the
bolt truly to the mark. Her loveliness hath
captivated
F 2
me. From her costume and thine, as well as thy
dark style of beauty, I know thee to be of the lovely
race of quadroones, with whom marriage is not
lawful
.
Nor desirable, signor, so that our beauty
purchase
for us the hearts and fortunes of men! The
proudest wife can boast no more, answered the
quadroone
,
giving utterance to the bold sentiments of her
class.
But methinks a woman should marry for her
honour's
sake.
A woman's honour lieth in the constancy of her
love. And love hath ever proved most constant when
'tis free.
This is strange doctrine, said Osma, surprised at
sentiments so extraordinary from the lips of any
woman
,
to whom marriage is one of the greatest and best
gifts of Heaven, and at a mode of thinking so at
variance
with feminine views in other countries.
Is there no such thing, then, as honour with you?
Yes, signor. Never was a quadroone maiden
known to be false to her lord.
But what pledge has he of her truth?
Her honour.
But she hath it no longer.
Hath the wife no longer honour when she hath
become a wife?
But she is an honourable wife.
And education has taught the quadroone what the
laws have taught the wife, that the highest crime she
can be guilty of is to be false to him to whom love has
united her. Love and inbred honour are pledges of
constancy; and to these she is never false. A wife's
honour may be fortified by fear; a quadroone's is by
love.
If she do not love?
She must obey her mother, if no better choice may
by made.
She will then prove false.
She will die first, as some have done, signor.
Can they not be admitted into convents if they
wish?
A quadroone-nun! No, signor!
Neither the convent nor matrimony; they have,
then, no alternative but death or splendid misery.
By mine honour, thy words have touched me! I would
not bring unhappiness to thy daughter if she cannot
love me!
She is gentle, and her heart is free, signor. Time
and convenience will soon enable thee to win Azlie's
affections.
Azlie! said you Azlie? he demanded,
starting
with singular surprise.
Azlie! 'Tis an odd Moorish name, but
Speak it no more! he said, recovering himself.
Ha! what is this? he cried, as a pomegranate
struck the floor at his feet.
He looked out through the window, and beheld a
pair of glittering eyes fixed upon him from the
shrubbery
.
Drawing his sword, he rushed forth, when
Rascas came forward and met him.
Villain, is it thou? What of the councillors?
The troops I ordered out by thy command have
just passed by on their way to the gates at the top of
their speed.
And thouhow camest thou hither? Hast
dogged
me, traitor? he demanded, with fierce suspicion.
Nay, signor; as I rode through yonder street at
their head, I saw and recognised thy form and step,
as well as thy hound, when thou enteredst the garden.
I should have passed on, but saw that a person was
following, and evidently playing the spy upon you.
Drawing rein, I watched his motions, saw him scale
the wall, and descend into the garden after you. I
dismounted
,
and, getting over the wall by a cord he had
forgotten to draw up after him, tracked him to the
apartment of
Of whom?
Azlie, the beautiful quadroone! he answered,
with malicious triumph in his eyes as he delivered
this intelligence, well-guessing at the object of the
count.
Didst see his face?
Not distinctly; but I could swear he is none of
the citizens.
Perhaps it is this Renault, her brother?
Nay, I know the quadroon's height and air.
'Tis not he! I will show thee, if thou wilt follow me,
signor.
Lead on, said Osma, grasping his weapon with
determined vengeance.
Softly, signor, for cooing doves are easily
alarmed
.
Desiring Ninine, who had not heard this
conversation
,
to await his return a few moments, he rapidly
followed his subtle guide across the orangerie to the
path that conducted to the maiden's lattice.
Don Henrique was seated at the feet of Azlie,
with his sword across his knees, and his disguise still
on, recounting the part Renault had taken in the
events of the night, yet with his eye fixed watchfully
and expectingly on the door communicating from the
boudoir with the apartments of the mother. His back
was therefore partly turned to the Count of Osma,
who stealthily approached the window behind his
catlike
guide. Azlie sat with her eyes bent on her
lover's
,
with a prideful affection which the count could
not mistake. He saw that she loved, with her heart's
deepest passion, the man who kneeled at her feet.
The lamp shed a soft, clear light upon her brow, and
betrayed the loveliness of her features and the
graceful
proportions of her bust, which in the Cathedral her
envious veil had half concealed from his gaze. What
a fair, bright creature did he now look upon! how
infinitely
exceeding all that he had imagined! The
glorious dark eyes filled with witchery; the ripe lip,
eloquent with love; the beauty of her smile, and the
thousand charms that, like young loves, made their
home in the rich world of her beauty, transfixed him
to the spot in silent wonder and admiration. Yet
there seemed to be mixed with his surprise, as he
gazed, some painful memory, called up by her face,
of which he in vain tried to fix the time, place, or
event. But, baffled, he turned his attention upon the
cavalier, who, in a low, fond tone, was talking to her,
and vainly attempted to obtain a sight of his features,
or catch the full sound of his voice. His attitude and
presence therehis evidently accepted love, maddened
him. The fair jewel of her love he regarded as his
own! his passion had made it of all value to him, and
he determined alone to share it.
Knowest thou this cavalier, Rascas? he
whispered
,
hoarsely.
No, signor; but every man's blood is red! he
replied, significantly.
Nay, I would not shed it in an encounter like
this; I must be secret in what I do.
I will pledge my oath your excellency shall never
see him again after he leaves this garden! he
answered
,
touching the handle of his stiletto.
He shall not die, whoever he may be. He shall
live to witness my triumph, replied the count, with
fierceness.
There are dungeons in the prison that
communicate
with the palace, insinuated Rascas.
I understand thee. If thou hast thy steed in the
street, mount him, ride after the troop, and return with
ten horsemen. I will see that they are introduced by
the private way through which I came in. Go! let thy
horse outspeed the eagle! Rascas promptly
disappeared
,
and the count turned his attention to his
victims
.
Suddenly a nightingale from a tree near the lattice
poured forth a flood of melody to the rising moon in
so ravishing a strain, and with such a richness and
variety of notes, that it seemed as if a whole choir of
warblers were at their vespers. Don Henrique looked
round with a delighted ear, and, as he did so, the Count
of Osma started back with a surprised exclamation
that had nearly betrayed his presence.
This, then, is my rival! This is why he would
keep private, that he might pass his hours in
dalliance
!
Now, by the red rood! he shall rue this,
were he heir to the throne! I did not think I should
make such a prisoner when I bid Rascas go! It hath
gone abroad that he lieth wounded to the death! It
will be easy hence to bruit about his death from his
wounds, and, if it should become needful to support it,
I will not be backward in making it true. He shall
exchange, within the hour, this luxurious boudoir for
a dungeon, and this maiden's love for a jailer's
companionship
.
Either he must be put out of the way,
or I must give up my passion for this lovely being.
An Osma hath never yet turned aside when love or
ambition beckoned; and he will scarcely do so now!
This is the secret of his retirement! It is love's
arrow
,
I see, that hath wounded him. Soon, youthful
wooer, I will take thy place; and if love may not win
thee to love me, fair Azlie, power shall do it. I will
see this false quadroone-mother the while Rascas is
away. Here, sir! lie there! he said, to his hound,
pointing first to the ground, and then directing his
attention
in at the window. I would keep a guard
here!
The obedient dog lay down, and fixed his fiery eyes
upon the young man with a settled and immoveable
glance.
'Tis well! If he comes forth, bring him to the
earth, but harm him not! he said, and the intelligent
animal seemed also to understand. Then, returning
to the quadroone-mother, he cried, sternly,
False woman! didst thou not tell me thy
daughter's
heart was free?
Yes, signor, she answered, alarmed by his
manner
.
Yet at this moment a cavalier is sitting unreproved
at her feet, and love is going on between them as
busily
as if they were married but yesterday.
Ninine uttered an exclamation of astonishment and
terror, and would have flown to her daughter's room,
but the count detained her.
Nay, calm thyself! I see thou knowest it not.
Didst thou not take into thy house a wounded
Spaniard
last night?
Renault did. It is he that hath done this!
Be patient. This cavalier hath won the maiden's
heart. I saw in every look and feature that she loves
him!
Then this knife shall cut her image from his
bosom
,
she cried, seizing a small stiletto that lay in its
case upon a marble table near her.
I command thee to be patient, woman. If it have
gone no farther than this, I care notnay, I like it
well! This cavalier I have little good fellowship for,
and would fain touch him in a point so sensitive. I
have despatched my servant for a guard. Thou shalt
hear no more of him.
It is Renault hath done it, signor.
If thou wouldst not do injury to thine own
interests
,
breathe that accursed name no more, he said,
between
his shut teeth, his soul writhing at the
remembrance
of the young quadroon's insult in the
banquet-chamber
,
as well as from his recollection of his
disappointed
vengeance against the councillors. Thou
didst admit me by a secret entrance. Send thy slave
to wait there for the guard I expect.
The count paced the apartment in stern and silent
thought, occasionally pausing at the window to listen
for the alarm-growl of his bloodhound or the approach
of his guard. At length he heard the sound of
galloping
horsemen, which the next moment ceased in
the rear of the garden. Impatient to receive them, he
hastened to the gate. They were already
dismounted
,
and let in by the slave when he arrived. In a
low tone, he gave a few brief orders to Rascas, who,
followed by eight dragoons, silently advanced in the
direction of the boudoir. The count himself, desirous
of concealing his agency in the arrest, kept so far in
the background, wrapped to the eyes in his cloak, as
to witness without sharing in the proceedings. With
his characteristic tact, he had commanded Rascas to
lead the dragoons into the shadow of a group of
orange-trees beyond the range of the window, lest,
either recognising who was to be their prisoner, they
should be reluctant to seize him, or because he wished
no one save himself to know the person of his victim.
In pursuance of this plan, Rascas was to enter his
boudoir
,
and induce him, by some duplicity, to walk forth
into the garden, and into the snare set before him.
I have told thee, fair Azlie, said Don Henrique,
in the hearing of those without, pursuing the
conversation
that had been interrupted by the song of the
nightingale, that my home is in sunny Spain; and
that I have an elder brother, during whose life I am
forbidden to marry, on penalty of being cast forth
penniless
.
Such is the cruel law of inheritance in my
family. Wouldst thou wed me poor?
Thou dost mock my love, Henrique! she said,
reprovingly. Yet my love is so great that I would
not have thee become poor for my sake.
Wilt thou, then, lest my love for thee should make
me poor, restore me my heart?
Nay, I am perplexed! Love would, and love
would not! But I love thee, and would die for thee.
Nay, thou shalt live for me; I will wed, and take
thee with me to Spain. In some little nook, out of
the world's way, will we pass our days, and be happy
without wealth or name.
Now that I know how much thou wilt risk by
loving me, I shrink at what I bring upon thee.
Nay, sweet, thou art all the world to me; wealth,
honour, and rank are forgotten in loving thee! I look
into thine eyes and am happy! I hear thy voice and
am blessed! Thy smile is sunshine to my heart, and
thy presence to me the purest earthly bliss! He
kissed the cheek she laid upon his shoulder, and was
silent a moment; then added, with a smile, I did not
tell thee that my father, lest I should marry, would
have made me a monk! And, to escape holy orders,
I took to the sea, a wanderer, and Heaven hither hath
brought me to crown my happiness. Ha! was not that
a voice? he cried, starting up, and looking towards
the door that led into the apartments of the
quadroone-mother
.
Nay, it was nothing, he added, resuming
his place. He had, indeed, heard a low growl from
the hound, but the direction of the sound had deceived
him.
Why, Henrique, do you keep your eyes fixed so
constantly on the door, disturbed by the rustling of a
leaf? she asked, with alarm.
Nay, dost thou not expect Renault soon? he
inquired, evasively.
And thou needest not fear Renault; the knowledge
of my happiness would be joy to him. He does
indeed
linger! Whither could he have gone from the
palace?
Doubtless to look after the safety of the
councillors
whom he so nobly rescued. I pray they got
safely
beyond the bloodly fangs of Osma. Nay, I surely
heard a footstep approaching, he said, placing
himself
in an attitude to receive an intruder.
'Twas not within yonder room, she said, with a
smile; thou hast listened so towards that door, that
thou dost imagine every noise to proceed from the
point towards which thy ears are turned. It was but
a rustling of the breeze in the foliage without. Pray
tell me what hath moved this suspicion in thee?
Listenfor thou must soon learnbut fear
nothing
on account of what I am to tell thee. Thy
mother
hath sent to confer with Count Osma, and he is
now in her apartmentthyself the subject of their
conference. Nay, dearest, am I not here to defend
thee? I have prepared a vessel to escape with thee to
Spain, this hour to sail if thou wilt say yes!
Shortly
my friends will be waiting in the street to receive
us, and bear us on board. Wilt thou fly with me,
dearest?
My brother!
Thy
lover!
Vol. II.G
Wherever thou goest, there will I go. But
Renault
Shall follow us. But the time will not now admit
of delay.
Wherefore, then, do we linger here? One
moment
may destroy both thyself and me. The Count
Osma will soon seek my boudoir, and thou wilt be the
first sacrifice!
I wait here that I may meet him. I would have
him be a witness to our love! he said, with a smile.
He will slay thee!
He will scarce dare lift his weapon against me,
Azlie. And am I not armed?
Then blood will flow! Flyflyif not for
thy
safety, for
mine
for I tremble at his wicked power!
Be it so, dearest! for thy fear's sake! But I
had hoped to have met the tyrant here in thy virgin
presence, and looked his villany down his throat!
Yet I will go with thee; but first will I leave some
record behind, that he may know who hath robbed
him of his treasure.
Mercy! we are lostlost! suddenly shrieked
Azlie.
The Count of Osma, not desiring to be known to
Don Henrique as an actor in his arrest, had at first
kept back in the shadow of the trees, intending to
leave the conduct of the whole affair in the hands of
Rascas, who, after posting the soldiers in ambush, had
softly approached the window. But observing them,
through the lighted casement, still in conversation,
and fancying, by the motion of Don Henrique's lips,
that his own name was mentioned, he felt a desire to
listen. He immediately stepped forward, and, passing
Rascas, with a sign for him to stay back, stood and
concealed himself in the covert of the thickly-leaved
vine that trellised the lattice, and, unobserved,
overheard
all that passed between them: what he said to
her of his native country, of his intended flight, and,
finally, his last words in reference to himself. The
feelings with which he listened may be best imagined!
But mostly shame and anger crimsoned his cheek that
his guilty purpose should be known to his victim,
whom he saw prepared not only to meet his rage, but
to triumph over him.
He shall not live to laugh at me, and make me the
scorn of the Spanish
Cortez!
he muttered to himself.
As he now knows that I am here in pursuit of this
amour, I will throw off this disguise and all
concealment
,
and, by the red rood! he shall live to see his
inamorata
bless these arms! Thus speaking, he
dropped
his cloak from his shoulders, and, stepping in
through the window, presented himself before the eyes
of Azlie just as Don Henrique had pronounced the
word treasure.
Of what treasure dost thou speak, fair signor?
Methinks I did hear this word, he said, in a sarcastic
tone, leaning upon his naked sword, and eying him
with mingled triumph and hatred.
Thy knightly pastime at eavesdropping hath not
been fruitless, Sir Garcia of Ramarez, ironically
replied
Don Henrique, unmoved by his sudden presence.
Yet his eyes blazed with his feelings as he confronted
him.
I do congratulate thee, signor, on thy sudden health!
Thou hast had a skilful leech. Thy hurt had like to
have cost the city its roofs, and some scores of
bourgeois
their heads! 'Tis well thou art in condition
again. Doubtless this trembler, who hangs upon thee
as if a lion had come in her path, hath been thy
chirurgeon
.
She hath made a wound in my heart this
morning, which she must e'en make whole again, if
such be her skill.
Ramarez, thou hast given full license to thy
tongue, said Don Henrique, with manifest surprise at
his ironical words and haughty bearing. If thou
depart
not as thou camest, our respective ranks shall not
deter me from striking thee with my sword!
Love and rivalry make all men equal, fair signor,
he said, in the same taunting tone. If an eagle and
a falcon pursue the same dove, the captive is to the
bird of the strongest beak.
Villain, defend thyself! cried Don Henrique,
throwing himself upon him with his drawn sword.
Osma was scarcely taken by surprise, though the
assault was somewhat sudden, and received him with
characteristic coolness and skill. For a few moments
their swords flashed fire, so fierce and deadly was the
brief encounter. The count had made one or two
passes, at first, at the breast of his antagonist, and
then, as if changing his purpose of attacking him,
stood for the remainder of the conflict wholly on the
defensive. Don Henrique saw this, and, on his part,
instead of aiming at his life, sought only to disarm him.
This, after one or two trials, he succeeded in doing, by
dexterously changing his sword from his right to his
left hand, and making a sudden counter-pass, the count's
weapon flying from his grasp through the window into
the garden. When Rascas saw this, he leaped through
the casement, and with his dagger was about to strike
the victor to the heart. But his master caught his
hand and hurled him backward, crying,
Hadst thou slain him, I would have laid thee dead
at my feet. Go, pick up my sword! Thou hast the
best of it, Signor Henrique. Thou art a skilful
swordsman
as well as thy sire. But, though victory hath
sided
with thee in war, it must side with me in love.
Don Henrique had remained haughtily and
indignantly
standing where he had disarmed his antagonist,
with Azlie clinging to him in eloquent silence, looking
first in the face of one and then of the other, as if
watching the balance in which her fate was cast. She
looked far lovelier than ever, and Osma drank in her
beauty with intoxicating passion. Each moment his
determination, which had begun to waver, to use
violence
towards Don Henrique, grew stronger,
strengthened
by the admiration of her charms, which, unless
he removed him, he felt would be lost to him for ever.
Count Osma of Ramarez, said Henrique, whose
eyes flashed at his words, and whose blood boiled at
his libertine glances towards the maiden, I have borne
thy intrusion hitherto! I command thee to leave me.
If thou wilt resign to me thy place at this lovely
creature's feet, I will obey theeafter that I have
wooed a while.
Demon! I swear to thee, by the cross on my blade,
I will not spare thy life if I cross it with thee once
more! Hath this distance from Spain made a traitor
of thee? Leave me, assassin!
Ha! sayest thou! he cried, fiercely.
Signor, said Rascas, hastily returning to him with
his sword, one of the dragoons left with the horses
hath given word that a company of thy soldiers, under
command of Don Francisco de Loyola, are waiting not
far off in the street.
Ha! I had forgotten! Treason? So, Signor
Henrique
!
thou hast been corrupting my troops. They
are the friends, as I overheard, that were to conduct
thee to thy ship, for they are abroad by no order of
mine. Ho! without there! Seize this traitor! he cried,
with ill concealed exultation at thus finding the shadow
of a pretence to excuse him for doing what he had
resolved
to do at all hazards.
Dost thou mean this? exclaimed Don Henrique,
in the utmost surprise, seeing the window filled with
dragoons, two or three of whom advanced within the
room.
I arrest thee as a traitor to Spain! answered
Osma, sternly. Seize him, and drag him to the state
prison!
How can
I
commit treason?
That shall be tried by judges.
Count Osma, this mockery hath gone full far!
answered
Henrique, as if scarcely realizing the scene:
your jesting is ill timed, and methinks you should
have chosen a fitter subject.
None fitter than thyself. Why do ye hesitate?
Seize the traitor! he cried to the dragoons.
One of the men and the bloodhound sprang upon
him at the same instant. The man received Don
Henrique's
sword through his heart, while the fierce hound
fell dead as he seized him by the throat, from a wound
G 2
dealt in the neck, given by the hand of Azlie, who,
with a stiletto, which she had long worn as the
guardian
of her honour, sprung between her lover and the
savage animal. The death of his favourite enraged
Osma to fury. For an instant Don Henrique stood
like a lion at bay, and, with his reeking sword,
menaced
death to whomsoever should lay hands upon him.
Again the Count of Osma called upon them to seize
him; in vain the youth's skill! in vain his lion-like
courage! in vain the sheltering bosom of Azlie!
Overpowered by numbers, he was secured and bound;
while Osma seized the quadroone maiden, lest, in the
phrensy of the moment, she should use upon her own
person the weapon with which she had defended her
lover.
Nay, sweet, he said, confining her in his arms
and wresting it from her, he is but a traitor! and
thou art too noble to give thy love basely. Bear him
away, Battista, he cried to the lieutenant of the
dragoons
,
and see that he is placed in a secure chamber
of the prison; for thy head will answer for it. Away
with him! Don Henrique struggled fearfully for
his liberty; and when, at length, he saw Azlie in
Osma's
grasp, he foamed at the mouth, and gnashed his
teeth with mingled grief, rage, and vengeance. But
all was vain. He was dragged violently away from
her presence, but not without receiving a glance that
assured him she would seek death by her own hand
ere she proved false to him.
Alas! how much poignant misery is mingled with
the cup of life! Unfortunate Henrique! Dragged from
the presence of thy heart's idol to become the tenant
of a gloomy dungeon, on a vain charge of treason, that
thy rival may rob thee of thy love and honour. Borne
away, too, leaving thy beloved Azlie in the licentious
arms of a libertine! Hapless lover! bear thy lot with
patience, for thou shalt be speedily and wonderfully
avenged!
Scarcely had the dragoons disappeared through the
window, bearing away their prisoner and wounded
comrades from the garden by the way they had
entered
,
when Osma despatched Rascas to Loyola with a
message, as coming from Henrique himself, to say that
his services would not be that night required, and that
he might return to the barracks with his men; for he
resolved to reserve till the morrow his punishment of
that officer.
He was now left alone with Azlie, who, released
from his hold, stood a few paces from him, panting and
breathing like a hunted fawn that has unexpectedly
been stopped by a new foe. Not a tear escaped her
not a wordnot a cry! Her bosom was too full of
feelings for utterance! It would be difficult to analyze
them! Grief, indignation, terror, despair, all crowded
upon her heart, and threatened to crush it! Osma
gazed upon her a few moments in silence; and,
perceiving
that this was no time to press his suit, he was
about to call for her mother, when she appeared, full
of the intensest alarm.
I thank Heaven thou art safe, signor, she cried,
on seeing him as she entered. I heard the clash of
arms as if in the eastern street, and hastened to the
court gate, when the porter told me it was in the
direction
of Azlie's chamber. Blood is upon the floor!
The intruder hath been slain?
Thou wilt scarce hear of him again, signora, he
said, quietly. I was now about to call thee. Thou
seest thy fair child is suddenly converted into a statue
of passion and grief! I leave her in thy charge, and
trust all to thy advice and authority! Thou wilt scarce
regret thy change of lovers, fair Azlie, he added,
with a smile of irony. By Heaven! she stands there
like marble. See to her, signora! he exclaimed,
with a voice of alarm and wonder.
Azlie's blood had suddenly rushed back upon her
heart, and left her face indeed like marble, while every
limb became rigid and fixed. She looked like life
converted
into stone! Her very breathing was stilled!
It hath killed her! shrieked her mother, taking
her icy hand, and letting it fall again powerless at her
side.
I fear it hath! repeated Osma, with emotion.
Suddenly a piercing and terrific shriek escaped from
her breaking heart, and she fell at length upon the floor.
That hath relieved her, signora! Tears will flow
apace, and by the morning she will be calm. I leave
her in thy charge, and remember that thy life will
answer
for her safety.
Need I say to your excellency that I have no
wish than that she shall be thine!
Be this thy mind, and thou shalt be rewarded to
thy heart's wish, he said, wrapping his cloak about
him. I came not hither to-night to remove my prize,
but to secure her. See that she have no
communication
with her brother Renault, and send me word on
the instant of his return! Poor child! she sobs!
Adieu, Ninine. Pray send thy slave to let me forth!
Thus speaking, the Count of Osma left the boudoir
of the hapless Azlie, and, with his breast full of the
passions which the last hour had awakened in it,
departed
from the garden, and secretly and swiftly
regained
his cabinet. In a quarter of an hour afterward
De Loyola was the inmate of a dungeon, and the
soldiers
of his command under arrest for revolt.
CHAPTER VI.
THE PURSUIT AND CAPTURE.
When
Renault departed from the palace, after
defeating
the governor's purpose of assassination, he left
his party and galloped alone towards his own dwelling,
full of anxiety for the fate of Azlie, for whom he
feared
every evil while she remained under the power of
his cruel mother, or so long as the rumoured libertinism
of the new governor could give her ambitious mind the
faintest hope of personal aggrandizement by offering
him so lovely a victim. As he rode along, he resolved
to remove her at once, not only from his mother's roof,
but from the town, and become the personal protector
of her happiness and honour.
She was dear to him for her affection and for her
gentle beauty, and he felt that for her safety and
welfare
he would willingly sacrifice his own life. With
these thoughts mingled apprehensions for the safety of
the president and his friends, who, though safely
without
the precincts of the palace, were not yet beyond
danger
.
The more he reflected upon the character of the
governor, the more his solicitude for their escape
increased
;
so that, when he reached his own gate,
instead
of entering, he relieved his anxiety for the safety
of his sister by inquiring of the old African porter after
her welfare; and, learning nothing that could alarm his
fears, he spurred forward, and in a short time arrived
at the private mansion of the president. He found him
in the court with two others, ready to mount their
horses, and delaying only for the arrival of the
remainder
of their friends from their respective homes. In a
little while these arrived, each armed, like the
president
and his party, with a heavy sword at the side and
pistols in their holsters.
Gentlemen, said Renault, who was received by
them with the warmest expressions of joy and gratitude,
this night's treachery should teach us caution. The
Count of Osma has too much hatred and unsatisfied
revenge in his bosom to let you escape without an
effort
to arrest your flight. He has been foiled, not
defeated
.
I pray you, allow me to escort you with my
small band a mile beyond the gates. Nay, I will not
be said `
no!
' Remain here a few minutes, and I will
return and ride with you to the barriers. It may not
be you should go alone.
Leaving the house of the Sieur d'Alembert, Renault
then rode rapidly towards the rendezvous, in the hopes
of finding there the most of his band of reserve of forty
men; though with some doubts of it, as he had
dismissed
them to their private quarters on leaving the
palace. He galloped forward, however, with great
speed; and, entering the echoing court among the
ruins, traversed it to the extremity of the hall without
finding a single loitering individual of his party.
At the very moment each sword is worth its weight
in ingots, they are dispersed. My bugle will scarce
reach the ears of half a dozen. Yet six brave hearts
were a bulwark before the venerable president's breast!
Thus speaking, he wound his bugle loud and long,
the notes sounding far and high in the still evening.
Thrice he repeated the well-known signal of his band,
to the surprise of the guards at the city gates, and the
curious wonder of the soldiers in the distant barracks.
It was a bold step, and he felt it to be so; but it
was a crisis that admitted of no hesitation. In a few
moments afterward every street seemed to give out a
horseman, who rode in the direction of the rendezvous;
and in ten minutes Renault galloped forth at the head
of thirty young men. The president and councillors
were soon received into their midst, and the whole body
moved at a rapid trot towards the gates.
Osma's justice!
cried Renault, as they came
thundering up to the guardhouse.
Pass! answered the captain of the guard,
throwing
wide the broad gates, and letting them forth into
the country.
Their rear was barely beyond pistol-shot from the
walls ere Sulem appeared at the post, and delivered to
the captain of the guard the new countersign given him
by Osma. It was The Quadroone! He had
hardly
gone before a troop, consisting of fifty mounted
dragoons, spurring at full speed, came up to the barrier.
Ho! Barrucas! shouted their leader to the
captain
of the guard; has a party of half a dozen old
men passed through the gate to-night?
In the midst of a squadron of horse that went by
just before you came, I saw several elderly men riding,
surrounded by a guard of horsemen with drawn
swords, answered the other; but, though they gave
the countersign, I was sure, before they had one third
passed through, they were none of our troops.
Forward, in pursuit, shouted the leader, waving
his glittering sabre above his head, and dashing
headlong
through the gate. Forward! forward! rung
along the line of cavalry from mouth to mouth, each
soldier, in his momentary ardour, forgetting the strict
discipline that enforces silence on men under command.
Then, with waving plumes and thundering hoofs, the
whole squadron swept through the gate like a tempest
of iron.
Renault was not yet a quarter of a mile beyond the
gates when he heard the sounds of pursuit, and his
suspicions left him no room to doubt the cause.
Riding
up by the side of the president, he said,
I fear me, venerable sir, your life will be once
more exposed to peril. I pray you, ride forward with
your friends at the top bent of your speed, and leave
me to check the pursuit. My horse is fleeter than
thine. Mount him, and give me yours. So that you
are in safety, I am content.
Nay, brave Renault, this may not be; keep thy
horse, and I will remain here. I am an old man, but
can nevertheless wield a sword to purpose.
Sir President, pardon me, thy danger has put
thirty
young men in peril to save thee. Wilt thou, by
remaining
behind when escape is before thee, render that
peril vain for yourselves? Ride, sir; ride, gentlemen,
all! We will place ourselves between you and
pursuit
.
In half an hour you will be safe within the
fortress
.
Eight or ten of my young men shall
accompany
you.
Be it so, since you so warmly urge it, my son,
answered
the Sieur d'Alembert; but, as I live, I had
rather die than expose thee to harm on this occasion.
Fear me not, sir. Danger in these times is to me
meat and drink. Do you ride on, in Heaven's name,
and leave me to give a good account of these
Spaniards
.
Be it as thou wilt, noble youth, said the president;
thou hast put thyself in the way of danger for us,
and we were ungenerous not to obey thee. Let me
embrace thee! Doubtless they pursue
us
alone. If
they find us not with you, you will scarce come to
blows, and nothing evil may grow out of it. It is
best, therefore, that we do ride on. Come, gentlemen,
our absence will prevent bloodshed; let us spur
forward
.
Thus speaking, the councillors, guarded by five or
six young men, separated from the escort, and with
freer rein, though the whole company had hitherto rode
at good speed, galloped ahead.
Now, my brave
courreurs
, said Renault, having
given orders to his troop to ride at a less rapid rate,
on our prudence and courage depend the lives of
those venerable men. Yonder advancing troops are
Spaniards, doubtless in pursuit of them. They cannot
certainly know that they were of our party, and may
be turned back from the chase peaceably. But if
they will not be prevailed on to return, but are
resolved
to go on in pursuit, then it becomes us to give them
battle. They are rapidly approaching! A furlong
before us is a slight elevation in an open space of the
forest. There we will draw rein and await them.
On!
In a few moments they came to the rising ground,
and wheeled into line facing the town. They had
hardly done so when the moonlight, flashing upon
numerous
glittering points in the distant forest-road, as
well as the louder sound of galloping horses, jingling
sabres, and ringing iron, showed them that those who
pursued were immediately upon them.
Coolly and silently, my comrades, now, said
Renault
;
their force can scarcely be twice our own,
and, for brave and determined hearts like ours, this is
but even battle. They see us now and draw rein.
This shows Spanish caution.
The pursuing squadron, the same which Rascas
ordered
out, but which he had commanded to ride on
without him, after overtaking and detaching from it
the guard to arrest Don Henrique, on discovering
Renault's
troop posted in their path, suddenly drew up,
and their leader, riding forward a few paces, sounded
a parley. It was answered by a note from the young
courreur
chief's bugle, and he, in turn, rode forward to
meet him.
Your servant, Signor Captain, said the Spaniard,
with some show of courtesy. I am in pursuit of a
troop of rebel horse that but now left the city gates,
escorting certain escaped state-prisoners. I should
have suspected thy party; but I see their faces are
turned city-ward, and discover in it none of those I
seek.
Save my party, no other horse have passed this
way within the hour, said Renault.
Thy party is that we seek, signor, said a
gray-headed
lieutenant, riding up. This, Signor Captain, is
the very leader of the party that rescued the
councillors
in the banquet-chamber. I was present when the
men-at-arms entered, and now recognise him. It is
this troop, and none other, that came through the
gates. They doubtless have sent the prisoners
forward
,
and are drawn up to stay pursuit.
Then, in the name of Santiago of Spain, let us
charge through them! cried the Spanish captain, with
animation.
So vigorous was the onset, the Spanish horse
having
the advantage of full twenty yards' momentum,
that the
courreurs du bois
were compelled to give way
before it, and let them pass through without scarcely
striking a blow. Chagrined and angry with himself
for having suffered the Spaniard to take him thus at
vantage, and fearing for the safety of the councillors,
Renault instantly rallied his troop, in his turn pursuing
the Spanish cavalry, and attacked them while in full
career with the most desperate valour. He assailed
them on either flank with such fatal obstinacy and
address
,
that, before they had advanced a quarter of a
mile, ten of the dragoons were unhorsed, and left
weltering in their blood upon the road. His voice was
heard above the loud tramp of the horses, inspiring
and urging his men to avenge their dishonour. And
Vol. II.H
well did they obey him. Once he galloped to the van
of the Spaniards, and in person attacked the Spanish
leader, cheering his troop, and shouting for them to
strive to gain the front.
This desperate flying conflict continued for nearly
half a league, the hovering
courreurs
dealing death and
wounds upon their foes, and they, by the command of
their leader, who each moment expected to come up
with the fugitive councillors, only acting on the
defensive
,
and using their spurs rather than their swords.
All at once Renault, who had fallen to the rear for
the purpose of assembling his party to take advantage
of a winding in the road to cross the forest and gain
the van, heard a shout from the Spanish leader that
betrayed the discovery of the pursued. He looked
ahead, and his worst fears were confirmed by seeing
them galloping along an open glade, upon which the
moon shone brightly, fully exhibiting the small party
to the eyes of the Spaniards.
Now, my brave friends, he cried to his band,
let us defend and save our judges, or die with them.
Follow me!
The way was too narrow, as well as the speed at
which the Spaniards rode too great, for him to pass
them before they could come up with the fugitives.
Therefore Renault, after giving the command, turned
off to the right, followed by his whole troop save
three or four that had fallen in the flying contest.
Riding
a little way at full speed through a natural
avenue
of the forest, he came to a narrow path which
admitted
but two abreast. This he entered, and, after
galloping about five minutes, emerged suddenly into
the great forest, ahead both of the pursuers and
pursued
.
It was with joy that he saw the councillors had
not yet passed by, though they were visible not a
hundred yards off, approaching at a rapid pace, the
dragoons close upon them, and the voice of their
captain
shouting upon them to surrender.
The appearance of Renault surprised the Spaniards,
and, slackening their pace, they came to a halt. But
the absence of the party that had so annoyed his rear
instantly accounted to him for this apparently fresh
squadron, and he was about to give the order to charge
them. But Renault, with whose party the fugitives
had united, profiting by his former experience, and
seeing his only safety was in fighting, anticipated him
by leading his own men to the onset ere the Spaniards
could get in motion. The meeting was terrific and
most sanguinary. The president fought by the side
of Renault; and the councillors were seen
everywhere
the fight was thickest, dealing deadly blows.
The force of the Spaniards was far greater than
that of the
courreurs du bois;
and, after a severe
conflict
of ten minutes, the latter were ready to give way,
half of their number already lying dead on the ground.
Even when the battle waxed warmest, the Spanish
leader did not forget the object he had in view; and,
notwithstanding their stout defence, the councillors,
through his coolness and skill, were one after another
made prisoner and carried to the rear. Thrice the
president had been seized and borne from his saddle,
and as many times had Renault, assisted by two or
three of his party whom he summoned to his aid,
rescued
him from their hands.
This determination to take me alive, Renault,
said the president, shows me that, if taken, I am
reserved
for a worse fate than can await me here. So
I will die here, sword in hand.
Nay, thou shalt escape with me! said Renault.
My poor comrades! he sighed; this has been a
fatal night for them. Thy friends, sir, are all fallen
or taken captive! What do we battle for longer save
for thyself? Thy horse bleeds to death! Mount mine
and fly!
Alas! that my worthless life should have caused
so great bloodshed! If my escape will end it, I will
do as thou wilt! answered the president,
despondingly
.
Renault wound a recall upon his bugle, and the
remnant of his band gathered round him. Then,
mounting the president upon his own horse, and
leaping
upon another, he placed him between himself and
one of his troop; and, ere the Spanish captain, whose
force was very much diminished by the slain and the
absence from the field of those necessary to guard the
captives, could divine their intentions, they were in
full speed of flight.
Hold, signors! pursue them no farther! We
have six of them captives, and we had best return
with these ere we are attacked by a fresh troop, and
risk the loss of them! for I am told these forests are
filled with roving gentlemen of the blade, and we are
in little condition to do battle again to-night. Mount
and guard your prisoners, and then spur for the gates!
If Osma give me not a colonelcy for this night's
bloody work, he hath little appreciation of a cavalier's
merits! Are you all to horse? Then forward!
Obedient to his command, the Spanish troop, one
third less in number than when they left the town,
guarding between them the six venerable prisoners,
weary, wounded, and bleeding, formed into marching
column, and at a slower pace than they had come out,
returned towards the city.
Count Osma was seated in his cabinet an hour after
his return from the quadroone's dwelling, his satellites
Rascas and the Moor closeted with him, both having
fulfilled their respective missions, save, as has been
seen, that Rascas, instead of continuing on with the
dragoons as he had been ordered to do, transferred his
services more immediately to his master's person.
He was waiting impatiently for news from those who
had been despatched to intercept the flight of the
councillors. Suddenly the sound of a body of horse
reached his ears, and he started to his feet.
Go, Rascas, and quick bring me their report! he
cried.
During his absence he paced his room with rapid
and nervous strides, and half met him at the door
when he returned.
So! what tidings?
Taken, answered Rascas, laconically.
All!
Six of them.
Where is Captain Lopez?
Here, your excellency, replied the captain of the
troop, who had followed at the heels of the count's
messenger.
You are well returned, Signor Captain! Are
these rebel judges taken?
All save one; but with the loss of sixteen of our
party.
And but seven old men to oppose thee! How is
this, sir?
They had an escort of some thirty
courreurs du
bois
, I think they are called.
Ha! this Renault once more! cried Osma, in an
angry tone of surprise. One escaped, saidst thou?
If thou hast the old president, they might all have fled.
I know not their rank, signor, answered the
captain
;
every man of them is old and gray-headed.
Conduct them hither.
In a few moments afterward the captive judges
stood before him.
You are welcome, gentlemen, said the count,
with haughty scorn, as they were led in, guarded, one
after another. Ha! Signor Captain, are these the
six? Are these all your captives? he demanded,
with keen and violent disappointment, as the last
entered
.
Where is the president?
If he be not here, it is he who has escaped,
replied
the Spanish captain.
Then thy head shall answer for it! I had rather
he were here in chains before me than a score of
lesser
men.
It may not be helped, signor. We fought till I
lost a third of my men. The one who escaped was
wrested from us by the coolness and address of the
courreur chef
, who galloped off with him, his hand upon
his rein, the remnant of his men circling him with
their bodies.
They have then escaped to their fortress, signor,
H 2
said Rascas. If you have not trouble ere many
days from that quarter, I know not the mettle of this
Renault.
I would give his head's weight in gold for it!
Give me the weight of his brains in silver, and I
will bring it thee, signor, answered Rascas, slightly
and significantly touching the haft of his dagger.
We will talk of this anon. How now, sirs! he
added, fixing his glance with stern vindictiveness upon
the captives, do you not deserve death?
Not for doing our duty, replied the oldest of the
judges, firmly.
Nor shall Osma for doing his. Drag them away
to prison, and send them a priest; for they die at
sunrise
!
The count turned from them as he spoke, and they
were led forth from his presence, without his
bestowing
upon them another glance.
Ho, Sulem! go bid Lopez conduct them into the
council chamber ere they be taken to prison, and
summon
the cabildo to me there forthwith. I had forgot.
I have promised my daughter they shall have a trial.
In a quarter of an hour afterward, this tribunal of
Osma's own creatures was assembled, the prisoners
brought before it, and confronted with certain
witnesses
that were readily to be found. The charge made
against them was that of rebellion. Rather for his
own amusement than a desire for justice, Osma bade
his assessor hear and record the testimony against the
prisoners, and then called upon them for their defence.
The elder councillor pleaded that he had done
nothing
except in the character of commissary-general
and ordonateur of the King of France in the province;
and to him alone he was accountable for the motives
that had directed his official conduct. This plea was
sustained; but the Count of Osma, although the
cabildo
was a civil court, in his character as
commanding
general as well as president of the tribunal,
likening
it to a court-martial, said he disproved the
judgment
of the
cabildo
, and that the prisoner was guilty.
Another of the councillors boldly offered the same
plea, which was in like manner disapproved by the
commanding general. The other prisoners, seeing
this, denied the jurisdiction of the tribunal before
which they were arraigned. Their plea, however,
was overruled, and they were convicted under an old
statute, which denounces the punishment of death and
confiscation of property, not only against those who
excite any insurrection against the king or state, or
take up arms under pretext of extending their liberty
or rights, but against those who give them any
assistance
.
Osma then rose up, and, after declaring that
the Sieur d'Alembert and Renault the Quadroon were
also included in their conviction, condemned them to
be hanged, and pronounced the confiscation of their
estates
.
On hearing this, several of the better class of
town's-people
who had sided with Spain, as well as some of
the Spanish officers (for the council-chamber was
thrown open to the populace, and was nearly filled even
at that late hour), sought, by the most earnest
entreaties
,
to prevail on the governor, before he left the forum,
to remit or suspend the execution of his sentence till
the royal clemency could be implored. He was,
however
,
inflexible and inexorable; and the only indulgence
he would condescend to grant was, that their
punishment
should be inflicted by shooting instead of hanging.
So! Take them to prison! This farce hath been
in play full long. Early to-morrow afternoon let them
be led forth to execution!
Thus speaking, the sanguinary governor strode from
the council-chamber, where justice and humanity had
been thus openly mocked, and the victims of his
bloodthirsty
vindictiveness were conducted to the dungeons
prepared for them.
On the ensuing morning, says Francois Xavier
Martin, in his History of Louisiana, the guards at
every gate and port of the city were doubled, and
orders
were given not to allow anybody to enter it. All
the troops were under arms, and paraded the streets,
or were placed in battle array along the
leve
and on
the public square. Most of the inhabitants fled into
the country. At six o'clock in the afternoon, the
victims
were led, under a strong guard, to the small square
in front of the barracks, tied to stakes, and an
explosion
of musketry soon announced to the few inhabitants
who remained in the city that their friends were no
more. Posterity, the judge of men in power, will doom
this act to public execration: an act which no
necessity
demanded and no policy justified; an act which
served rather to gratify a spirit of retributive vengeance
in the satisfaction of personal revenge than to answer
the ends of national justice.
CHAPTER VII.
SCENE WITHIN THE ISLAND-FORTRESS.
The
sun was yet a quarter of an hour high on the
afternoon of this murderous execution of the
councillors
,
when a single horseman, in the uniform of a
chasseur
,
issued at full gallop out of a forest two leagues
from the town, and drew rein upon the shores of a
wooded lake. His coal-black horse was whitened with
foam, and his flanks reeking with blood, while the brow
of the rider was flushed and stern. Matters of serious
import evidently had caused him to take to saddle.
The shore on which he emerged was a shelving
beach of white sand, that, like a snowy belt, girdled a
small lake about one mile in width, and on every side
shut in by noble forest-trees. In the centre of the
lake, which lay, like a steel mirror, tinted with gold
under the evening sun, was a small island, on which
frowned the towers and battlements of a fortress, with
the flag of France hoisted over that of Spain proudly
waving above its ramparts. Wild ducks sailed in
troops about the lake, and the white gull skimmed its
surface with arrowy wing; the kingfisher seared
mid-heaven
,
marking his finny prey with far-sighted vision
as it swam deep beneath the surface; while the eagle,
balanced still higher, kept watch upon him in turn,
ready to descend like a thunderbolt, and rob him of it
when he should rise dripping from the flood. The
whole scene was brilliant and touchingly beautiful, yet
full of majestic repose, slumbering so quiet there in
the lap of eternal forests.
Without pausing to bestow a glance upon the
scenery
,
he had no sooner reined up, than, looking
wistfully
towards the fortress, he wound a horn that hung at
his saddle-bow, sending the notes far across the water.
After the lapse of a few seconds it was answered from
the fortress, and a boat instantly put off from the island
and approached the main. It was rowed by two
oarsmen
,
and a third individual stood up in the stern. As
it came near the shore, the horseman dismounted, tied
his horse to a tree, and walked to the water's edge, as
if too impatient to lose a moment in getting to the
island.
Ha, Rapin de Thoyras! Is it thou? demanded
the person in the boat, on coming near enough to the
land to discern his features. Cease rowing, my
men! Here is treachery!
Nay, Charleval, answered the other, stretching
forth his hand frankly, and then placing it earnestly on
his heart, I am henceforth a
courreur du bois!
Take
me to your bosom again!
Nay, I did love thee as a brother oncelove thee
more than all our happy band of Seven; now, alas!
disloyal and debased. But we will speak of this no
more. Wherefore have you sounded our private
signal
?
I would be conducted to the presence of your first
chief.
Renault hath been engaged in a sacred duty since
the morning. Sieur d'Alembert lieth at the point of
death, and he waits by his bed's head to receive his
latest breath. This is no time to intrude thyself upon
him. I fear treachery from thee, De Thoyras.
Wherefore
shouldst thou see him?
They have slain my father!
Thy father! Who hath done it?
This Count Osma. Within this hour, my father,
with five of the other judges, have been shot in the
square.
Sayest thou this on thy faith?
True as I stand here shedding hot tears of grief
and vengeance.
I believe thee! They shall be avenged! said
Charleval, with deep sorrow. What wouldst thou
do?
Avenge my father! was the stern reply.
Every
sword in our band shall be thine. To offer them
to thee I have ridden hither.
Take a seat beside me, he said, as the boat
touched
the shore; our brave, noble councillors! Hath
Osma done so bloody a thing? Then are his own days
numbered! I will trust thee, De Thoyras, for grief
hath made thee penitent. Nay, I will embrace thee,
and give thee my confidence. Now know that a
messenger
,
a swift Indian runner, hath been despatched to
the Camanchee king, who has often pressed upon us
his services, to come and aid us in driving out the
Spanish troops, with a thousand of his warriors. He
has a deadly hatred, it seems, for the Spaniards, and
desires to meet them in battle. It will be ten days
before
they can reach us. One hundred of the noble
Atchafalayas, with a fleet of pirogues, will waft them
to this side of the river, while their horses swim beside
the boats. In ten days, at the farthest, they will be
here. We had intended only to drive out the
Spaniards
;
but now, blood shall atone for blood, and that of
Osma's heart must flow ere vengeance is appeased.
Poor councillors! Savage and bloodthirsty tyrant!
The whole town are indignant and alarmed, said
the chasseur; this act has filled every bosom with
terror. Men are flying to arms everywhere, and
Renault
and thyself may lead full two thousand men
against the city.
Doth thy chief, Caronde, know this? and if he does,
will he not side with this guilty governor?
He lies suffering from shame and pain in our
stronghold, and hath, in his rage, slain two of our party
for mocking at his mutilated hand. This has enraged
the whole band against him; and their affection hath
ever been more for myself than for him.
Will they obey you?
To a man!
And these Ladrones of the Lagoons, that are thy
allies, some two hundred in number? asked Charleval,
as the boat moved swiftly across the lake.
They will fight where the booty and pay is best.
Caronde is become nearly penniless through his
extravagances
,
and they will easily be persuaded to use
their knives and carbines on this side.
This I will leave to you, and also the conversion
of Caronde's band.
In a few moments they reached the island, and the
messenger was escorted into the fortress; which, as
he passed along, he saw was filled with the adherents
of Renault.
In a small room of the fortress, with rough stone
walls, and a single aperture for a window, through
which the sunlight shone in cheerfully, lay an old man
upon a rude pallet. His thin, white hairs were
scattered
over his expansive forehead, which was pale, and,
to the eye, cold like sculptured marble. His majestic
features were of the hue of death, but on them patience
in endurance struggled with suffering. It was the
Sieur d'Alembert. He had received a mortal wound
in the attack the night before, and death was fast
fixing
his seal upon his brow. Beside him stood a priest,
in silent waiting for his departure, having
administered
to him the last sacraments of the church. Near
his pillow stood Renault, full of grief; for he loved
him as a father, and affection had bound him to his
bedside since he first placed him there on reaching the
fortress after his escape with him. The venerable man
had his fading eyes fixed upon the small spot of sky
through the window, as if surveying the path along
which his spirit was to take its upward flight. Reason
was clear, and serene resignation sat upon his
countenance
.
My son! he said, faintly.
Renault pressed his hand, but could not speak.
I have wearied you this day, my son. My time
here will be but a few moments longer. I would ask
a dying favour!
Speak, my father!
That you avenge not my death. Louis has seen
fit to give our province to Spain; and Spain has done
no more than take her right. Forgive your king, and
suffer Spain! Disperse your band, and be a peaceful
citizen. This world hath enough evils that come
uncalled
;
seek to live in peace in it with all men, even
with thy enemies. If you would look upon human
wars and ambition as they now appear to me, you
would, so you could serve Heaven in conscience, scarce
heed who ruled the different nations of the earth for
the short time you lived upon it. Now promise me,
Renault, my son, you will live peaceably under the
Spanish rule, nor seek to avenge my death!
Renault dropped the hand he had so long held, rose
from the bedside, and hastily paced the room a few
moments without replying, his bosom torn by
conflicting
emotions.
My son, said the dying councillor, with a slight
accent of reproof.
The voice instantly drew him to his pillow.
Forgive
me, my more than father! Thy wish shall be
granted!
Bless thee, bless thee! I shall go happier, feeling
that I do not bequeath civil commotions to my
unhappy
country.
There was at this moment a low knock at the door,
and Charleval then entered.
How is it with the venerable judge? he asked,
softly. The rapid chisel of death hath sharpened
his features.
He will go with the sun, answered Renault.
What news bring you from the main land? Your
countenance is troubled.
The councillor will in a few moments rejoin his
friends, was the evasive reply.
What mean you?
They are dead!
How? Do I hear rightly?
Too well. The six councillors have been shot, by
order of Osma, in the square.
Then Osma dies!
Dead are they all? said the dying judge, who
had overheard and understood their words. Then
have they exchanged misery for happiness. With a
triumphant lighting up of his countenance, he then
half rose up in his bed, and cried,
I come to thee, my friends! I come! Heaven
receive
my spirit!
He fell back and expired.
Another victim has gone to accuse Osma at the
bar of Heaven! cried Renault, with mingled grief
and indignation. Happy councillor! Heaven hath
a great gain in our loss.
He must be avenged! said Charleval, sternly.
Nay, I have sworn he shall not.
But not to avenge the other councillors thou hast
not sworn?
No; but the president looked at me as he expired,
and I knew what his tongue would have spoken had
not death taken away the power of speech. No,
Charleval, we must not do it. To avenge them were
to avenge him also. We must live either under this
Spanish rule, or leave our native land for maternal
France.
Art thou in earnest, Renault?
The chamber of death is no place to trifle in, my
friend. We must disband our adherents, or leave
Spain in quiet possession of the province.
Vol. II.I
Be it so, Renault, answered Charleval, grasping
his hand; but we will talk of this anon. Rapin de
Thoyras is waiting to see thee, he added, quickly,
hoping
that his account of the sanguinary massacre
might fire his friend's bosom, and lead him to forget
his promise to the dying councillor.
The interview between De Thoyras and Renault,
which grief did not permit him to grant for full two
hours after the death of the councillor, was brief, and
terminated with Renault's rejection of his offer of
assistance
.
I pray thee, sir, he said to him, as he was about
dismissing him, use thy influence over thy band, and
persuade them also to disperse. It is best the
province
should be settled in quiet, and we shall most show
our love to our country by forwarding, all that lies in
our power, the wishes of our departed father and
councillor
.
While he was yet speaking, a bugle was heard from
the main, blown in a harsh, discordant key.
That is Gobin, and none else, said Charleval, as
the unskilful bugler continued to wind note after note.
Despatch a boat for him, said Renault; I fear
worse tidings still. Didst thou learn aught of my
sister
,
Sieur de Thoyras, while thou wert in the city?
Nothing touching her welfare.
It may be she hath come to no harm. Now
Heaven
hath taken the spirit of my friend to itself, I must
see to her safety.
In a little while Gobin, for the messenger was
indeed
he, was brought into the presence of Renault.
His countenance was expressive of great alarm, and
his limbs trembled.
Gobin, I pray thee deliver speedily and briefly the
message thou art charged with, said Renault,
impatiently
.
Brother Spain ha' a shotted the councillors.
Hath any harm come to Azlie?
Not yet, gossip. I took service last night wi'
brother Spain, but I was a drunk when I did't. I
went to bed, and slept till six o'clock, when guns
a-firing woke me up, and I looked out o' the window,
and I see the six councillors lying dead, shotten
through the heart, on the ground, he added, as if his
mind was deeply impressed with the scene he had
witnessed.
We know it, Gobin; did this alone bring thee
hither?
No, gossip. Soon as it was well dark, before the
moon got up, I ran off from the palace, afraid cousin
Spain would a-chop my head off, and was going to
hide myself in your house, when a gray woman met
me and gave me this note, he continued, fumbling
in his vest; and told me to bear it to you with the
wind's speed. I dropped myself down the outside of
the wall, and was coming a-foot, when I saw gossip
Boviedo on a horse he had found running loose after
the last night's battle. He swore he had won him by
his valour; I bade him keep him by his valour; and,
setting upon him, overset him like a cotton bale to the
ground, robbed him of his bugle, jumped into the
saddle
,
and am here wi' the first news o' the councillor's
being shotted. The note will scarce give thee more
sorry news, gossip Renault.
He delivered the note as he spoke. It contained but
one line. Renault read it, and with a loud cry of
misery
and despair, fell forward, and would have quite
fallen
to the floor but for the sustaining arm of Charleval.
He was for an instant in convulsions. By a strong
effort
of his mind, he, however, recovered himself, and
once more glanced over the note.
'Tis writ there in letters of fire. Blood alone can
quench them. Ho! Charleval! sound the gathering
cry of the band. De Thoyras, I will accept thy aid.
To horse, and meet me an hour hence at the
Pontchartrain
gate, with every man thou canst make follow
thee. To arms and to horse! he shouted, madly.
The chasseur lieutenant instantly took his departure,
full of surprise at this sudden change in the temper of
the
courreur chef
, and wondering at the cause that
produced
it, though gratified at the result. The fortress
was at once in arms. In less than half an hour, a
flotilla
of horse-barges left the island, and steered for the
main land; while Renault, full of impatience, his brain
burning with the fever of his mind, and incapable of
enduring
the slow progress of the barges, leaped from a
rock into the lake, and swam on horseback before them
to the land.
CHAPTER VIII.
OSMA AND THE QUADROONE-MOTHER.
The
Count of Osma had glutted his appetite for blood
in that of the six councillors, and the vindictive demon
within him, which demanded their lives, sated for the
present with this sacrifice, slumbered; but another was
now awakened scarcely less devilish. This was the
fiend of lawless passion. After the massacre, the
streets were deserted save by the soldiery. A gloom
like that of the tomb hung over the city, and no sounds
but those from armed men met the ear. Osma was in
his cabinet waiting for the twilight. It came, and,
attended
by the Moor Sulem, he sought the habitation of
the Quadroone. He was admitted as before, and found
Ninine alone.
Where is my beautiful Azlie? he asked, gayly, as
he entered through the Venetian casement into the
apartment.
She sleeps, my lord, she answered, significantly.
Thou hast given her the sleeping potion I sent
hither by my slave?
An hour ago.
And she has slept ever since?
Some twenty minutes, my lord.
It is well done of thee. Lead me to her. I would
feed my love by banqueting on her beauty while she
slumbers. Sleep hath a thousand charms unknown to
waking life. Lead me on, I pray thee, signora.
The quadroone-mother rose, and led the way to the
chamber of Azlie. A small silver lamp, suspended
above the couch, shed a soft lustre around. With one
arm pillowing her cheek, her raven hair falling like a
half-drawn veil about her, slept, like an infant, the pure
object of Osma's passion. Her beauty struck him
with increased surprise. He was awed by it, and a
thought of his own daughter crossed his mind as he for
a moment contemplated the virgin loveliness of the fair
child before him. But these thoughts were by no
means welcome, and he banished them, though not
without an effort. He knelt beside her, took her soft,
unconscious hand in his, and admiringly traced the
azure veins that lined it. He watched the gentle rise
and fall of her young bosom with desire, and
impressed
,
with licentious lips, an impassioned kiss upon her
maiden cheek. Still she slept on, Heaven alone the
protector
of her innocence.
Signora, I knew not till now half the value of thy
treasure! I will bear her privately to my palace while
she sleeps. Ho, Sulem!
The Moor, who had followed him like his shadow,
stood before him, and made a profound reverence of
submission of his will.
Nay, my lord, said the quadroone-mother,
quickly
;
ere thou remove her to thine own roof, certain
conditions must be complied with.
Ha! a price?
Ten thousand crowns.
Wouldst thou sell thy daughter like a slave,
woman
?
Nay, have not wedded brides a bridal portion?
The bride, but not the bride's mother.
Thou seest Azlie! she said, artfully pointing to
the slumbering girl, confident in the power of her
singular
beauty; have I demanded too much?
No. Sulem! hie thee to my treasury, and
forthwith
bring the amount in told gold.
I 2
The slave departed, and, during his absence, Osma
stood gazing upon the lovely sleeper in silence. As
he gazed, an expression of singular thoughtfulness came
upon his features, and, with growing surprise, he
seemed
to be tracing some fancied resemblance that
disturbed
him.
How like is the shell-like curve of the pearly eyelid,
and long jetty fringe that turns back from the cheek it
shades! he said, half aloud; how like is the smile
that lingers upon the mouth, and how very like the
mouth itself! 'Tis a strange and wonderful
resemblance
that cometh upon me, feature by feature!
Methinks
I toyed with that dark hair eighteen years ago.
Hath Heaven awakened this likeness to defeat my
purpose
?
Henceaway, superstitious fears! Shall an
idle memory, a fancied resemblance to the long-buried
dead affright me?
What wouldst thou, signor? asked the
quadroone-mother
,
hearing him speak.
Art thou listening? Nothing. Hath he not yet
returned? Ha! Methinks there is a shadow in the
window. Good Heavens! dost see that?
The quadroone-mother flew to the casement as he
spoke, and beheld a tall figure looking in upon her,
with blazing eyeballs, and one finger lifted warningly
and menacingly. Uttering a shriek of horror and
mortal fear, she fell senseless upon the floor. When
she came to herself a few moments afterward, she
looked
wildly about her, as if seeking the object of her
terror.
What means this fear, signora? asked the count,
concealing his own alarm at the sight of the sorceress,
lest a confirmation of his terror might defeat his
purpose
,
which had received a shock, but not a defeat, by
the presence of one his experience told him was no
messenger of good to him.
Didst see it? she gasped.
What?
Thespiritthe Moor!
He has not returned?
Nayaa woman!
I have seen nothing but branches waving without
in the night-breeze. Cease your alarm.
Was it nothing, then, signor?
Nothing but an image of thy brain.
Could it have been fancy? If the dead do appear,
my lord, it should be at such a time as this!
Thou hast seen nothing that is not of this world.
What didst thou fear? he asked, seeing her calmer,
desirous of learning something of the mysterious being
who had before exercised such an influence over
himself
,
as well as now over the quadroone-mother.
But she waved her hand, and signified her desire not
to be questioned. In a few minutes afterward Sulem
reappeared, and the gold was told down to the mother,
who, at the sight of it, forgot her late terrors.
Azlie is then mine, signora? asked Osma,
approaching
and kneeling on one knee at the couch of
his victim, as Sulem counted the last piece into her
hand.
Thine, your excellency. But thou wilt have to
keep her in a golden cage, for a young hawk will be
hovering o'er thy palace roof to pounce upon the dove
when once the keeper is away, she said, with a
malicious
feeling which was inherent in her, and would
break out even to a benefactor, if it might be she could
mingle poison in his cup of enjoyment. Osma she
thought was too happy, and her heart was envious.
So from its abundance she spake.
How meanest thou?
That the son of the late Marquis Caronde hath
long sought herand that thou art his rival.
Methinks I heard something of this from Rascas.
He lieth ill at ease, signora, maimed and sore from
disappointments and wounds.
The hurt tiger is most ferocious. I warn thee!
Besides, my lord, he hath a claim upon her as a master.
Azlie his slave! Doth he assert this?
He dothlisten! I was a slave, and the Marquis
of Caronde purchased me and made me free, but
forgot
to record my manumission on the provincial
records
;
and his son hath revived the question of bondage,
and claims me as his slave, that he may possess the
person of Azlie.
This is new. And, singular enough, the only law
that I have not changed is that of slavery, which I have
sanctioned, and proclaimed shall remain as heretofore.
Caronde will claim thy mistress, she said, coolly.
He hath a restless and vengeful spirit, and will give
thee no rest, my lord!
Wherefore dost thou press this upon my ears,
woman? Hast thou a purpose in't?
His death!
she answered, fixing her eyes full
upon his.
Dost thou hate him?
He hath wronged me. Doth a woman ever
forgive
a wrong?
Wouldst thou have me slay him? This seemeth
to be what thou aimest at.
Thou nor Azlie may live while he lives.
Nay, if I slay him, men will call it fear of a rival.
Wilt thou brook that thy mistress should be
publicly
claimed by thy rival as his slave?
No, woman.
Then he who alone can claim her as such must
cease to live.
Thou hast deeply considered this matter. This
Caronde, then, shall die ere the morrow's sunset.
For this promise, see what I place in thy hands!
she said, with a smile of gratified revenge, taking from
her bosom a small casket, and delivering it to him.
What is this, signora? he asked, opening and
drawing from it a small roll of parehment, to which
was affixed the provincial seal.
It is the instrument of my manumission; a gift
from the Marquis of Caronde to me after the birth of
my son.
Wherefore do you now place it in my hands?
That the laws may not disturb your possession of
Azlie, whom this instrument makes your slave, and
that you may make use of it for your own ends if her
haughty spirit should rise superior to the condition to
which her birth has destined her.
Thou art a deep and subtle woman. Thy
sagacity
shall not go unrewarded. Slave! go to yonder
escritoir
,
and draw briefly after this model a bill of
manumission in the name of Signora Ninine. Thou
shalt have it as an evidence that thou thyself art free,
while this I retain, to attest, if need be, the bondage
of thy daughter to herself! he said to her, with a
smile of triumphant power.
The Ethiopian secretary soon completed the
instrument
he had been commanded to draw up, and Osma,
affixing to it his signature and seal of state, delivered
it to her. Azlie, the lovely victim of this diabolical
scheme, still slept, under the influence of the potion the
Count of Osma had sent to be administered to her,
unconscious
of the fate to which she had been consigned.
Now, my gentle Houri, said he, bending over her,
and feasting his eyes upon her beauty, as a miser
gazes
upon a newly-gotten treasure, thy charms shall
bloom in a palace, and for thy beauty I will return thee
honour. Sulem, the cloak!
Receiving a large mantle from his slave, and folding
it about her, he lifted her from the couch and placed
her in the Moor's arms.
Now, slave, see that thou bear her gently. If she
waken by thy roughness, thy head shall answer it.
Proceed! Signora, adiou!
Thus speaking, the licentious Spaniard, whom guilt
had sunk to such a level as companionship with this
wicked bondwoman, wrapped his cloak about him,
and followed the Moor through the dark avenues of
the garden towards the secret gate in the wall. As
he passed through it, he thought he saw the same
mysterious figure that had appeared at the window of
the boudoir, gliding across from one path to another;
but, after stopping a while and not seeing it again, he
fancied it was his own guilty imagination that offered
to his mind a picture which he was momentarily
dreading would appear openly to his vision.
By the private postern that communicated with the
banquet-room, the Moor re-entered the palace, closely
followed by his master, and bore his sleeping burden
without observation to a small but sumptuous
apartment
,
richly and luxuriously furnished, that opened
from the cabinet, and which, from appearances, had
been prepared expressly for her reception.
Place her upon that ottoman. Gently, slave.
Dost thou think thou art letting down a bale of goods?
he demanded, as they entered unobserved this room.
The Moor obeyed, and then, drawing back a few
paces, stood with his hands folded upon his breast.
The count softly removed the mantle that enveloped
her form, and dwelt upon the expressive face, to which
the motion had given a slight colour, adding to her
beauty. The position in which the slave placed her
was, unintentionally, most graceful. She still slept
profoundly, and with so faint a breathing that Osma,
after watching her a few moments, turned to the Moor,
and said with alarm,
She sleeps soundly, Sulem, and, methinks, full
long.
Lalla Azlie will wake when the nightingale first
sings to the moon.
When will that be, slave? the moon hath risen.
When the moon hath been an hour up, the bird
will sing her first song.
'Twill be three quarters of an hour yet. This
times with thy saying that her sleep would last but two
hours. If thou hast overdrugged the potion, thine own
cimeter shall serve to sever thy head from its
shoulders
.
Sulem hath skill, and fears not the result,
answered
the Ethiopian, with confidence.
Be it so, replied the count, with a menacing
doubt. Return with me into my cabinet. I will pass
the intervening hour in preparing despatches.
With these words, after gazing a moment upon her,
during which some painful memory, awakened by a
likeness, seemed to agitate him, he dropped the damask
hangings before the entrance of the boudoir in which
she reposed, and seated himself in his cabinet.
Drawing a sheet of paper before him, he seemed to
be concentrating his thoughts to fix them upon the
subject with which he was to fill it. But he had,
within
the few last days, passed through too many and
varied
scenes easily to command his ideas to flow into a
given current. The scenes he had been an actor in
rushed irresistibly and painfully upon his mind, and the
images of the murdered councillors, with the
contemplation
of his own conduct in the present affair, were
forced upon him by a conscience that seldom played
the monitor in his bosom. He could not conceal from
himself his deep criminality in every feature of the
proceedings, whether against the judges, Don
Henrique
,
or the lovely and innocent Azlie. The more
he reflected, the more bitter his censures against
himself
became; and when he thought of his own
beautiful
Estelle, whose image was mingled with that of
Azlie in his mind, he felt a shame and contrition that
promised repentance of his purpose. The innocence
and helplessness of Azlie pleaded loudly for her;
but that very loveliness, as well as her unprotected
state, were only stronger arguments to his passion.
Suddenly, too, the remembrance of her love for Don
Henrique rushed like a torrent upon his senses, and
filled him with resentment and vengeance against both.
This reflection extinguished all the emotions of human
tenderness and sympathy that had been kindled in his
bosom towards her, and inspired him with the
determination
to make her the victim, as well of his hatred to
Don Henrique and Renault as of his passion. Thus,
though pity and honour pleaded for her, hatred and
revenge pronounced her condemnation.
CHAPTER IX.
A VISIT TO THE DUNGEONS OF THE INQUISITION.
The
thought of Don Henrique seemed to inspire
the Count of Osma with some suddenly-conceived
resolution. He rose from his chair, and demanding
of Sulem a bunch of heavy iron keys that he carried
at his belt, bade him remain in the cabinet and guard
the fair sleeper. Then, with a dark lantern in his
hand, he left the room, and, going out into the marble
passage, followed it until he came to a low door,
scarcely visible within the panneling of the wall. This
he opened by touching a spring, and entered a
stairway
narrow and dark.
Guided by the rays of his lantern, he descended to
the bottom, and followed a winding, subterranean
passage
,
that led in the direction of the city prison. On
coming to its extremity, he opened with one of the
keys a massive oaken door, heavily secured by iron
bars and plates. It swung slowly on its hinges, and
admitted him into a sort of hall, damp and dark, which
was situated beneath the foundation of the prison. It
was octagonal in shape, and on four sides were as many
iron doors leading into cells. It was apparent that
the dungeons were no part of the prison above, and
that the only communication they had with upper earth
was by the subterranean avenue through which he had
come. He gazed about him upon the thick gloom,
which his lamp could scarcely illumine, with a smile of
malignancy.
This is a pleasant abode for a lover so lately
sighing
at the feet of his mistress. The Fathers of the
Inquisition are skilful in the construction of dungeons.
Methinks these were on a plan invented by the
archfiend
himself. How fearful and awful is the silence!
How oppressive the breathing! Yet Rascas must
have placed him deeper yet, for his instructions to me
were, on arriving at the octagonal hall, to seek a
trapdoor
and descend again! This assassin hath the
essence
of cruelty in him.
I
should have been content
to have placed him in one of these cells. If Rascas
means treachery by sending me lower, I am well in
his hands!
Satan seldom harms Satan, said the voice of the
assassin in his ear.
Osma's blood rushed icy cold to his heart, and he
started back several feet with undisguised alarm at
the sudden surprise in such a place.
Villain, is it thou? he demanded, instantly
recovering
himself.
I was sleeping on my pallet when you passed me
in the anteroom, and followed you lest you might not
find your prisoner, my lord, he said, unmoved.
Thou hast thrust him into a foul dungeon! Cruelty
hath no medium with thee, villain.
Thou gavest me my first lesson in it, signor, he
answered, ironically.
Thou art over free with thy speech, sirrah! Show
me to the dungeon!
Rascas lifted a trap-door in an angle of the vaulted
chamber, and there rushed upward a cold, dead
atmosphere
,
that chilled the tyrant to the heart. He at
first hesitated to descend; but, recovering his
resolution
,
bade Rascas go down before him, and then
followed
with cautious and suspicious steps. At the
bottom
of the stairs was a circular vault, with a low iron
door opening into an inner dungeon. To this door
Rascas applied one of the keys of the bunch held by
the count, and, swinging heavily on its hinges, it
exposed
within a cell about eight feet square, dimly
lighted
by an iron lamp suspended from the moist and
dripping roof. The sides, floor, and ceiling of this
horrid
dungeon were plated with iron, and its atmosphere
was like that of the charnel-house. At his first step
the foot of the count struck against something, the
hollow sound of which filled him with horror. He
Vol. II.K
glanced on the pavement at his feet, and beheld a scull,
and near it human bones fastened to chains bolted into
the iron sides of the dungeon. He felt that he was,
indeed, in the dungeons of the Inquisition, which had
early established its dread power in that province.
He saw before him the remains of victims of
ecclesiastical
cruelty. He was appalled, and would have
retreated
had he not already proceeded so far. Rascas
took the lantern from his hand, and, entering the cell,
approached an object lying in the corner. The lamp
showed it to be a man.
Is it he? asked the count, hoarsely.
Look for thyself, signor, answered the other,
putting
the lamp near his face.
It was Don Henrique. He was calmly sleeping
upon the iron floor, as if on the couch of ease in the
chamber of luxury. It was the repose of a good
conscience
;
the rest of innocence! The Count of Osma
had sought his dungeon to mock and exult over him;
to lacerate his soul with recounting his triumph; to
madden him, and then to destroy him! He expected
to find him insane with grief. To see him sleeping,
oblivious of all sorrow, was a dagger to his soul. He
envied him his repose. He gazed upon him with
surprise
and wonder; for he could neither appreciate nor
understand the virtue that o'ertops misfortune.
Rascas, thou rank villain, he said, shuddering,
and glancing around the place, when I commanded
thee to take him to prison, I did not bid thee place him
in a tomb. This cold damp will eat into my bones.
Ah! thou art speaking for thyself, signor, said
Rascas, with a sarcastic laugh; I did at first
imagine
thou wert feeling some compunction for thy rival.
Rival? Thou hast said the word! Ho, Signor Don
Henrique! thy sleep is sound, he cried, touching him
with his foot.
The sleeper started to his feet awake and conscious,
and, at a single glance, seemed to comprehend the
meaning of what he saw.
Tyrant and traitor, he cried, fixing his eyes upon
him with fiery scorn and contempt, dost thou come
hither to torment me with thy presence?
Nay, good signor, replied the Count of Osma, not
without embarrassment in his voice and bearing,
you do me wrong. I have sought thy prison to
restore
thee to light and freedom.
False knight, thou liest! Thou darest not,
after
this
, let me breathe the air of Heaven, or behold the
blessed light! My freedom were thy ruin, and thou
well knowest it. I am prepared to die.
I pray thee, signor, believe me. This moment
follow me, and each footstep thou takest shall lead thee
towards liberty.
Lead on, and we will see what comes of this
extraordinary
clemency, replied Don Henrique,
contemptuously
.
Ha! I had forgot that thou hadst
tethered me.
Rascas, hast thou put this chain to his feet?
demanded
Osma, sternly, yet secretly pleased at this
security
.
Unlock the chains instantly, sirrah. I pray
thee bear witness, signor, that this was not done by my
command.
He who hath placed me in prison hath heavier
guilt. Lead on!
Rascas, not without surprise at the count's command
to release his rival, freed him from his fetters; but,
from his knowledge of the total depravity of his
nature
,
he looked for a characteristic termination to his
clemency. Arriving at the upper dungeon, the count,
whispering to Rascas to guard vigilantly against the
escape of the prisoner, followed by him, led the way
along the subterraneous passage, and, ascending the
private staircase, regained his cabinet.
Now, Signor Don Henrique, he said, speaking in
a tone that made the young Spaniard's heart shrink
with an omen of mischief, if thou wouldst learn
wherefore I have sent for thee from prison, and
wherefore
I have kept thee there, follow me into this inner
room. Sulem! Rascas! why linger ye behind? he
demanded, at the same time, with a look bidding them
stand ready to seize upon the prisoner if he should
offer
to escape.
He then raised the drapery from before the entrance
to the inner chamber, and the unfortunate Don
Henrique
followed him into the apartment. The first
object
that met his eye was Azlie, lying in gentle sleep
upon the ottoman. He neither started nor spoke. He
seemed to be paralyzed by the sight. With a steady,
vacant, stony gaze, he stood on the spot in which he
had become arrested by the sight of her, like a statue.
Osma had his exulting eyes upon him from the moment
he entered, that he might enjoy his anguish, and triumph
in his misery! An effect so opposite to that he had
anticipated surprised and vexed him; he saw that the
shock had been too sudden; that, in trying to bring
about too much, he had effected nothing, and defeated
his own ends. It was too much for his victim's reason.
The miserable Henrique continued in this strange,
horrid state for a few minutes, then broke into a peal
of wild, nervous laughter, that terrified and appalled
each one present, and fell upon the floor insensible.
The Count of Osma felt that he had been most
signally
defeated in his unnatural scheme of cruelty; and,
turning away with a curse upon his lips, bade his
attendants
lift him up and bear him back to his dungeon.
He shall yet witness my triumph, and at a time
when he shall feel it, he said, half aloud. Bear
him hence.
In the fall Don Henrique struck his forehead against
the corner of the ottoman upon which Azlie slept,
and the blood, gushing freely from the wound, had the
effect of partially restoring him to his senses before
he was carried from the chamber. His eyes once
more fell upon the object of his devoted love, and,
breaking from the Moor, he was about to cast himself
upon her bosom, when, suddenly drawing back as if
he had been stung, he cried, bitterly,
No, no, it may not be! she
she is lost to me for
ever!
Fiend! that hast ruined so fair a temple
where art thou? he cried, looking wildly about him.
Here, signor! Dost thou not see how calmly she
sleeps? tauntingly said the Count of Osma,
re-entering
from the cabinet at his voice. Nay, thy
struggles
are vain! Thou wilt scarce break from the
slave. Be calm; she how sweetly she slumbers on my
couch! Such sleep could only follow a willingness to
become a captive. There is no starting from fear!
no sighing! Do you see tears on her cheek? is the
cheek itself pale? is there sorrow in the face? Her
continued and quiet reposedoes it not show she feels
that she slumbers securely?
Demon! thou hast had thy triumph! Lead me
back to my cell, and send to me thy executioner, he
answered, with the deepest despair and wo the human
heart is capable of bearing without bursting.
So thou feelest it! I am glad of it. Thou
shouldst thank me for giving thee a sight of the object
of thy love ere death shut her out from thee for ever!
Nay, I see thou art impatient. Rascas! lead the
prisoner to his cell. Away with him! In this
matter
,
signor, he added, as the young man was carried
past him, I repay, not only thy rivalry, but certain
passages of scorn and contempt from thee to me both in
Spain and the Havanna. I have ever hated thee; and,
now that secrets will be safe unless thou whisper them
into Death's ear, I tell thee it is for thy virtues and thy
ever-wakeful suspicion of my guilty life that I hate
thee. Thou art a better man than I, and I love thee
not for it. I speak freely, meaning to pay thee no
flattery; for thou art as one already dead, and
therefore
am I careless of thy opinion.
Hast thou well weighed the consequences to
thyself
,
traitor, of my death? asked Don Henrique, with
a look of warning.
All men know, or, rather, believe that you fell on
the night of the occupation of the town sorely
wounded
,
and that you now lie at death's door from the hurt.
I have to-day taken care to circulate the rumour of
your probable death on account of it. To-morrow it
will be proclaimed, and your body laid in state with
public mourning. Think you Osma will be suspected
of striking the blow?
K 2
Thou hast well planned, said Henrique, unmoved.
Bid thy slaves lead on.
Nay, be not impatient. I shall address a letter of
commiseration to thy sire. He will feel that a great
responsibility is removed, and thank Heaven for taking
thee out of a world where thy continuance might be
productive of mischief, especially if thou wert to
marry
and beget sonsfor sons of younger sons are
Discord's
grandchildren.
Methinks, if my memory serves me, thou art a
younger son, Sir Count; and by some foul deed, that
hath rather been hinted at than spoken out, art now
the head of thy house!
Rascas cast a look of malicious pleasure at the
count, who was for an instant confused, and took one
or two turns across the apartment ere he replied, with
a dark and lowering countenance,
Thou hadst spoken thy death-warrant then, had I
not already consigned thee to death! Ay, signor,
I am a younger son! And if thou hadst had the bold
and ambitious hand of Garcia Ramarez, thou wouldst
now have been
Villain! silence! lead me to death. Why do ye
linger, slaves?
Wilt thou not take a parting look of the lady of
thy love? he asked, with a malicious smile.
Incarnate fiend! Hath hell disgorged its chief,
that I am thus tortured?
Thou dost think thy cup is full. It will hold one
drop more. Thou goest to prison and to death so
calmly, because thou believest she is lost to thee
through dishonour. Thou wouldst scarce go so
resignedly
if I told thee the victim hath not yet been
offered
up.
Monster, thou liest but to madden me, and
imbitter
death!
She is yet worthy, Don Henrique, of thy dying
prayers and holy love! I tell thee this, he continued,
with a smile of most triumphant malice, to sweeten
thy cup of death, Her sleep is artificial. Behold her
there! See her unprotected state! In the power of
thy rival! Worthy thee still, yet thou unable to
possess
her. Wilt thou die calmly
now?
Wilt thou
demand
to be led to thy execution? Signor Don
Henrique
,
this is the happiest moment of my life. Hadst
thou not rejected the offer of my daughter to thee in
marriage, I had been less bitter with thee.
Don Henrique struggled between the Moor and
Rascas
,
desperate with this moral torture he was doomed
to endure, and in vain striving to reach his tormentor.
But the ever-ready stiletto of Rascas was suspended
above his bosom, and the iron grasp of the slave was
irresistible. Osma enjoyed for a moment his misery,
and bade them drag him away.
Shall I do it now? asked Rascas, looking back at
his master, and then directing his glance significantly
to his stiletto.
Not to-day; I am not ready. Leave him in his
dungeon. I would have him live to think. It were
mercy, Rascas, to slay him now.
The assassin returned him a satanic leer; and,
assisting
the silent and sullen Moor, dragged, rather than
conducted, the wretched young man forth from the
cabinet.
Such was the present triumph of guilt over virtue;
the power of wickedness, and the fulness of revenge!
Alas! what will limit the iniquity of a man's heart
when he flings the rein to his passions, and rides
whither they will! Who hath not reason to rejoice
in an overruling Providence, that wisely governs and
directs the human will, and mercifully confines it
within
fixed bounds; to be grateful that God, and not man,
is the governor of the earth; that he alone disposes
all events; and that nothing is done without His
permission
,
who at a glance beholds both the causes and
effects of all things.
Such were the reflections of Don Henrique after he
was again left alone in his dungeon; and, though
human
feelings bore his heart down to the ground, he
sought to lift his soul heavenward on the wings of
faith, and, with Christian philosophy, bear his grief as
coming from a higher power than that of the guilty
instrument
that immediately caused it, and therefore
requiring
his resignation and uncomplaining submission.
CHAPTER X.
THE PARAMOUR AND THE VICTIM.
Different
, indeed, were the reflections of the Count
of Osma from those of Don Henrique. His sensations
on the departure of his victim were those of
gratification
and sated cruelty. He contemplated the misery he
had caused with exquisite sensations of pleasure.
I would save him if I now dared, he at length said,
after thinking over all that had just transpired; but I
have gone too far. My safety is secured only in his
death. Yet I would save him in that I like not to
answer
for the blood that flows in veins like his. But he
hath ever been an eyesore to me; I could never meet
his clear, quiet eye that it did not seem to be reading
my soul. This Rascas will do the deed, and the wound
may be shown as that received in the affray. He
must
die, for his injuries may not be expiated save by laying
my own head upon the block. It were a pity he should
die for such slight offences; but I have gone too far to
hope he will pardon and forget should I permit him to
live. Were he other than he is, he should live; but
now his life must save mine. Ha, my child! I have
seen but little of you since yesternight. Wherefore do
you visit me now?
His manner was impatient, and his voice angry as
he spoke, for the time of Azlie's waking was at hand,
and he was about to enter her apartment when Estelle
appeared. She was pale and serious, and filial love
struggled in her countenance with reproof and fear.
She approached, and, kneeling silently at his feet,
kissed
his hand. He felt a tear fall upon it as she did so,
and, raising her to his breast, tenderly embraced her,
while, with a smile of affectionate fondness, he said,
What has disturbed thee, Lil?
A dream, as I fell asleep over my missal; and,
waking
with terror, I came to see that you lived.
Prithee what was thy affrighting dream? he
asked
,
playfully, though not without a slight feeling of
superstition
;
when I was in Morocco I learned the art
of interpreting dreams. Tell it me.
Nay, now that you are here by me and in safety,
'tis nothing. Yet it deeply impresses me.
The dreamout with it! he exclaimed, ill
concealing
the feverish interest he took in learning it.
It wasforgive me, sirbut I dreamed, she said,
with a shudder, hiding her face, that I saw thee
beheaded
on the king's scaffold, and that the young king
and his whole court were present to witness thy
ignominious
death! Thy head rolled from the platform to
my feet, and I awoke with horror! Nay, look not so
fearful, sir; 'twas but a dream! I have let it weigh
upon my spirits foolishly. It has given thee pain, my
father.
A young king, said you? he said, placing his eyes
upon her with searching and anxious inquiry.
A young king; but not the Infante Don Carlos.
I thought his face resembled
Whose? Speak quickly.
The young cavalier, Don Henrique.
Ha, ha, ha! Then is the dream false! he cried,
with a wild, hollow-sounding laugh, while his
countenance
lighted up with malign satisfaction. Go to,
child; if such be thy dreams, dream on. Thou wilt
scarce do harm by them. Wilt thou to thy chamber
now? I have business, and would be alone. There is
a kiss for thy dream. I pray thee bring me a
pleasanter
one to-morrow. Why do you linger, child? There
is a question on thy tongue.
Estelle hesitated; but, seeing her father's
impatience
,
with blushing embarrassment said, Have they
taken the president of the council, sir? But her
manner
showed that more was hidden beneath her
question
than she would have known.
He hath escaped, and this rebel Renault as yet.
A price is upon their heads, and they will soon be
captured
.
I thank thee, Heaven, she said, impulsively, as if
relieved of doubt and fear.
This shows thy loyalty, girl, he said,
approvingly
,
referring her ejaculation to the last clause of his
speech. This
courreur chef
is a lion in my path.
Nothing but the loss of his head will restore peace to
the province. He is already plotting and conspiring
against the state. He hath the talent, genius, and
military skill in him of another Frederic of Prussia.
Go to thy chamber, he added, quickly, his ready ear
detecting a slight noise within the boudoir. At the
same instant a nightingale from the palace gardens
broke forth into a strain of ravishing song.
Estelle listened an instant to the melody, and then,
unsuspicious, obeyed him.
With her heart dwelling upon Renault, whose
unintentional
praises from her father's lips filled her with
pride and pleasure, and whose image she had fondly
cherished with all the devotion of first love, she sought
her chamber, from which her startling dream had
driven her to seek her father. To learn the fate of
Renault, for which she trembled on hearing the
condemnation
and execution of the councillors (by the
cabildo, as it was told her), was also a motive, and a
very strong one, that had induced her to leave her
room and go to his cabinet.
At the moment the nightingale broke the silence of
night by his shrilling notes, Azlie opened her eyes,
wholly free from sleep or drowsiness, and with all her
faculties at command. Her first sensation was that
of delicious refreshment. She lightly bounded to her
feet as if she had awakened in her own chamber, and,
catching a note of the bird's song as she rose, warbled
along with him, scarcely less sweetly than himself, for
a moment as happy-hearted and cheerful as if oblivion
of past sorrow had been mingled with the Moor's
sleeping-draught. All at once the consciousness that
she was not in her own room struck her. There
seemed to be the same rich drapery and costly
furniture
the
same ottomans and tablesfor Osma had
taken her chamber as a pattern for this, the better to
content her with her imprisonment; but the apartment
was larger than her own, and the little altar, with its
silver lamp upon it, was not there. The clock of the
Cathedral at the same instant tolled eight, so loud and
near, that the dreadful suspicion which began to enter
her mind, that she was in the tyrant Osma's palace, to
which the Cathedral adjoined, nearly overpowered her.
With a low, sharp cry of apprehension, she flew to the
only window, and a single glance out upon the Place
d'Armes before it confirmed her worst fears. Her
situation
and peril were instantly comprehended in their
full extent.
Now Heaven in mercy aid me! she cried,
clasping
her hands and lifting up her eyes in tears to the
Protector of the innocent, as, after a single trial, she
found that the barricaded window mocked her feeble
strength.
With the peril, her spirit and courage seemed to rise
to meet it. She felt within her vesture for the stiletto
she had carried there since she had become the victim
of lawless persecution, and, with an exclamation of joy,
laid her hand upon it. Now hath Heaven answered
my prayer! she said, as she loosened it in her girdle,
so that it would come freely at the touch.
Her eye, searching for an avenue of escape, now fell
upon the curtain that was drawn across the entrance
communicating with the governor's cabinet. She flew
across the apartment, and was drawing it aside, when
she heard a footstep close without. She started back
with terror, and the next instant the Count of Osma
was in her presence. Startled, but not surprised, to
see her in this attitude, he would have approached her
with a smile, and soothing language upon his tongue.
But she no sooner beheld him advancing than she
retreated
to the casement, saying, in a firm and
collected
tone,
Stand there, my lord! Approach me a step
nearer
,
and thou wilt embrace a corpse for thy mistress.
He gazed upon her spirited attitude, her dilated eye,
and resolute mouth, as she stood before him with
heightened beauty, and hesitated.
Nay, gentle Azlie, this loveliness was not
bestowed
upon thee for this! This haughty and indignant
bearing truly becometh thee; but a lover liketh best
to see his mistress tender and submissive. Prithee!
now thou hast displayed thy spirit, drop that lofty look,
and let me lay my deep and devoted passion at thy
feet!
My Lord of Osma, this language ill becometh the
lips of a parent, and the father of a daughter who hath
the years of womanhood!
Words from lips so sweet can ne'er be bitter,
lovely quadroone. The more thou speakest against
me, the more thy prettily-moving lips and flashing eyes
will fire my passion. Thine own weapons thy beauty
will arm against thee.
Hoary mocker! Thy speech ill suits gray locks
and dignity like thine. Remember thou art a knight
and a noble of Spaingovernor of this provincea
chief of an army! while I am a maiden of an outcast
racethe child of bondage and infamy. I pray thee,
by thy honour, tarnish not thy name, rank, and station,
by the thought that is in thy bosom!
He listened to her eloquent appeal to his feelings,
but, save that her inspired beauty increased his desire
to become its possessor, it had no effect upon him.
She saw the nature of the impression she had made,
and, as he advanced a step towards her, once more
commanded him back in a tone that he instinctively
obeyed.
Will nothing turn thee from thy purpose but the
destruction of the victim of thy guilty passion? How
will it sound in the halls of thy master's palace, that
Count Garcia of Osma hath sold his honour for the
love of a quadroone maid? hath dishonoured his gray
hairs, and brought infamy upon his child? How will
the proud Count of Osma love to hear his name
coupled in a ballad with that of a slave, and sung at
the street corners? Shame on thee, knight! Dismiss
this passion, which can only end in thy disgrace and
the tragic death of its object!
Maiden, thy scornful speech hath not the power
over me that thy beauty hath. Did it fall from lips
less sweet, I might listen to it. A curse from thy
mouth were turned into a blessing, through the
richness
of the voice that conveyed it, he said, with a free
gallantry and warmth of admiration that terrified her;
while he made a step towards her as if he would
terminate
a scene, of the continuance of which he had
already become impatient.
Nay, my lord, she cried, in a voice so solemn and
imploring in its eloquence, and in tones so full of
pathos
and entreaty, that he paused and listened without
power to move; nay, nay, my Lord of Osma, if
there is no appeal to thy pride! none to thy honour
none to thy shame, let me plead to thy heart!
Heaven
surely hath given thee human emotions: a heart to
feela bosom to be touched with sorrow! I implore
thee by thy humanityby thy hopes of a blessed
immortality
by
thy fear of judgment and dread of final
retribution, to depart from me, and let me go free and
innocent! By thy daughter's love to theeby her
beautyby her virgin innocence, spare me! Drive
me not to self-murder; for never shalt thou lay thy
touch upon me living!
As she spoke she drew her dagger from her bosom.
Dost thou mean to do this, indeed, maiden? he
demanded, with surprise and alarm, for the first time
really believing that she would lay hands upon herself,
and fearing that thus she might escape him.
The grave were preferable to thy licentious love,
and death shall stand between me and dishonour!
Vol. II.L
Dishonour! A quadroone speak of dishonour!
Thy beauty hath maddened thee, girl. What love so
high as that I proffer thee wilt thou find? Not a
maiden
of thy race that would not esteem it her highest
honour to be elevated to the station thou scornest.
Thou hast played thy part well, and I give thee credit
for it; now thou must end it. This boudoir is to be
thy prison till thou art tamed; so thou wouldst best
suffer thyself to be caught, pretty bird; for escape,
there is none for thee. He advanced towards her as
he spoke.
Iron bars and locks cannot hold the released spirit,
tyrant! she cried, elevating her dagger, and
deliberately
aiming it at her breast.
Anticipating her intention from the enthusiasm of
her voice, and the uplifted, prayerful eye, he sprang
forward, and caught in his sleeve, in its descent, the
glittering steel. With the other hand he was about to
grasp her by the arm, when, uttering a cry of despair,
she bounded away from him, and, reaching the curtain,
fled through the door into the cabinet. Glancing
around her with the rapid, searching gaze of a hunted
doe, she discovered the only door that led from it. It
was shut, but instantly yielded to her hand, and she
darted through it, as Osma, burning with his
discomfiture
,
entered the cabinet in pursuit, with the naked
stiletto held menacingly in his grasp. Without
looking
behind, she fled through the anteroom, and, not
observing
that it contained a tall, shrouded figure,
reached
the marble passage.
Here, for an instant, she hesitated which way to fly;
but her pursuer's voice, calling upon her to arrest her
flight, gave her wings, and she took the way to the left,
in the direction of a faint light shining into the passage
from one of the state apartments that opened upon it.
This light held out to her hopes of escape through the
presence of others, and, running forward with
breathless
speed, she reached the half-open door as the Count
of Osma appeared behind her in the passage.
Without
a moment's hesitation, she sought refuge through
this door, and found herself in a small antechamber,
where two or three female slaves were sleeping upon
mats. A door was on the opposite side ajar, which
she flung open and bounded through. Before she was
aware, she found herself in a softly-lighted chamber,
where, by an open lattice, sat a youthful maiden with
a lute in her hand, discoursing most sweet and
plaintive
music, while the cool wind just stirred her golden
hair. Azlie half arrested her flight at her presence,
uttered a cry of wild joy, and cast herself imploringly
at her feet.
Save me, save me!
Estelle started with surprise and wonder at the
beautiful
vision that had so suddenly appeared before her;
but, ere her astonishment would permit her to inquire
her danger, and ensure her the protection she sought,
her father entered the chamber in pursuit. His
presence
and bearing, as well as her knowledge of his
character, explained to her all that she would have
asked. She instantly threw her arms about the lovely
fugitive, and, warmly embracing her, said, in a low
voice,
Fear not! the presence of the daughter shall
shield thee!
Then, starting to her feet, she cried, while her whole
person seemed instinct with the insult and dishonour
she felt she had received at her father's hands, Stand
there, sir! This is holy ground! Innocence hath
sought this altar, and the foot of the spoiler shall not
desecrate it. Leave me, sir!
Her eyes seemed bursting with the tears her
indignation
would not let her shed, while shame and bitter
grief swelled her heart to breaking. She stood
before
him like an angel reproving a demon. Her guilty
parent bent his head at her reproof, though his wrath
kindled fiercely against her; while Azlie, glancing
with a fearful eye from father to daughter, still knelt,
clinging to the robes of the maiden, and looking as
if her soul hung upon the words of her lips. After
surveying them both with feelings of mingled shame
and disappointment, he cried, in an authoritative tone
of voice,
To thy bed, girl! This is no matter for thy
interference
.
When a father's honour is endangered, and the
blush is brought into the daughter's cheek, love and
duty command her intervention. Sir, thou hast
forgotten
thyself! This trembling child shall find a
protector
in me, and Heaven will forgive this rebellion
against thy will. Go, sir, and forget thy intended
wrong. By my filial love, sir, it shall never, by word
or look, be brought again to thy remembrance. This
gentle fugitive will also forgive thee; and, save in the
condemning censure of thy own breast, the past will
be as if it had never transpired.
The passions of the Count of Osma were too
deeply
seated to be moved by this filial appeal; and, much
as he loved his child, and now admired her
forbearance
on such an occasion, he could not forgive her the
disappointment nor this unpleasant exposure. He
therefore, with reckless hardihood of manner, that
showed he was not to be turned aside by any moral
means from his purpose, answered,
Since my accursed fortune has brought this thing
before thee, girl, I shall not mince matters either with
thyself or her. I am thy father, and my actions are
not to be submitted to thy scrutiny. I alone am
accountable
for them. As you suspect, this young
woman
is the object of my passion.
A passion that a daughter should never hear
named by a father's lips, said Estelle, indignantly.
Would you have me degrade honourable love,
wench, by placing it upon a quadroone? Wouldst
thou have a slave for thy stepdame?
A quadroone! repeated the maiden, looking with
surprise upon the dark, intelligent beauty of the young
girl at her feet; a quadroone, my father!
A daughter of the race of Ham. I will wed her
if thou wilt, he said, ironically.
If she then be of that race of which rumour hath
talked so much, then is thy crime the greater! Oh,
my father, how art thou fallen! How hath the glory
of the house of Osma become dim!
A greater crime, girl, dost thou call it? In her
case there can be none. Is the Sultan of Orient
guilty of crime for filling his harem with the houris
of Circassia? This is the destiny of the females of
that land, and such is their only wedlock. And is
there dishonour to them in it? Ask the Circassian
maid if she feels herself wronged in being taken from
her mother's roof to become the favourite of the
sultan
?
Will she answer yes? So it is with the race
of quadroones. Their destiny is the same with the
maiden's of the East, and they would laugh at thee,
child, if thou shouldst ask them if they were degraded
by the fulfilment of a fate which they have ever been
taught to be the summit of happiness.
If such be this trembling maiden's feelings, why
is she now a suppliant at my feet, sir?
She hath a passion for another, and hath taken
some high notions that her surpassing beauty is worthy
the recompense of marriage.
And
thou
, sir, thou wouldst break her heart by
tearing her from its hope, and destroy the virtue that
hath elevated her above her race. Shame and
dishonour
upon thee, my father! Oh, that I had been
spared this degradation. I could sink into the earth
with the burning shame that weighs upon my heart.
I know not, indeed I know not, whether to hate thee,
scorn thee, curse thee, or throw myself at thy feet,
and with streaming tears implore thee to come to thy
right mind, and forget as I will forgive.
My purpose hath gone too far: concealment is
now vain: the first emotion of shame hath passed by,
and I will not now be defeated in my object.
He made a step towards his victim as he spoke, as
if he was about to seize upon and bear her off.
Thy daughter first! she cried, placing her
person
between that of Azlie and his approach.
Wilt thou proteot my slave? She is my slave!
L 2
'Tis false, cried Azlie.
Thy mother hath surrendered to me her papers of
manumission.
Then death must free me.
Fear not, said Estelle, resolutely.
Nay, Estelle, wilt thou beard thy father!
Father! Darest thou remember that thou art a
father? she cried, with the accent of keen reproof.
Thou shalt remember it to thy wo in a cell, a
score of fathoms under ground, if thou thwart me,
girl, he cried, with the desperate recklessness of a
man bent on doing the evil that he contemplates,
having
now thrown aside all shame and remorse, all
paternal
delicacy and self-respect.
He laid one hand rudely upon her as he spoke, and
with the other was dragging Azlie away from her,
when he felt a hand upon his throat like a grasp of
iron. His hold upon the maiden convulsively relaxed,
and he sunk upon one knee, his eyes forced from their
sockets, and his whole frame nearly powerless. At
the same instant Renault flew past him, and Azlie,
with a cry of joy, was clasped to his heart. The hold
upon the count's throat was now released; the
sorceress
stood before him, and fixed upon his face eyes of
deadly malignity and triumph! He stared upon her
with terror, and, recovering with an effort the use of
his speech, said, with tones in which superstitious
fear had taken place of every other feeling,
Fearful being! Dost thou appear again to
torment
me? This is not the day thou didst appoint to
meet me. What evil cometh of thy presence now?
Wo to thee and joy to others, man of iniquity and
blood! is ever where I come, she said, in a solemn
voice; I did hope that thou wouldst have let me
remain
out of thy sight until the day I promised thou
shouldst see me again. But thy sins come fast and
sudden, and it becomes me to watch lest thou do more
than I would have thee, Beware! This is the
second
time of my coming. The third shall be the day
of thy doom.
CHAPTER IX.
SCENE BETWEEN RENAULT AND OSMA.
Thus
speaking, the sorceress strode from him, and,
kneeling reverently, kissed the hand of Azlie. Then,
gazing into her eyes with singular tenderness, she
unobserved
slipped a small locket into her hand, and, with
a pressure of silence and secrecy, rose, and at a slow
pace, with her eyes fixed menacingly upon those of the
count, stalked from the chamber. He followed her
with his glance until she had disappeared, when the
spell under which he had been bound was suddenly
broken.
Ho, my guards! Sulem! Rascas! Traitors
and treason! Ho, without! he shouted, drawing his
sword and rushing on Renault, who still held his
sister
clasped in his arms. The young
courreur chef
immediately
released her and drew his sword.
Thou needst not call thy guards, my Lord of
Osma
,
he said, catching the count's sword on his own
blade.
Traitor, hast thou made me prisoner in my own
palace? he cried, turning pale.
Thou art free, and thy satellites are at the gate;
but
Yonder fearful woman, hath she done it? he
asked
,
dropping the point of his sword.
I know not what she may have done, Signor
Governor
,
he said, smiling at his fears; but this I know,
your guard did just now freely admit me and herself
without question.
Dost thou know thy head hath a price upon it?
I do, your excellency, he answered, calmly.
And that thou art under condemnation of death,
with the rebellious president of the provincial council?
I have heard this too; but Heaven hath taken the
venerable councillor from the power of thy bloody
hand.
Methinks thou art fearless to use such speech, as
well as to stand thus alone in the palace of thy foe.
Dost thou not fear my power and vengeance?
I? No, no; I have found Azlie safe; she has
told me she has escaped thy lust, and I have no other
fear
now!
he said, with a haughty smile, embracing
the lovely girl, who continued from the first to hide
her head trustingly in his bosom.
Osma surveyed his bold and ingenuous countenance
for a few moments, as if undecided what face to put
upon the affair. At length he addressed him with a
totally changed bearing, caused by certain motives
which it would be difficult, in such a man, accurately
to determine.
I have had wrong at thy hands, he said, and
yet am disposed to pardon it. Thou knowest that the
councillors thou didst release were condemned in fair
trial by the tribunal of the cabildo?
I did hear so, my lord, said Renault, with a
sarcastic
smile.
Therefore, continued Osma, without noticing,
though keenly feeling it, thou seest thou didst do
me wrong in that matter. As governor of a
newly-acquired
province, believe me, I seek to make peace
and render justice.
Is it justice to steal a sister from a brother's roof?
Is it justice to ruin innocence? Is it justice to wrong
the unprotected? If it is thy desire to protect thy new
subjects, why is thy first act of power exercised in
wronging the defenceless?
There need be but few words between us,
answered
Osma, with singular patience; the destiny of
quadroone
maidens I need not remind thee of. I did but
seek to elevate thy sister to
A couch of dishonour, signor!
Was it ever called so before with a maiden of thy
blood?
Thou hast reason for thy interrogation, signor;
few of the daughters of our race do indeed feel their
degradation.
It is, therefore, to them none.
If, then, their
not
feeling it is an evidence of their
degradation, how much deeper must be their
degradation
when they do feel it! and who would consign one
such to a fate so dishonourable?
Yet by your own laws this sense of virtue may not
have its reward in marriage. It were better it were
corrected in them than suffered to beget misery.
This may be thy notion of virtue, Sir Count, but
not mine. Heaven hath given my sister a virtuous
and noble nature; and, as long as she has a brother to
protect her honour, she shall be no man's leman,
answered
Renault, with indignant animation.
Dost thou reverence the laws of thy province,
Signor
Renault? asked the count, suddenly, and
evidently
with some significant purpose couched under his
question.
I do, signorall, at least, that thy clemency has
spared.
Is there not a law that gives to the owner of a
slave the right of property in that slave?
It is a law well known, signor.
Oh, Renault, protect me, or I am lost, cried
Azlie
,
clinging to him, at these words of the count, with
wild alarm.
Thou shalt come to no harm, firmly said Estelle,
who, during the whole scene, had stood beside her with
one hand clasping hers, ready to interpose her person
bteween her father's sword and the life of Renault, who,
with pain and bitterness, she now, for the first time,
learned was descended of a race slavish and degraded.
Fear not; I will share thy fate, whatever it be, she
whispered. Renault heard her, and fixed upon her a
look of gratitude.
This statute also decrees that the offspring of a
slave-mother shall be the property of the owner of the
mother. Is it not so? he continued, with that tone of
malicious meaning that already had aroused the
suspicions
of Renault.
Such is the law, signor, he said, with
embarrassment
;
for he felt assured that the count meant in some
way to judge him by his words.
Then, as thou dost reverence the laws, thou wilt
scarce withhold the master from his slave, he said,
all the gathering and concentrated cruelty of his
nature
suddenly expressing itself in his dark countenance.
How mean you, Sir Count? demanded Renault,
with a quick rush of hot blood to the brain.
That thou and thy sister are my slaves!
Ha! exclaimed the young quadroon, with a start
of surprise and inquiry, holding Azlie yet closer to
his heart, while, with his drawn sword in his hand, he
stood as if to protect her.
Thy mother and thy mother's offspring are my
bond-slaves. Dost thou weigh well the word?
Slaves!
I demand the proof? said Renault, after a
moment's
suffocating pause, under this bold and confident
assertion of his foe.
'Tis easy given. Thy mother was a Moorish
slave, and your late governor, the Marquis of Caronde,
became the purchaser, and, after, manumitted her.
Well, cried Estelle, who listened with feverish
eagerness, while Renault stood surveying the
governor
with a contemptuous look, that told his fearless
soul laughed at his power, and scorned his base resort
to establish it over Azlie.
The laws that this youth so much reverence
require
that there should be a record of this
manumission
made in the public registry, or that the original
instrument should be there deposited. She is
therefore
a slave. Is not this the spirit of thy law?
Thou hast well interpreted it, Sir Count,
answered
Renault, while both Estelle and Azlie turned
pale with apprehension; but thou hast not yet
exhibited
proofs of thy title to the slaves thou wouldst
claim. The young Marquis of Caronde, my brother,
hath already advanced this claim, and that, too, for the
same criminal end, he added, sternly.
His claim is based only on the non-existence of
the bill of manumission. No such having been
registered
or deposited in the provincial archives, he
believes
none exists, and so claims thy lovely sister as
his slave.
Thou hast well informed thyself on this matter,
signor, said Renault, his scornful smile scarcely
concealing
the filial affection in his eyes.
There is a rich treasure pending on it, answered
Osma, glancing at Azlie with a look that caused
Renault
to grasp more nervously the hilt of his sword;
now know that that bill of manumission exists, and
was in thy mother's possession until this evening. It
is now in
mine!
he cried, with savage exultation,
drawing from his bosom and holding out to view the
parchment he had received from the quadroone-mother
as the price of the young
chasseur
chief's death.
Azlie hid her face in her hands, and her young
bosom heaved as if the heart were bursting through;
but there was no shriek, no cry! her wo was
without
speechtoo deep for language.
Nay, nay, sweetest, this shall not come upon thee
it shall not!
said Renault, soothingly.
Estelle looked upon her father with a face in the
expression
of which was mingled wonder and disgust,
scorn and grief. But there was no fear, no terror
there! Her eyes shot like lightning; her lips seemed
on fire with the words that rushed to them, but could
not escape; her whole frame was pulsating with the
emotion that threatened to rend it. Thrice she
essayed
to give utterance to her feelings; to pour upon
her father's head curses, and tears, and infamy. Her
utterance totally failed her; and thus she stood,
leaning
slightly forward towards him, looking to him so
fearful, so awful! as if Heaven had written its own
judgment upon her forehead, touched her lips with the
burning coal of indignant justice, and lighted in her
eyes the intense fires of its consuming vengeance.
He gazed upon her with fear and trembling. The
parchment dropped from his hands; and, involuntarily
stretching forth his arms towards her, with a look so
humble, so remorseful, that, overcome at seeing him,
whom, notwithstanding his errors, she loved with
singular
attachment, becoming a supplicant to her, she
suddenly cried out, Oh, my father! Heaven, not thy
child, should judge thee; and, running forward and
throwing herself upon his neck, she burst into tears.
What a wonderful thing is human nature! How
mysterious the workings of the heart! It is a
compass
with a thousand needles, and no fixed polar point.
It will never do to steer by while affection applies the
magnet; for, to which ever side it is offered, there
gather the needles of its thousand feelings, and she
magnetizes all! Estelle believed her father's conduct
had hardened her heart against him for ever. She
had desired to love him no more. But she knew not
the strength of natural affection, and that the chords
that bind the heart of a child to a parent are hardly
severed. She wept a moment on his shoulder, and he
smiled inwardly at the victory he had achieved; so
sudden was the transition on his part from the feelings
that had produced this change in her to triumph. He
now felt, because he knew not that the existence of
filial love did not necessarily involve approbation of
parental guilt, that he had gained her to his views, or,
at the least, that she would oppose him no farther. He
released her from his embrace with a kiss, and stooped
to pick up the parchment, of which Renault had not
made a motion to possess himself. Estelle thought
her father was changed in his purpose, and,
approaching
Renault, said quickly,
I pray thee, signor, depart now with thy gentle
sister. In quieter times I will seek her friendship.
Sweet lady, said Renault, I feel my sister will
ever find in thee both a protector and a friend. My
Lord Count, is it thy pleasure I should depart with my
sister? he said, fixing his doubtful gaze on the
governor
,
who had heard his daughter's words.
This parchment makes me the holder of both your
destinies, he said, with the look of a man who loves
cruelty for itself, and felt that the exercise of it was
now in his power; you are my slaves, and will
henceforward be at the pleasure of my will.
The possession of that parchment, Sir Count, can
give you no right over our liberties.
Thy mother hath conveyed it to me. While she
held it, her liberty, with thine also, was vested in
herself
.
She had the power to retain or transfer it. She
has transferred it to me. It being in my hands is
therefore evidence that I hold the power to establish
your freedom by placing it in the archives, or
perpetuate
your bondage by destroying it.
In that case I should be under bondage, not to thee,
but to Jules Caronde, he answered, with firmness.
But if this Jules Caronde hath ceased to live?
asked Osma, with a look of exultation he scarcely
strove to conceal.
Then God, not thyself, tyrant, shall be our
master
,
answered Renault, feeling now assured that the
fate of his sister was sealed, and that there was no
escape
for her but through his own daring.
Then call upon Heaven to aid thee! shouted Osma,
in a fierce tone, attacking him with his sword with a
degree of fury that exposed Renault to imminent death,
trammelled as he was by the embracing arms of his
sister.
He nevertheless parried several blows with
extraordinary
skill and self-possession, and kept him at bay
till Estelle, springing forward, caught her father's
sword-arm, and clung to it, so that he was unable to
use it, and in the act exposed his bosom to the point of
Renault's blade. But he forbore, for the sake of her
who had found such favour in his heart, to take
advantage
of his adversary, and turned the point of his
weapon
to the ground. At this instant, drawn thither by
the clash of steel, Rascas made his appearance.
Where hast thou been, villain, when thy presence
was worth thy foul life? demanded Osma, flinging
his daughter from him.
M
Giving the last holy consolation to thy prisoner,
he said, with a laugh that chilled the current in the
veins of Estelle, whose eyes were fixed upon him with
inquiring surprise as he entered.
Hast thou dared to
Nay, signor, he is well as yet. I have been but
comforting him with a picture of the pleasantness of
death when it is given by a true and steady hand, the
steel being sharp and three-edged. I did comfort him
with the thought that he would have an executioner
that knew his art, and could hit the large artery of a
man's heart in the dark.
Thou art a demon! Wherefore lingers the Moor?
He left me in the upper dungeon to return to thee.
Methinks I heard steel ringing. Shall I strike him
down for thee? he asked, waving the stiletto slowly
before his eyes, as if measuring the distance he should
leap to reach the heart of the young quadroon, plainly
understanding the whole scene.
Thou art too ready for blood, nor hast more
conscience
in shedding it than a wolf. Use thy weapon
only if he resists. Slave, added the count, sternly,
addressing Renault, deliver up thy weapon and
submit
.
Thou seest odds are against thee.
Were the whole phalanx of thy myrmidons drawn
up to oppose me, they should not stay my path, he
cried. Then looking fervently upward and saying,
Protector of the innocent, nerve my arm! he clasped
Azlie in one arm, waved his sword in a wide sweep
above his head, and shouting, in a loud voice,
Stand
aside!
bounded with her towards the door.
Before the count or the assassin could recover from
their surprise, he was through it, and flying along the
passage towards the banquet-room. Estelle caught
her father by the neck to prevent him from pursuing
them; but he cast her violently to the floor and flew
after them, preceded already by Rascas with his
uplifted
dagger.
Harm not the maiden, but strike thy steel into the
slave's heart if thou reach him, he shouted, as Rascas,
almost at the same instant with the fugitives, passed
through the door of the inner banquet-chamber.
Renault cleared this room at a bound, and placed his
hand upon the spring of the private postern. It
refused
to yield to his touch, for Osma had that morning
replaced it by another, the secret of which was known
only to himself. He uttered a cry of despair, not for
his own danger, but, alas! for that of one dearer to
him than his own life. He turned round just in time
to shiver in pieces the stiletto which was impetuously,
and with deadly aim, levelled at his heart, and with the
same thrust buried his sword to the hilt in the body of
Rascas. With an execration in language most fearful
and appalling, the assassin staggered backward and
fell at the feet of his master.
What hast thou done, slave? demanded Osma,
appalled at seeing this.
Rid the world of a monster, answered Renault,
menacing his surviving pursuer with his reeking sword.
Approach thou another step, and even thy daughter,
whose shrieks now ring through the palace, shall not
save thee. I am a desperate man, Sir Count, and
calm and collected as I am desperate. Beware how
thou bringest upon my head thy blood!
The Count of Osma stood before him trembling
with rage and vengeance, when the sound of advancing
feet, as of armed men hastening along the paved
passage
,
reached his ear. Renault also heard it, and,
bending his face over the colourless cheek of his sister,
he whispered a few words in her ear, to which she
replied
by a look of heavenly resignation, though with a
slight shudder in her whole frame. The sound
approached
,
and the next instant the entrance was filled
with men-at-arms, and Osma's features lighted up with
the most intense and savage joy. Pointing to Renault,
he cried,
Ye could come at the shrieks of a wench, but are
deaf to the voice of your chief. Seize him, and bind
him hand and foot! Slave! he added, triumphantly,
now is thy sister mine.
Tyrant, she is Heaven's! he answered, sublimely,
elevating his sword, and calmly directing the point of
it towards her bosom.
Hold, rash youth! cried a voice that made even
the soldiers give back, as they were advancing to obey
their chief.
It arrested his sword as it was suspended above her
heart. At the same instant the sorceress stood in the
midst.
Lay not thy hand upon her, Renault; she is under
Heaven's protection, and will come to no harm.
Then advancing through the men-at-arms, who gave
way before her, and putting authoritatively aside the
sacrificing weapon of the brother, she knelt and
kissed
reverently, as before, the hand of Azlie, who
suddenly
felt towards her a degree of confidence and
trust that she could not account for. The mysterious
woman then turned towards the Count of Osma, who,
though startled by her appearance, was much less
moved than he had been hitherto, and seemed to regard
her intrusion with impatience rather than personal
apprehension
.
She seemed not to notice this; but,
coming
near, and standing full before him, said, while her
glittering glance made his own menacing gaze quail,
Garcia of Osma, what wouldst thou, that I see
thee thus with a drawn sword in thy hand, lust and
anger in thine eyes, and vengeance, like a cloud,
darkening
thy brow! armed men at thy back, and a
wounded
man at thy feet?
Hence, woman! I defy thee. I know thee not.
Thou art an impostor, that by accident hath discovered
the key to my conscience, and hast used it for thine
own ends. Hence!
Thou
shalt never stand between
me and my pleasure. Depart in peace! Dare to
linger
here a moment longer, I will bid my soldiers seize
thee, and have thee burned at the stake.
Ha, ha! Garcia Ramarez! Thou fearest me not!
Thou knowest me not! Hast thou forgotten already
the evidences of the power I have over thy soul, shown
thee in thy tent?
Avaunt, fiend! he cried, the recollection
suddenly
returning upon him with painful horror.
Nay, I will show thee that I have still the bondage
of thy soul. Hear! Hast thou forgotten the name
of Zillah? or the olive bower of the private gardens
of Asmil?
Who art thou, in the name of all good and holy
spirits? he exclaimed, recoiling from her with
infinitely
more dread than he had yet exhibited in her
presence.
I am thy evil spirit, and the protector of the
maiden
thou pursuest with thy unholy passion. Know that
I have watched over her from the hour thou first
beheld
her; have been near her in her greatest peril; but
have permitted thee to do what thou hast hitherto done,
that thy condemnation may be the heavier. Thou
hast had no power to injure her, for my instant
presence
,
with the hold I have upon thy spirit, would ever
have struck thee powerless.
Wherefore, then, hast thou permitted her to be
pursued even to the death, if thou art what thou
sayest
?
Thy hand could not have stayed the dagger
that was directed by her own hand to her own heart!
Thy speech betrays itself.
That dagger is in thy own possession. Let me
see it! she asked, with a scornful smile.
She took from him the delicate weapon that he had
wrested from Azlie, and fearlessly struck it against
her own breast. She raised her hand again, and
showed the blade of the stiletto was sheathed in the
handle, and that the blow with it had been harmless.
How came she by that weapon? There never
was but one like that
And thou didst leave that one in the gardens of
Asmil! And I found it this evening upon her toilet
ere thou didst go to steal her away, and, loosening the
secret spring, replaced it.
She knew not of it, then?
No; but looked upon the false weapon as her
trusty friend. I foresaw what would follow! I knew
M 2
all thy plans! I was familiar with all the schemes of
thy soul! I saw you bear her away under the cover
of darkness, and knew the danger she would be
subject
to; yet left her not wholly to thy power. For I
did desire thee, for reasons thou wilt soon learn, to
carry out thy wickedness to its top vent, and also to
test her own virtue and resolution. It was for this I
left her to thee in this recent peril, having the power
to help and prevent. Now, Garcia of Osma, the time
approaches for thy judgment! Thy wickedness hath
nearly its fulness! The day, in hope for which I have
passed sleepless nights and weary days, lest mischief
should, meanwhile, befall this gentle maiden, is near at
hand.
What meanest thou? he asked, impressed by the
solemnity and warning tones of her voice.
On
that day
my meaning shall be written in thy
soul in letters of fire. Thou claimest this maiden?
she then said, quickly and abruptly; methinks thou
claimest this maiden as thy slave?
By the laws of the land she is my bondwoman!
She and her haughty brother are my slaves!
answered
Osma, aroused to a sense of his present interests
by her sudden question, and losing, under the
returning
influence of it, his emotions of surprise and awe.
Be it so. Yet, by the same laws, an individual
declared to be a slave has a privilege of demanding a
trial, and, before the highest tribunal of the land, to
challenge the accuser to prove his claim. Is not this
the statute?
It is, he answered, hesitating, and with a look
that betrayed his suspicion of her aim.
Count of Osma, she said, addressing him with
commanding severity, though thou fearest not
Heaven
nor regardest man, yet thou hast a guilty
conscience
within that makes thee tremble. To this
conscience
I hold the key! By thy fear of
me
and dread
of my power, I command thee to let thy claim to this
maiden be tried before the public tribunal. If she be
proved to be thy slave, take her; if she be proved to
be free, let her go free. Challenge trial, maiden!
Oh no, no! shrieked Azlie, in whose heart hope
had sprung up while the sorceress was speaking;
never, never! Let me die! Oh, my brother, slay
me with thine own hand!
Renault, who had also indulged hopes of his sister's
escape through her, now gazed upon this extraordinary
woman with indignation, and cried out fiercely,
Who art thou, that triflest with the liberty of a
maiden? Thy words were but now awakening
confidence
in her breast, only to be followed by deeper
despair
.
If this tyrant Osma, whom this proposal seems
to gratify, is to be our judge, let the sentence here be
given, and the spirit of this helpless child at once be
released to a better world.
Osma sits not as judge where he is to stand as
accuser, answered the sorceress.
Then I consent not to it, replied the count, quickly.
`Thou darest not refuse. It is my command, she
said, authoritatively.
Be it as thou wilt; 'twill defer my triumph but a
few hours. The council shall be summoned forthwith.
By the rood! this challenge of trial suits my humour.
Summon thy council, but summon them from the
seventh day from this, she said, sternly. It is the
Christian feast of St. Michael and All Angels.
Wilt thou madden me? he cried, between rage
and fear at the words.
Obey! she responded, solemnly.
I will, wonderful woman!
I then challenge thee, in the name of Renault and
Azlie, who are called quadroons, and declared by thee
to be thy slaves, to prove thy claim in open tribunal,
or ever after hold thy peace! Dost thou accept the
challenge?
I do, he answered, knowing not that he was
herein
sealing his own doom.
Therefore, until the day of trial, let them both
remain
prisoners in their own dwelling, with such a
guard about it to secure their appearance as thy fears
shall lead thee to place, she said, with singular
authority
.
The Count of Osma, whose mind seemed to be
directed
by an irresistible fatuity, after a brief hesitation
answered,
It shall be done. Let there be detached a guard
of twenty faithful men-at-arms, he said, addressing
the officer who commanded the soldiers present, to
escort these prisoners to their own house. See that
they are strictly guarded; for every head among you
shall answer for their forthcoming on the day of trial!
Now, Lil, he said, changing his manner with that
readiness characteristic of him, playfully addressing
his daughter, who had followed the soldiers her shrieks
had brought into the banquet-room, and who all the
while had stood beside her father, listening with the
deepest sympathy and interest to the progress of the
fate of the unfortunate quadroons; now, my Lil, you
will give me credit for forbearance and leniency.
Thou seest that in the matter of the rebellious
councillors
,
I did as thou didst desire; and that I
condescend
,
with the proofs of their bondage in my hands,
that the accused here present shall have fair and
honourable
trial.
Estelle faintly smiled and shook her head; then
approaching
Azlie, to whom all seemed like a dreadful
dream, assured her of her protection, and soothed her
with the confident assurance of her ultimate happiness.
Poor Azlie! besides her own fate, she wept for that
of Henrique! The uncertainty that hung over him
was more dreadful for her to endure than her own
present misery. The trial held out to her no hope;
and even acquittal she felt would be wretchedness, if
Don Henrique was lost to her for ever. Estelle knew
not all the wo of her young heart, and could not comfort
her. Looking timidly up into the face of the brother,
she sighed as she thought, Heaven hath given me
love for this noble youth to slay me! I may not
cherish love for one of an accursed race! How proud
his bearing! How lofty his look! Can one so
haughty
be of a race of slaves? Oh, that I had never seen
him, or that, seeing him, the knowledge of his
degrading
blood had never come to my ears! I will let my
love die where it sprung up, but I feel that I shall not
survive it! Why hath Heaven made me love where
love is degradation? Love hopelessly! love fatally!
Such were the thoughts of Estelle, who, before she
knew the slavish lineage (not to be traced in his
features
,
indeed) of the noble-looking youth, whom she had
first seen in the banquet-room, had let love for him
steal into her heart; but now, from a sense of pride
and natural feeling, with painful and the most bitter
grief at discovering that her affections were placed on
one whom, however worthy, it would be infamy to
love, strove to crush it in its birth, even to her own
sacrifice.
The Count of Osma now gave orders to the captain
to conduct the prisoners from the palace to their
temporary
place of confinement.
Shall I bind them, signor? he asked, approaching
Renault, who was restrained from farther resistance
by a look from the sorceress.
Bind them! bind the maiden! repeated she, on
hearing this, her eyes flashing fire, and her skeleton
finger lifted menacingly to the startled officer. Guard
them well with a double phalanx, if ye will, but lay no
hand upon
her!
Lead on!
I
will go beside her.
See to their safety with your lives! said the count,
as Renault, with his arms haughtily folded and an
erect port, passed him between two men-at-arms, who
guarded him with naked halberds in their hands.
Azlie, by his order, was then placed in a palanquin
borne by four slaves, also environed by men-at-arms.
He would have approached her with a free lip as she
passed near him; but the eye of the sorceress, with the
strange power it ever had over him, held him to the
spot where he stood.
Let thy wantonness slumber, Count of Osma, until
the day of trial. Then shalt thou soon enough possess
her, if judgment go against her.
I have no fear of the result, and do consent to the
trial, that these provincials may know I honour their
laws, and that I may rivet more firmly this haughty
maid's degradation. I have not forgotten the insult
she offered to me three years ago!
Remember the day of St. Michael! she said,
striding
past him as he stood in the midst of the
banquet-chamber
alone, following with his eye the receding
palanquin with a lingering, hesitating glance, as if he
would yet recall it.
But fear, irresistible, superstitious fear, of the
terrible
woman, and the reflection that, though delayed, his
triumph was sure and his victory certainadded to
which was his confidence in the fidelity of his guards
prevented him from doing it.
Virtuous daughter of a wicked father, fear not to
love where thine heart has been given. He is worthy
of all thou canst bestow, said the sorceress, in a low
voice, as she overtook, in the paved passage, the
palanquin
,
beside which Estelle walked, clasping a hand
of the nearly senseless Azlie, for whom, on account
of her beauty and sufferings, she felt a sisterly
affection
.
What mean thy words, mother? asked the
conscious
Estelle, feeling her cheek burn and her heart
leap with surprise at this knowledge of a secret she
had not dared to trust to herself.
I have marked thine eyes, and there is a language
in them that woman can read. Thou lovest, and yet
thou wouldst not love. Thy love is thy greatest grief,
and yet thy greatest joy. Thou wouldst crush it and
trample it; but, the more it is trod upon, the more
luxuriantly
it will grow. But fear not to love; he is
worthy
of thee.
I know he is all worthy, mother, but Here,
surprised
at her boldness and unintentional
acknowledgment
of her love, she hesitated, while the objection she
was about to give utterance to faltered on her tongue.
But he is a quadroon, thou wouldst say, and his
blood attainted: I bid thee a third time love and fear
not, for he is as noble and free born as thyself!
Thus speaking, she descended the broad palace
stairs at the extremity of the gallery after the
palanquin
,
which was already at the foot of it, leaving
Estelle
near the door of her chamber, lost in wonder,
hope, and trembling surprise. She paused a moment,
dwelling on her words, and then entered her boundoir,
fearing yet hoping, doubting yet believing. What a
mine of happiness did the few words of the sorceress
open in her heart, which the moment before was so
wretched and heavy with the weight of its forbidden
love! How changed her whole nature! Yet she had
only the vague and mysterious language of this
singular
woman to base her joy upon. But this to her was
everything. To the heart of a woman that loves, the
course of a feather on the wind, the song of a bird,
a dream of the night, is revelation! Estelle
cherished
a sweet hope in spite of hope, and boldly fed her
love with the image of him she loved.
The Count of Osma also sought his cabinet after
giving orders to his slaves to bear the wounded
Rascas
to a bed, and summon the surgeon of his staff to
attend him; he had found him too useful a retainer to
let him die while hope of life remained. In his
cabinet
he saw the Moor, whom he had not seen since he
left it to conduct Don Henrique to his cell. The slave
met his master's eye with a look of fear, and a
countenance
indicating secret treachery. Osma did not
discover all that it expressed, but saw enough in his
deprecating manner to excite his ever-lively suspicions.
So thou art here, slave! he cried, after surveying
the gigantic Ethiop, who at once had cast himself on
his knees before him. Where hast thou loitered, that
thou hast not been present, nor heard my voice calling
to thee?
The slave made no reply, but, submissively bending
his neck, offered to his lord his naked cimeter.
This is ever thy defence, as if I were a Turk, and
my pastime were chopping off turbaned heads. Put
up thy cimeter, and to thy feet! I have no time to
dally with thee. Hie thee after my guard, follow them
to the habitation of the quadroone-mother, and bring
me true report of the safeguard thither of this Renault
and his sister, and the disposition of the men-at-arms
about the house. Begone, for I have work for thy
deadly steel anon. Take now these keys which
Rascas
hath laid here, and place them in thy belt, for I have
made thee Don Henrique's jailer in his stead.
The Moor hung in his girdle the keys which Rascas,
after returning from the dungeon of Don Henrique, had
thrown down on hearing the clash of swords in
Estelle's
chamber, and then left the cabinet with a rapid
step. The count listened till the echo of his footsteps
along the gallery ceased, and then, closing the door of
his cabinet, gave himself up to reflections upon the
recent
events which had transpired, and began to dwell
upon the future with the exulting hopes of a bad man, to
whom wickedness has become so habitual as to be
necessary
to his existence. He felt that there was an ill
omen in the day appointed, and laughed as if he would
mock his own fears. But the hollow sound of his laugh
terrified him, and, casting himself upon an ottoman, he
sought to banish in sleep the unpleasant memories
which the words as well as the presence of the sorceress
had awakened in his breast.
CHAPTER XII.
THE MOORISH SORCERESS.
The
written message that Renault had received in
the fortress from the hand of Gobin, and which had
produced
such an effect upon him, was couched in these
figurative words, and without date or signature.
The wolf hath entered the fold, and borne away the
lamb to his lair
.
In a little more than half an hour after receiving it,
and crossing the lake with his forces, he came in sight
of the gate of the city with three hundred men at his
back. He was impetuously thundering on, with the
intention
of carrying the barriers by storm, when the
gray woman appeared suddenly in his path.
Hold, Renault! she cried, waving her arm as he
approached her at the head of his men.
He instantly halted his troop, he himself drawing
rein within three feet of her with so sudden a check to
the impetus of his horse that he threw him back upon
his haunches. The fore feet of the animal for a
moment
beat the air, and threatened to descend upon the
breast of the sorceress, who saved herself from being
struck with his hoofs by adroitly seizing him by the bit,
and, with a wonderful display of coolness and strength,
turning him aside.
Dismount; I would speak with thee, she cried,
authoritatively
.
Impatient as he was to fly to the rescue or to the
revenge of his sister, he nevertheless obeyed.
Throwing
his rein to one of his troop, he followed her, as she
preceded him at a rapid pace, until she came beneath
the wall, near an angle of one of the abutments, against
which stood the ruins of a stone hut. This she
entered
,
making a sign for him to follow.
Nay, time is more precious than life, and why
waste it in mystery, woman? said Renault, pausing on
the threshold.
Thy sister is in no present danger! but, if thou
wouldst finally save her, thou must be guided by me.
Did not a message from me bring thee hither at the
head of thy troop?
Thou hast spoken truly. Lead on! I will be
guided
by thee!
She immediately entered the inner room of the dark
hut, and, lifting a trap door, descended a dilapidated
flight of steps. He followed her unhesitatingly, an
idea of the object she had in view flashing upon his
mind, and found himself in a cavernous passage, with
Vol. II.N
broken arches and an unpaved floor. Her footsteps,
for he could see nothing in the gloom, guided him along
the damp, subterraneous passage, which, after several
intricate windings, conducted them to a flight of stairs
at its extremity. These she ascended to an apartment,
into which, through numerous crevices, streamed the
light of the moon. After listening an instant at a door,
she boldly threw it open, and Renault, to his surprise,
found that he was in a street within the walls.
The knowledge of this passage gives us possession
of the town, he cried, with animation, forgetting, in
his great discovery, the immediate object in which he
was so deeply interested.
Follow me, she said, on gaining the street, without
pausing to look behind her.
Alone! I can effect nothing alone! In five
minutes
I will have my men dismounted and let into the
town, he said, going back into the building.
Young man, she cried, sternly, follow me!
Leave thy troop to wait for thy return.
I will not go without the power to punish this
tyrant
!
he replied, determinedly.
Is not thy sister in momentary peril? The evil of
one moment's delay a legion of warriors may not
undo
.
I obey, he anxiously responded, and followed her.
On the way to the palace she informed him, in her
brief, figurative manner, of the particulars of Azlie's
abduction, none of which had escaped her vigilant and
ceaseless
espionnage
.
She sleeps yet, say you? he asked, with trembling.
Until the nightingale sings its evening song. I
have long been familiar, like this false slave Absulem,
with this and every other draught to produce sleep.
Their qualities, powers, and effects are all known to
me.
Sleeps she unprotected save by her own innocence?
Alas! she is no longer the spotless and gentle dove I
have so many years nestled in my bosom, he said, with
bitter anguish, while the fierce grasp he held upon his
naked sword, as he strode along in the shadows of the
buildings, betrayed the stern and deadly character of
his thoughts.
His own subtle and refined passion will be her
safeguard till she awakes to the life and warmth of
beauty. She sleeps securely.
Pray Heaven thy words be true!
From the garden, after entering her chamber and
writing the line to thee, which, on the way, I gave to
one who has proved a faithful messenger, did I follow
the Moor with his burden even to the door of his
cabinet
.
Thence passing round the balcony, I saw her
through the window laid tenderly upon an ottoman;
and from Osma's words and bearing, as well as my
knowledge of his character, knew that he had not
caused this drugged sleep for a darker purpose than
her quiet removal from thy roof to his own.
Knowing
the moment she would awake, I left her securely,
and hastened to the gate to meet thy coming.
Why not admit my troop?
They are but a handful to the Spanish army, and
would defeat our purpose.
Wherefore this interest in my sister? asked
Renault
,
abruptly.
Thou shalt shortly know, but not to-night. Now
think of her safety, for yonder is the palace.
And, hark! there is the nightingale singing, cried
Renault, bounding forward.
Be not too hasty, young man. Remain here in
this recess of the Cathedral tower, and await my
return
.
Before he could object or make any reply, she had
crossed the space between the church nad the palace,
and approached a casement that extended quite to the
ground. Pressing her finger against a corner section
of the lattice, the diamond-shaped leaf of the window
opened inwardly, and let her into a low hall in the
basement
of the palace. She crossed it with a rapid and
familiar step, and, ascending a winding stairway,
reached
a paved saloon on the main floor. Here soldiers,
retainers, and lounging officers caused her to turn
aside and glide in the deep shadows among the
columns
until she came to a door ajar, which by a private
stair communicated with the suite of apartments
occupied
by the Count of Osma. In a few seconds,
avoiding
in her progress, with singular adroitness and address,
an encounter with any of the members of the
household
,
she reached the marble passage, and the next
instant
was in the very cabinet of the count, an unseen
listener and witness of the scene between him and
Azlie. When the terrified girl flew past her, closely
pursued by the count, she followed her in turn as
swiftly
,
till she saw her at the feet of Estelle.
She is for the moment safe, she said, retiring in
the shade as Osma passed; I will now bring the
brother hither, that he may fall into the snare I would
have set for him. If he be suffered to go at liberty,
the public and overwhelming judgment I design for
Osma will be defeated by his rashness. This trial
Osma shall consent to. Until then, Renault must not
be suffered to go free or communicate with his band.
There is seeming evil in this, but good will come of
it, and the Spaniard's shame and infamy be the more
sure. If Allah let me live till the day of trial, I will
turn my face to Mecca, and then die.
Thus communing with her thoughts, she re-entered
the gallery, and was leaving it by the way she had
come, when at the other end of it her active eye
detected
a door slowly opening. Instantly concealing
herself in a recess, she saw the Moor emerge from the
secret staircase leading to the dungeons of the
Inquisition
,
and advance towards the cabinet. She directly
placed herself before him in his path with a gesture of
menace and silence. With a face full of fear, he
crossed
his hands upon his breast, and stood tremblingly
awaiting her commands.
Thou hast the confidence of thy master. Thy
word is even as his. Go to the captain of the guard,
and bid him remain at his post whatsoever may
happen
within the palace, and bid him admit myself and
those I bring with me without question, as if by thy
master's order. As thou fearest me, obey!
The Moor made an obeisance of submission, as if
to a supernatural being, and was about to leave her,
when she inquired the cause of his appearance through
the secret door in the wall in so stealthy a manner.
From him she learned with pleasure, what she had
desired to know, the place of Don Henrique's
confinement
,
of whose arrest she had been an unseen witness
while watching to counteract Osma's plots.
Hath his death been decreed? she asked, eagerly.
His soul will be with Allah with the next sunrise,
answered the Moor.
Meet me here at midnight with the keys of his
dungeon, or beware my power! she said,
authoritatively
.
Sulem hath no will but that of Azrael whom thou
servest, he replied, in a tone of superstitious awe,
sinking into an Oriental posture of dread adoration.
To thine errand quickly, she commanded; and,
watching him till he disappeared, returned to the
outside
of the palace by the way she had entered, and
going into the shadow of the tower, where Renault,
towards whom her intentions now wore a mysterious
complexion, waited with the utmost impatience for her
reappearance.
The tidings! he gasped, seizing her arm as she
approached.
As I would have them. The crisis for thy
presence
has arrived! Follow me!
Past the guards? he demanded, with surprise,
as she boldly crossed an angle of the Place d'Armes,
where citizens and soldiers off duty were listening in
groups to the governor's band, which was filling the
square with martial and stirring music.
Do not hesitate. Come boldly on! Thou canst
not enter in safety the way I came.
Surprised, yet not intimidated by the danger he
incurred
in exposing himself thus openly, with a price
set upon his head, he obeyed her. Partly concealing
N 2
his features with the cape of the short capote he wore,
he passed through the guards by her side
unchallenged
,
though not without being, from his strange
companionship, an object of curiosity. The Moor
was standing on the last step of the stone staircase as
the sorceress, with Renault by her side, mounted the
flight of steps. In a moment afterward, Renault,
whose feet were winged by the loud voice of the
infuriated
count as he seized upon Estelle to separate her
from his victim, was in the presence of the Spaniard
at the very crisis of the most imminent peril. From
that moment until guarded prisoners to their own
dwelling, the fate of both brother and sister is known.
Renault felt happy even as a prisoner when he
reflected
that Azlie was safe, and that, ere she could fall
a victim to the deferred passion of a lawless tyrant,
she might yet be offered up a sacrifice on the shrine of
virgin purity. On taking possession of his habitation
again, the court of which now echoed strangely to the
tread of sentinels, he reflected in great perplexity upon
the singular conduct of the enchantress. She had
clearly manifested an interest in him, yet it was by her
agency he had been made captive. She had shown a
singular regard for Azlie, yet by her means the trial,
so certain to result in the condemnation of the
accused
,
had been determined on.
Why, thought he, did she not exert that
wonderful
power she possesses over this savage Spaniard,
by demanding and securing for her both liberty and a
cessation of his persecution. Nevertheless, I feel a
disposition to trust her; but it is because, perhaps,
that there is none else to trust save Heaven! He
thus mused with himself; and then, kneeling by the
couch of his sister, implored the protection and
guidance
of that Heaven for one so dear to him, so beset
by danger, and so borne down with such a weight of
sorrow.
From the gate of Renault's dwelling, whither she
had accompanied the palanquin, the sorceress took her
way in the direction of the bounds of the city; and
entering
the mansion from which she had issued with
Renault, in a few seconds was outside of the walls,
walking with rapid strides towards a group of
horsemen
,
who seemed to have rode near the town for the
purpose of reconnoitring. One of them saw her and
spurred towards her. It was Charleval, the
companion
in arms of Renault, who, during the hour's
mysterious
absence of his friend and chief, had become so
impatient as to meditate setting fire to the gates and
entering the city, believing he must have been
betrayed
by the mysterious being who had commanded
him to follow her. The others of the group were De
Thoyras, who had arrived after Renault's departure
with forty chasseurs, Gobin, and the trumpeter
Boviedo
,
the two latter mounted upon the same steed;
Gobin
having generously restored to his paunchy friend the
animal of which he had despoiled him, on finding him,
upon his return from the fortress, sitting on the ground
where he had cast himself, sadly bewailing his loss.
Where is our chief? demanded Charleval, on
coming up to her.
In prison, she said, firmly.
This is thy work, hag! Thy treachery hath cost
thee thy life, cried Charleval, presenting a pistol at
her head.
Nay, cousin Charleval, cried Gobin, galloping up
at the instant astride behind Boviedo, and striking up
the pistol, it were worth thy soul to harm mother
Beelzebub.
I fear him not, she said, without being moved at
her imminent peril. If thou art the chief in the
absence
of Renault, she continued, addressing the
impatient
Charleval, it is with thee my business lies.
Know that Osma the Spaniard hath a lawless passion
for Azlie the Quadroone, and this night hath stolen
her from her chamber and borne her to his palace.
This I know: and the licentious Spaniard had
better
have formed a harem with every fair quadroone in
the province than placed eyes on Azlie. Not a sword
in Louisiana will rest in its scabbard until she be
rescued
or avenged.
This is the spirit I would see awakened. Renault
was admitted by me through a secret passage and
conducted
to the palace. There was no moment for
delay
,
and his single arm was of more avail than thy
small force of horsemen, with the whole Spanish army
to withstand thee. It was in part to save the massacre
of yonder horsemen that I took him alone. He
rescued
his sister from dishonour, but is himself made
prisoner.
This is both good and ill news! He must be
rescued
,
or the blood of another victim will glut the
vengeance
of the Spanish demon, cried Charleval, with
determination.
Thou art too impetuous, she said, sternly.
Osma's
day of retribution is at hand. Know that,
defeated
in possessing Azlie, he hath claimed both
herself
and Renault to be slaves, and by a certain
parchment
hath sworn to make good his claim. They
have appealed to the tribunal, and on the sixth day
from this their trial is to take place. In the mean
while, both are imprisoned in their own dwelling, which
is strongly guarded.
This is villany most deep and subtle, exclaimed
Charleval through his clinched teeth.
Hear! The thousand savage warriors Renault
informs me you have sent for will be here by the fifth
night. Till then, retire to thy fortress, and augment
thy numbers with true men. The tribunal will be
open at ten on the morning of the sixth day. At that
hour be at the head of thy forces within yonder
forest
,
but let nor plume nor steel-point be seen from the
walls. The whole of the Spanish troops at the same
hour will be drawn up in the Place d'Armes to protect
the cabildo, while sitting, from any outbreak of
popular
feeling on account of unjust judgment. Few will
be left to guard the gates, and all men's minds will be
bent on affairs within rather than without the city.
At this crisis I will meet thee, and secretly conduct thy
forces into the town. Then disposing them at hand
near the precincts of the hall of council, thou mayst
thyself enter it and witness the trial; for I would have
all men behold the judgment of Osma.
Woman, who art thou?
The friend of Renault and Azlie. Wouldst thou
know more to give me thy confidence?
'Tis enough; Renault hath spoken to me of thee,
and himself trusted thee. He shall not be sacrificed
by any hesitation on the part of his friends. It shall
be as thou sayest. At ten on St. Michael's day,
yonder
frowning line of forest shall hold within its
spreading
arms sixteen hundred warriors.
And ten minutes afterward they shall be within
the walls, moving silently and swiftly towards the
palace
,
armed with the judgment of the guilty. Depart,
and gather thy strength. The night wears apace, and
each moment now is as a day to thee.
Farewell, wonderful and mysterious woman!
Whoever and whatever thou art, I know thou hast
given Osma and the city into our hands!
The sorceress made no reply, but, waving him
impatiently
to depart, he once more bade her adieu, and,
accompanied by the others, including the jester,
galloped
towards the squadron of horse which was drawn
up in a solid column on the edge of the woods. On
reaching it he gave a single brief order, and the whole
troop, wheeling to the right, moved at a fast trot into
the wood, and were shortly afterward lost to the eye
and ear.
She looked after them until the last faint rumble of
the fall of a thousand hoofs had ceased, and then
slowly
and thoughtfully, as if weighing over again the
plans she had projected, returned to the hut and
entered
the city. When the heavy tongue of the
Cathedral
bell had sounded the first stroke of twelve, she
secretly entered the palace through the panel in the
Moorish casement by which she had formerly gained
access to the interior, and, ere it had sounded the last
deep note, she was in the marble gallery, gliding like a
spectre along its sides in the direction of the private
door leading to the dungeons. All was silent as the
tomb. Osma slept on his guilty pillow; Estelle was
in her chamber, but seated by the lattice in her
nightrobe
,
thinking of Renault, and devising some plan for
his escape.
The Moor was not at his post; and, while she
waited
for him, a groan, mingled with an execration, startled
her. It was from Rascas, who lay on a pallet in the
antechamber of the cabinet, suffering from his wound.
The next instant she was by his pillow of pain. A
faint lamp at his bed's head shed a ghastly light upon
his countenance. His eyes were shut, and she turned
back her cowl from her face and touched him. He
then opened them and gazed upon her, at first with a
vacant look; but intelligence lightened his glance, and
he cried with fear,
Away, accursed sorceress! Hast thou come to
force me to sell my soul! and he covered his eyes
with his hands, as if he would shut out the sight of
her, while his whole frame shuddered.
Ha, ha! Rascas the assassin, as men call thee,
dost thou have hope for thy soul, that thou tremblest
for it?
I am going to die! he said, as if under the
extreme
of mortal fear, and wholly overcome with mental
horror.
And now thou wouldst play the coward, who hast
played the villain so bravely. Didst thou not know
thou wouldst one day die, that death hath now taken
thee by surprise?
In full life I feared it not. It seemed a long way
offbeyond the utmost limits of old age.
Thou didst think all men mortal but thyself. Thus
it is, and death ever comes to all unexpectedly. It
has thus come to thee, and methinks thou art poorly
prepared to meet it.
What shall I do? he cried, with miserable
eagerness
,
which could ill conceal the hopeless despair
beneath
it.
Do as I bid thee, and thou shalt live.
Live! he repeated, seizing her hand and wildly
pressing it to his lips.
Live, and live to repent!
Give me only lifeI care not for repentance!
Oh, if I could know I should not die now
die now!
he repeated, lifting himself to his elbow, and anxiously
reading her face with his feverish eyes. Give me
only life, and I laugh at repentance! ha, ha, ha! Oh,
life,
life
, LIFE! he continued to repeat, as the
Arabian
dying for thirst in the desert cries Water,
water
,
water!
She surveyed him a few moments with a look of
scornful contempt, and then said in a deep voice,
Thou knowest the secret crimes of thy master's
life.
Who hath told thee? he demanded, with fear.
It matters not. This knowledge may save thy
life.
How? he eagerly demanded, his desire to live
overcoming the agony of his wound, which only
betrayed
itself in the involuntary contractions of the
muscles of his face.
By bearing testimony against him.
Will this give me life? Will it?
I have learned from the report of the surgeon the
condition of thy wound. It is mortal for all the skill
of any chirurgeon. He hath said you will die!
Save, give me life, and I will do what thou wilt,
were it to bury my knife in my master's heart!
Ha, ha! Thou wert penitent but now for thy
crimes, and thou wouldst purchase longer life by
adding
to them.
So that I live, I care not for the price. Put death
off
now! save me now!
he cried, with an eloquence
of fear that astonished her, while it excited her
contempt
.
Though surgeon's skill will not avail thee, mine
will. Swear that thou wilt answer truth against thy
master when thou shalt be called upon, and I will exert
my power to save thee from death.
I swear.
I little heed thy oath. Know that the ointment I
shall apply to thy wound is a deadly poison. Six days
it must be applied, morning and evening, with the
rising
and setting of the sun. The seventh day the
patient
would die a mass of corruption but for a
counterpoison
,
which, for seven days more applied to the
wound, perfecteth a cure.
If thou shouldst fail me on the seventh day
Then thou wouldst become a livid corpse, so that
no man could look upon thee.
I will not trust thee, fiendish enchantress!
Be it so. Thou wilt not live to the third day from
this in thy present state.
The assassin shuddered, hid his face in the
bed-covering
,
and writhed with intense misery, both of mind
and body. At length, groaning heavily and
hopelessly
,
he cried,
Apply thy medicament, woman, and my testimony
shall be thine.
She drew from her girdle a small puch, that, among
other articles, contained a crystal vial holding a pale,
amber-coloured oil, which, on removing the silver
stopper
,
filled the chamber with an extremely pungent, yet
not an unpleasant odour. After cleansing the wound
in his side, she poured the healing fluid upon it, and
bound it skilfully up. He felt instant relief; and,
after pressing her hands with a grateful look,
suddenly
,
from a total cessation of pain, fell into a deep sleep.
She contemplated for a moment the effect of her skill,
and then sought once more the private outlet from the
gallery. A few seconds afterward the Moor
appeared
,
having been waiting at the door of the palace for
her entrance that way, and now betrayed evident
surprise
at finding her already at the place appointed.
Receiving impatiently his explanation for his delay,
she sternly bade him lead her to the cell of his prisoner.
CHAPTER XIII.
SCENE BETWEEN THE LOVERS.
Don Henrique
had been left, by the refined cruelty
of Rascas, who proved a faithful successor to those
Fathers of the Inquisition, whose inhumanity had framed
the iron vaults beneath the foundations of the prison,
chained by the waist and hands to iron staples in the
side of the vault. He could now neither stand nor sit;
and, fatigued by sorrow and overcome by his miserable
condition, he had fallen into a troubled sleep while
suspended, as it were, from the wall. A massive
golden
crucifix lay at his feet, which Osma had left with
him in mockery.
He had given up all hopes of life; and, striving to
forget every earthly tie, fixed his mind on that world
into which he felt he was soon to enter. Yet in his
dreams he was again in the boudoir of Azlie, kneeling
at her feet, and breathing his passion into her listening
ear; was once more in the hall of his fathers, and
wandering over the hills of sunny Spain. The spirit
that guided his dreams was merciful, and presented to
his mind only objects that were agreeable and most
opposite
to the mournful realities of his waking hours.
From the midst of one of these pleasant visions he was
startled by the clanging of chains and the removing of
bars and bolts.
Alas! Heaven be merciful to me! he
ejaculated
,
awaking to the reality of his unhappy condition.
Now is the assassin at hand whose steel will be the
key to let my weary spirit into the world beyond!
Must I die here like an ox! Oh, for one good sword,
and an arm unchained to wield it, that I might fall
like a man and a knight!
The door of his dungeon opened, and the Moor
appeared
,
Vol. II.O
holding a shaded lantern in his hand, followed
by a tall figure wrapped in a gray mantle, which he
at once knew must be the sorceress who had taken
such an interest in the fate of Azlie, and also in his
own. Hopethat blessed angel and Heaven's best
gift to poor humanity in this sad worldwas instantly
reawakened in his breast by her appearance. She
paused on the threshold of the cell, and with a look
of compassion and sympathy, that contrasted singularly
with her harsh, sepulchral features, surveyed him in
silence
.
At length she advanced, and, kneeling, took his
hand, and said with reverence,
Unhappy prince! Thy cruel captivity is now
ended! Alas! that I should behold a prince of Spain
in such a state of degradation and misery! Unlock
these chains and cast them into the sea, that the
record
of this dishonour may not exist on the earth!
she cried, with stern indignation.
Sulem obeyed, and Don Henrique stood erect,
unbound
.
Is this a dream? he asked, with troubled
doubt.
Thou art free, noble signor. He who hath put
thee here will soon take thy place.
Ha! hath the city rebelled?
No; but Justice hath come to her seat.
You speak mysteriously!
It shall be made as clear as sunlight, prince, to
thee and every man.
Prince! I did then hear aright! How knowest
thou me?
If thy secret be to six, doth it surprise thee that a
seventh hath it? Be it enough that I know thee, and
wherefore thou art a wanderer from the palace of thy
fathers. Follow me, and thou shalt learn all thou
wouldst know.
Then tell me here
here
, before thou movest, he
cried, catching her by the mantle, what ofof
The maiden whose love thou hast won! Be
happy
,
prince! She is safe, and in all honour beneath
her own roof!
And thou hast saved her? he cried, scarcely
crediting what he had heard.
I have, noble signor.
Then Heaven bless theebless thee! forfor I
cannot! he articulated with choked utterance, and,
falling on his knees, kissed her robe and burst into
tears.
In twenty minutes afterward Don Henrique had
Azlie folded in his arms, whom at length he released
only to receive the fraternal embrace of Renault. The
Moor, whom the sorceress had enslaved to her own
will, had treacherously admitted them in the face of
the unsuspecting guards, who silently acknowledged
the seal of their commander in his hands, as well as
the scarce less authoritative command of the
confidential
slave. Having witnessed their meeting, the
sorceress departed alone and unquestioned.
Estelle sat by her lattice until long after twelve,
communing with herself upon the fate of Renault and
of his sister; but the former was uppermost in her
thoughts; and each moment love for the handsome
and spirited youth grew stronger in her heart from
that it fed upon.
Suddenly she rose; and, casting a cloak about her,
and otherwise disguising herself as she had once
before
done, she stole from her chamber, and,
unobserved
,
reached her father's cabinet.
He slept where an hour or two before he had cast
himself upon the ottoman, and a tall silver
candelabrum
with wax lights alone burned upon his escritoir.
She softly approached, and from a secret drawer of
the secretaire took two of several private seals it
contained
.
Retiring, she hastily left the palace, making
use of one of the signets in passing the guard. Then
speaking to a soldier, she demanded to be directed to
the residence of Renault the Quadroon. From his
ready knowledge of this habitation, she discovered
that the recent circumstances had made it known to
most of the governor's guard. Having learned from
him its situation, she departed in search of it. After
traversing a part of one street, and turning an angle
or two of others, she came suddenly upon a sentry,
who challenged her from the foot of a garden wall on
the opposite side of the way. Ignorant of the
countersign
,
she knew not what to answer, and trembled
lest she should be discovered. Her hesitation was
observed by the soldier, who challenged a second
time, at the same time bringing his piece to his
shoulder.
Camarada! she answered, going towards him.
Stand and give the countersign, he demanded, as
she reached the middle of the way.
Throw up your piece, sirrah! she cried, in an
authoritative tone, advancing upon him. Do you dare
menace a messenger of the governor? Behold my
authority! she added, holding out the signet.
He advanced a step and took it from her, and, after
carefully examining it, returned it. You might as
easily, signor, have given the countersign, if it is such
a long-winded words as `Death to Osma's foes,' as to
have given me this trouble, he muttered; and,
shouldering
his piece, he bade her pass on.
With alacrity, she cheerfully obeyed, and was soon
at the treble-guarded portal of the dwelling. Here,
making use of the countersign she had so
unexpectedly
obtained possession of, as well as of the signet, she
was admitted into the court, muffled to the eyes as she
was, without question or hesitation on the part of the
sentinels. Azlie's boudoir was pointed out to her,
and the captain of the guard, accompanying her to
within a few feet of the curtained door, returned again
to his post. She paused. Her heart beat
tumultuously
.
She had come thither scarcely reflecting on
her object in doing so, and had laid no plan of
conduct
for her guidance. The danger of Renault and
his sister had inspired her to take a step at which she
now trembled with maidenly shame and hesitation.
They were in peril from her father's united passion
and vengeance, and she had suggested to her mind, as
she sat in her chamber, the idea to rescue them through
the agency of the signets which she had afterward
taken
for the purpose.
But, now that the moment of action had arrived
that a curtain alone separated her from the young
courreur chef
, who had inspired her with so tender
and deep a passionher heart failed. She leaned
against a column of the cloister for support, and
summoned
all her strength of mind and native energy of
character to her aid. At length she became collected,
and formed the resolution to present herself boldly
before
them, offer them the way to escape, conduct them
through the guards disguised, and, by the aid of the
countersign and signet, out of the city gates to liberty.
I may never see him more, she thought; and he
will have departed without knowing he has left so true
a heart behind him. Perhaps he would scorn my
love! Yet his eye told me otherwise, modestly as he
sought to shade his love beneath the downcast lid. I
will nevertheless sacrifice my love to his freedom.
That he is worthy of my affectionthat he is
not
of the
race that claims himmy heart, as well as the
language
of that mysterious woman, doth tell me. No,
I have too proud a heart to cast my love unworthily.
I know he could not be debased, or he would not have
awakened an interest in the bosom of the daughter of
the house of Osma.
Thus run her thoughts as she paused with her grasp
upon the curtain that was dropped before the entrance.
She was about to lift it, when the voice of Renault
within arrested her hand as suddenly as if it had been
paralyzed.
It is certain, dearest sister, he said, in a
melancholy
voice, that this trial, which this wicked
Spaniard
hath appointed, will be a mockery like that of the
councillors. We can hope for no justice but from
Heaven.
Can that fatal parchment by no means be taken
from him, Renault? asked an earnest voice, which
she recognised to be that of Don Hernique.
If it could be done, it would overthrow, in the eye
O 2
of justice, his claim; which, with this in his hand, he
may sustain where false judges and the tools of his
will sit in judgment; for every honest judge would
see that his claim is founded on injustice and tyranny.
Yet, with this evidence in his possession, said
Don Henrique, the law must sustain him in his
claim without taking into consideration the abstract
question of the purpose he has in view in maintaining
and defending it. I fear it will go against you,
notwithstanding
the hope held out by this wonderful
sorceress
.
She did not say that it would not be decided
against us, brother, said the silvery and touching
voice of Azlie; but that, if it were, the judgment
would fall on his head instead of ours.
Thou hast great faith, sweet Azlie, in this
woman
,
said Don Henrique; and I must acknowledge I
think she hath some plan in view for your safety and
Osma's shame. Nevertheless, if we could get
possession
of this parchment before the day of trial, we
might, perhaps, through the aid of this sorceress,
defeat
him.
I wish it could be done, said Renault; I have
little faith in her; for I have thought that my arrest
is owing to her. Indeed, had she led me, with all my
men, into the town, Osma would have been my
prisoner
instead of my being his!
And wouldst thou then have saved me, brother, as
thou didst do? asked Azlie, reprovingly.
Nay, perhaps it is best as it is, he answered; for
I should have been reluctant, with my sincere passion
for that lovely creature, his daughter, to have done
him outrage. For her sake, methinks I could submit
to any wrong that touched not Azlie.
She is a noble girl, and I have seen much of her
on shipboard, said Don Henrique; not to have
been ruined for any man's love, by her father's
masculine
method of educating her, shows that she possesses
no ordinary mind. Didst thou tell her of thy love?
NayI am a quadroon, and could not insult her,
he said, bitterly.
Thou mighst have told it without shame to her
or thyself; for methinks I have never met a man
better
fitted to be worn in a noble maiden's heart than
thou!
She would have scorned me.
Renault, answered Don Henrique, seriously,
from some words that fell from the sorceress, who
seems to know all things hidden from common eyes, I
do not believe thee to be a quadroon.
Not a quadroon, signor?
No.
Who and what am I, then?
I cannot tell. Doubtless she will disclose it to
thee, as she has promised to reveal, if thou wilt let me
love thy gentle sister here, who I am, he said,
smiling
.
Would it could be proved so! But my mother!
I do not believe she is thy mother.
I would, indeed, it could be proven so; yet I would
not, he added, I would not it should be thus; for I
should lose this sweet sister then.
Estelle, whose eager interest in their conversation
led her slightly to lift the curtain, beheld him then
tenderly bend over and embrace Azlie, who, with
Don Henrique, was reclining on gorgeous rugs at his
feet. She gazed on the group, with a desire to take
the place in it her heart had chosen. Suddenly, as if
impelled by an irresistible impulse to obey her wishes,
she drew aside the hangings, and was in the midst ere
she well knew it. Don Henrique and Renault both
sprang to their feet on seeing an intruder enveloped to
the brow in a Spanish roquelaure, with a broad
sombrero
flapping over his eyes. But they were both
without arms, and only gazed upon him with suspicion
and defiance.
Nay, Don Henrique, she said, turning with
instinctive
delicacy to the young Spaniard, instead of
addressing
herself to Renault, be not alarmed! I pray
you both pardon the step; it has in it your safety.
She removed the hat and dropped the mantle from
her shoulders as she spoke, but not before Renault had
recognised the disguise, and the voice that no disguise
could hide from his true ear.
Senorita Estelle! exclaimed Don Henrique, on
beholding her.
My deliverer! cried Azlie, flying to her to
embrace
her feet; but she prevented her, and caught her
in her arms.
Renault stood by silent and sorrowful. Duty and
honour bade him hide his love, and smother it ere it
should break out. But she had overheard the
confession
of his love to Don Henrique. She now saw his
embarrassmentconstrued his feelingsread his
inmost
soul. She lifted her eyes, and they encountered
his. With a smile she then advanced towards him;
and with a graceful dignity of manner, and an open
frankness, yet modesty of speech that was
extraordinary
,
said,
Noble Renault, I have unawares overheard your
words in which you confessed your love for the
daughter
of your foe. The time and circumstances allow no
disguise, no empty and heartless forms and passages
of ceremony. If it will make thy brow less sad and
thy heart lighter, know from my lips that thy love is
returnednay, had its birth with thine! If thou art
proved, as I trust and believe thou wilt be, one of my
own race, however lowly be thy lot in it, my hand
shall be thine if thou demandest it. But if thou art
of the race of bondsmen, which Heaven forefend!
though my heart is and must ever be thine, my
bridegroom
will be the church. Wilt thou receive my love
on these hard terms, which only as a true and noble
Spanish maiden it becometh me to offer, and which, if
I know thee aright, it beseemeth thee only to accept?
Dearest and most noble lady, said Renault,
kneeling
at her feet, thou hast made me the happiest of
beings. This ingenuous confession on thy part, which
my ignoble condition would never have led me to
make, shows the greatness of thy mind as well as the
depth and purity of thy love. Thou hast well
understood
me. Knowing my degraded birth, never would
my love for thee have allowed me to forget it. On no
other terms than those thou hast named should I have
dared to think of one spotless and noble as thyself.
Thou, a Castilian by birth, of a noble race, of far and
high descent, of unblemished blood, whose rank and
beauty would command the homage of the highborn
and noble,
thou
to speak thus to me! Lady! I am at
once humbled and exalted!
She extended her hand, much moved at his words,
and with reverence and devotion he pressed it to his
lips.
I trust, Don Henrique, she said, turning to him
with a becoming embarrassment, that the strangeness
of our circumstances and situations, added to the
unsettled
state of these times, which may excuse many
departures from conventional rules, will excuse me in
your eyes from overstepping the bounds of decorum?
Nay, Estelle, there needeth no other apology than
that thy love hath plainly given, he said, with a smile.
I need not ask from thee wherefore thou hast
lingered
here, under plea of being wounded, Sir
Cavalier
,
she retorted, glancing her eyes from himself to
Azlie, who betrayed so much ingenuous confusion at
her significant words, that Estelle, after admiring her
a moment, suddenly changed the current of ideas by
saying abruptly, yet playfully, to Renault,
Think not, signor, I came hither to declare my
love to thee! 'Twas but the overhearing of thine own
confession that drew mine from me. I came hither
to rescue thee and thine: now our conversation takes
a serious turn! 'Twere madness to wait here for the
trial. My father hath the wills of the members of the
cabildo
in his own hands; they are his creatures! It
therefore matters nothing whether he be its president
or not. It is a hard saying for the daughter of a
dearly-loved father, but he will have you condemned!
Your fate is sealed in his heart! To wait, therefore,
is to sacrifice yourselves. Fly!
We are prisoners and unarmed, dearest lady,
said Renault; flight were impossible.
I have here the means. The password of your
guard is, must I say it to
thee?
`Death to Osma's
foes!' This signet will open every barrier between
you and liberty.
Fair Estelle, said Don Henrique, after seeing
from Renault's face that his opinion was the same with
his own, this plan may be feasible, yet it is attended
with great danger. Gratitude is due to you for this
self-sacrifice, and imminent risk on your part to
propose
and offer it. To be retaken would be certain
ruin and death; while it would appear to the world
like guilt, the consciousness of justly being in bondage
to him, and he would make use of it to the degradation
of his victims and the enlargement of his own
triumph
.
Besidesand I have great faith in herthis
Moorish sorceress, who has so much power over thy
father, has given us hopes that the trial will result to
the honour of one party and the disgrace of the other.
That is my father! This, I must tell you, is what
I fear. It is this that would lead me to aid the escape
of both, that whatever evil this dreadful woman hath
ready to pour upon his head may be averted
And fall upon the heads of Renault and Azeli,
said Don Henrique, with bitter reproof.
Oh, whitherhow shall I turn? 'Twill wring my
sould either way, she cried, with anguish. Aid me,
Don Henrique!
Let things take their course. Thou hast
confessed
thy interest in Renault. Hast thou not, then, a
hope depending on this very triala proof to be
substantiated
?
Let events flow on; but let us prepare
for them, and, if it is possible, lessen thy father's power
to do harm. We look upon thee now as of our own
party, how much soever thou lovest thy father; and
thou mayst serve us and thyself with no more treason
to him than virtue will forgive. To his cabinet thou
hast free access at all hours. The parchment of
manumission
which he now holds must be obtained, and
placed in Renault's possession.
It will not avail, signor. He will yet call on the
trial, and demand judgment on his own oral claim.
Be it so. Such a decision will be unjust and
without
law, and Renault and Azlie will have the sympathy
of the people on their side. A decision supported by
the parchment would meet, notwithstanding the
popularity
of Renault, with their passive acquiescence.
It shall be done, said Estelle, firmly, after a
moment's
reflection, during which she underwent a keen
and trying conflict between her filial duty and her love
for Renault.
She left them after saying this, and in half an hour
afterward the fatal parchment was in the possession of
Renault.
During the interval before the morning of St.
Michael's
Day, the brother and sister remained
imprisoned
and undisturbed in their own dwelling, with,
unknown
to all save themselves, the society of Don
Henrique
,
who had determined to appear at the trial, and
to support his loved Azlie in the ordeal through which
she had to pass. The sorceress, even up to the
morning
of the sixth day, did not again make her appearance,
and their faith in her began to give way to doubts and
distressing fears. From Estelle, who visited them
nightly, disguised as she had been at first, they learned
that the Moor, by the direction, as they afterward
understood
,
of the sorceress, had reported to her father
the death of Don Henrique in prison, at which he
expressed
a degree of joy that surprised her, until Don
Henrique, with as much forbearance as the subject
would admit of, related to her the cause of his
displeasure
against him. While from the Moor, who had
become friendly and secretly attentive to their comfort,
they learned that the Count of Osma had ordered him,
without expressing a desire to see it, to leave the body
of his rival in the dungeon where he supposed him to
have perished, to wall up the door, cover the trapdoor
above with a pavement, and otherwise concealing all
traces and signs of a subterranean vault, convert his
prison into his tomb.
CHAPTER XIV.
SCENES ON ST. MICHAEL'S EVE.
Scene First.
Osma and the Assassin.
It
had just fallen dark on the eve of St. Michael
when the Count of Osma left his cabinet; and, after
cautiously guarding against observation, entered the
faintly-illuminated anteroom, where, stretched upon
his pallet, Rascas still lay, weak and in pain, yet
hourly
convalescing under the daily application of the
healing
unguent of the sorceress.
How fares it with thee? he asked, closing the
door and approaching the pillow.
Ill at ease, my lord, ill at ease. Is to-morrow
St. Michael's?
It is, and seems as it would never come for my
impatience. Each hour I am deprived of my
charming
quadroone is a loss of bliss no future time can
restore
.
Had I not given my knightly word to this hag,
and that the trial is in all men's mouths, I would, ere
now, have put an end to this mummery. I trust thou
wilt be afoot again soon, man.
The day after the morrow will be the seventh
day! murmured the wounded man. If she fail me!
What is this thou art muttering within thy lips
prayers? Be not so pious withal; thou art not so
near death as thou fearest. By the rood, I would not
so readily lose thee! I have e'en now need of thy aid,
and have come hither to bid thee point out to me some
trusty villain of thy comrades who may take thy place
till thou art on thy legs again. I would have his
service
this night.
I do know of none save Paul Carra, and I think
he hath of late taken to the lakes.
Canst thou call to mind none other?
Not a man, my lord, who hath a true hand and
eye; not one that can strike the steel home at a blow.
Out upon thee, villain! Thou art so full of
iniquity
,
that thou canst talk of nothing but foul murders.
If men say `steel,' thou dost fancy it sheathed in a
man's ribs. I want no blood-service to-night. Some
one hath purloined from my escritoir the parchment
of manumission on which I would base my claim upon
this Renault and his sister. I believe it to be the
handiwork
of my daughter. But if I can bring about
what I have in contemplation, this theft shall be
turned
to good account, and whoever took it will pray the
saints they had left it. Knowest thou this outlaw, Jules
Caronde, who made havoc of my men-at-arms, and
since lieth sorely wounded in some place without the
town?
I know him, my lord. He hath lost a hand in
the affray, and hath become savage as a wounded lion.
I would find him. Direct me to his den.
Wilt thou go thyself?
Thou canst find me no one else. Sulem, of late,
I have begun to suspect of treachery, which, if I make
clear, he shall answer for with his head ere sunset
tomorrow
.
Give me the direction to find this Caronde.
I will see him in person.
After issuing from the Pontchartrain gate, ride
forward a quarter of a league, and take the first
left-hand
path that offers through the forest. Continue
along the by-road until you come to a rivulet, which
follow a few hundred yards to its outlet in a small
mere. On the shore of this mere, upon a small
promontory
,
you will discover a dilapidated square tower.
Vol. II.P
Ride to its gate, and in a tree that branches above it
you will find, hanging within reach of a horseman's
hand, a chasseur's horn. Sound this sharply twice.
You will then be admitted.
Thou hast given it plainly, good Rascas. Adieu.
I commend thee to sleep in my absence.
SCENE SECOND.
Gobin and Boviedo.
The
Count of Osma left the gloomy apartment of
the invalid. A few moments afterward, a horseman,
disguised so as to defeat the closest scrutiny, rode forth
from the palace yard, and galloped in the direction of
the eastern gate. He soon arrived in sight of the
barrier, and, answering the distant challenge of the
sentinel, rode up, and was about to demand to see the
officer of the guard, when a noise of clamorous voices
without the gate, in altercation with the soldier within,
both surprised him and excited his curiosity. He
listened
an instant, and thought he detected the voice of
Boviedo, his disgraced trumpeter.
By the valour of an Aragonese trumpeter! by
the fear of an Aragonese knock o' the head wi' an
Aragonese fist, let me in, thou coward! Dost thou
fear two men will take thy city, that thou guardest the
gate o't so closely? Wilt thou keep two cavaliers
standing without to be scalped by the heathenish
salvages
?
Let down thy bars and admit us, thou son of a
Philistine's daughter.
Thou mayst hammer with thy tongue till
day-dawn
,
Signor Boviedo. All men know the governor
hath disgraced thee for suffering thyself to be
discomfited
with the loss of horse and colours, replied the
soldier. Get in as thou didst get out.
I did get out when the gates were open for the
soldiers to go forth to gather the dead slain by the
enemy. Touching my disgrace, it hath been wiped
away, inasmuch as I have won another steed at the
sword's point.
Thy sword's point should be stuck i' thy throat
for that lie, said a harsh voice, which the count
recognised
as Gobin's; he got him grazing i' the field
after
the fight, gossip o' the inside there; and he caught
him only by climbing a tree, and letting himself down
upon his back, to keep clear of his heels and teeth.
Marry come up! he did win him like a true man.
Friend Gobin, dost thou vilify thy friend, that hath
escaped with thee from yonder heathenish salvages,
that would ha' made broth o' our bones? said Boviedo,
in an under tone. Let me lie, so I but get in at the
gate by it, and hold thy peace. When I get restored
to mine office again, I will remember thee.
Let gossip Boviedo in, cousin, said Gobin, aloud,
and he will teach thee marvels! He will tell thee
the art o' lying till thou art black i' the face, and then
lying thyself white again! He will prove to thee how
that a soldier's valour lieth in his wind, and he of the
king's army who is the most valiant is his trumpeter.
Then playing thee a tune for an ensample o' his own
wind, marry! will he make thee believe he is the most
valorous man in Spain! But bid him defend himself
wi' his sword, and he will cry
peccavi
, and show thee
naught but an arrant Aragonese coward hath been
this braggadocio.
Ho, signor! what is this uproar? demanded
Osma of the captain of the post, who now made his
appearance from the guardroom.
I know not, my lord, answered the officer,
instantly
by the voice recognising the commander-in-chief;
'tis but some idle conference with some
paysans
without
and my soldiers.
See if there be more than two, and, if not, admit
them.
The officer surveyed them through a slide in the
side of the gate, and then, turning to the chief, said,
There be but two men, signor, both mounted upon
one steed.
Dost thou know either of them?
One is the trumpeter Boviedo, and the other, by
his motley dress, is the
natural
I have seen in the town.
Let them in.
The gate was immediately thrown open, and
Boviedo
and Gobin, both mounted astride a sorry-looking
animal, were admitted within the barrier.
How now, sirrah! what means this mummery?
demanded Osma of his quondam trumpeter, with more
of a smile than a frown.
High and mighty excellency, answered Boviedo,
who had evidently lost both fat and wind in his exile
from the presence of his master, whose presence he
now hailed with the proud confidence of one who has
achieved a praiseworthy deed, and feels satisfied with
his own conduct, it was by thy just displeasure that I
was dismissed from thy service, until I had recovered
by mine own valour a steed for that of which I was
so feloniously despoiled. Behold me mounted upon a
charger won by mine own prowess from the enemy!
Lo! this saddle! is it not of the fashion of the
courreur
du bois?
Lo! this bridle of hide! is it not like
the bridle of the enemy? Dost thou not see the evil
eye and hang-dog look of the animal himself? Doth
he not bear himself as if he knew he were i' the
presence
of the governor his master hath rebelled against?
What is the end of this, sirrah? demanded the
count.
The end o' it, cousin Spain, should be hemp! He
hath stolen a horse, and sweareth he hath won him.
He deserveth hanging, and, were I thou, gossip, I'd
bid these knaves here, with harquebuses to their
shoulders
,
swing him to the gate-arch. He hath been lying
all his life, an' it were a mercy to let him hang i' his
death.
Thou art a merry knave, said the governor;
and, now it bethinks me, I have somewhat against
thee. Didst thou not take service with me, and the
next day run away?
I did fear, if I stayed with thee longer, thou
wouldst discover my wisdom, and think me a
councillor
in disguise, and so have me tried and shot.
Thou art a shrewd knave. Perez, he said to the
officer of the guard, place this jester under gentle
arrest until morning, and then give him his liberty. I
am going forth a while, and his knowledge of my
absence
may work mischief. Boviedo, remain thou in
the guardhouse till morning, and then go to the
palace
and be reinstated in thy office! Let me forth,
capitano, and see that no one passes either out or in, on
any pretence, during my absence. Good-evening to
thee, fair jester. It grieves me to put thee under
guard, but Perez hath both wine and viands to amuse
thee withal, though, by'r lady! I doubt much if thou
wilt find here gold or silver flagon to purloin.
With this quiet allusion to Gobin's former
peccadilloes
,
the count sallied from the gate, and, putting
spurs to his horse, was soon riding at a round rate in
the direction of the forest.
Scene Third.
Osma and the Chasseur Chief.
By
the open window of a large vaulted apartment,
situated in a lonely tower by the water-side, and on the
same eve of St. Michael, leaned a tall, graceful young
man, who had risen from a pallet that stood near. He
was remarkable for the symmetry of his figure, and,
notwithstanding a languor pervaded his whole person,
also for the elegance and flexile ease of every motion
of his limbs. His hair was black as the raven's wing;
his eyes were large and equally black; while his
complexion
was remarkable for the brilliancy of the red
that mingled with and redeemed the natural brown of
his skin.
His features, lighted by an iron lamp that stood near
him, on a projection of the rough stone wall against
which he leaned, were aquiline and singularly regular
P 2
in their contour. They were noble in their shape and
outline, but their expression, which marks the man
more than the features upon which it is called up, was
decidedly low and sensual, as if the mind that
governed
the face was base and wicked, and the soul that
illumined
it was subtle and suspicious, crafty and
designing
.
They now wore a look of physical pain, rage,
and deep mortification. One arm was suspended in a
sling against his breast, while with the other he
supported
himself as if from bodily weakness. He was
looking forth upon the water, which reflected a
thousand
stars in its sable mirror, seemingly another
Heaven
.
His thoughts were not in the scene; they were
ferociously brooding upon the misery of his own
condition
,
planning vengeance and bloody retribution.
Suddenly the sound of a horse galloping rapidly along
the shore caused him to start, and instantly change
his position so as to command the approach to the
tower
.
Through the gloom he caught a glimpse of a man
on horseback, riding at full speed towards the portal,
but the next moment lost sight of him behind an angle
of the building.
If this be that false traitor De Thoyras, come to
laugh again at my mutilated limb, while he bids me
rise and draw sword to recover Azlie from the
Spaniard
,
by the blood of St. Stephen! he shall die on the
threshold. It is not enough for him that he hath left
me here with two miserable slaves, and, at the head of
my band, gone playing the traitor by siding with this
Ethiopian Renault! What excuse is it that he is only
uniting against this Osma? I would rather be sworn
brother with Osma against the haughty and insufferable
quadroon-slave, than side with him were his sister to
be the price of my alliance! There sounds the horn!
If it be he, he shall die ere he can deliver the first
sentence
.
I have yet a hand remaining that can send a
bullet to a traitor's heart.
Thus speaking, he took up (with his left hand) a
pistol that lay near, and, cocking it with his teeth, stood
with his eye fixed upon the entrance to the hall, and
thus awaited the approach of the visiter, whom he had
commanded his servant to admit. He saw at a glance
that the stranger, whose face was concealed by the
falling
front of his hat, was not De Thoyras. To the
bearing
and height of the intruder, he perceived also that
he was wholly a stranger. Without changing his
hostile
attitude nevertheless, he waited his advance to the
middle of the apartment in silence; and then, in a
stern and menacing tone, demanded his business.
If thou art the young Marquis Caronde, answered
the Count of Osma, firmly, and in a tone to invite
confidence
,
my business lies with thee.
Deliver thy words speedily and begone, for I would
be left alone, answered the young man morosely, nay,
savagely, as if his whole soul was imbittered against
his fellow-men on account of his degrading
dismemberment
.
I pray thee, noble sir, listen to me with patience,
said the count, in a bland and soothing tone of voice;
I know of thy sad loss, and
May thy tongue be torn from thy throat by the foul
fiend! Hast thou come hither to cast it into my teeth!
Nay, pardon my inadvertence; I would discourse
with thee on a matter touching thine own interest, and,
as I well know, thy
revenge!
Out with it, cried Caronde, impatiently.
Wouldst thou have in thy power the man who
and the count completed his sentence with a glance at
his arm.
Would I? am I not human? Askest thou would
I? Ha, ha, ha! and he gave so demoniacal a laugh
that the count stepped back appalled, and the old tower
echoed with it, as if a legion of imps were mocking
and deriding.
I will give thee thy wish!
How?
Which dost thou love to gratify most, thy
vengeance
or thy passion?
Vengeance, such as I meditate on the accursed
slave who hath done this
this!
and he tore his arm
from its sling, and thrust the mutilated stump before
the eyes of the count; who hath
thus maimed a
Caronde
,
swallows up all other feelings, he answered,
with a deep and settled implacability of revenge that
was horrible to contemplate, while it showed how
keenly he felt his condition.
Thou hast loved the sister of thy enemy, asserted,
rather than asked, the count, venturing with caution,
but yet with boldness, upon his subject.
Loved her!
Yes, if that be love which begot
hatred
,
which makes the sister the instrument of revenge,
and, through her infamy, makes the barb of that hatred
triple-edged, and dipped in poison for the brother's
soul! If
this
be love, then Jules Caronde loved the
haughty sister of the quadroon Renault, he said, with
a laugh of derision.
Osma looked upon him with wonder while giving
utterance to these sentiments, and confessed in his
heart that he had found a rival in wickedness. He
seemed now fully to understand with whom he had to
do; and, a degree of kindred feeling inspiring him, he
pursued with less embarrassment the object for which
he had sought the interview.
This is as I would have it! he said to himself,
reflectingly, but so loud as to be heard by the other.
And who art thou that wouldst have things so!
demanded Jules, scornfully and haughtily. Thou
shouldst be a Spaniard by thy complexion and carriage.
Answer me first, Signor Marquis, one question, and
I will tell thee who I am. Wilt thou resign all claim
to the affections of this Azlie for a price!
Am I a slave-merchant? he fiercely demanded;
if I am poor, yet am I noble! By the bright heaven,
there is
a price I would sell her for, soul and body
And that price is
The quadroon Renanlt!
He is thine!
Who art thou, that darest to kindle a hope thou
mayst not have the power to feed with the fuel of
revenge?
I am Garcia of Osma! answered the count,
removing
his sombrero, and throwing back the folds of
his mantle from his breast.
I did half suspect that thou wert he! said Jules,
surveying him with surprise and curiosity. There
is then no mystery between us. Azlie, rumour hath
it, is to be tried on the morrow for her liberty. Had
I the parchments that thou hast obtained from that
female
fiend Ninine, she had been my slave and
mistress
ere this. I need not doubt, Sir Count, what will
be the result of the trial. Yet thy possession of the
sister will not place the brother in my hands
Hands?
demon incarn!
does my own false tongue mock me?
Renault is my prisoner, in keeping for the trial!
observed the count, with a smile.
Thinethy prisoner? interrogated Caronde, with
the most eager interest.
Under a close guard with the beautiful Azlie.
Both are my prisoners.
Thou hast blessed me, count, with these tidings.
Azlie is thine so thou give me the brother!
He shall be placed in thy haI would say in thy
power to-morrow, in the presence of the tribunal that
transfers his sister to mine.
The young man looked an instant into the count's
face with suspicion, to discover if his allusion to his
lost hand had been only accidental, and, being
apparently
satisfied that it was, he said,
Wouldst thou have me appear there, signor, to be
the butt of scornful laughter, of finger-pointing, and
nodding heads?
I have lost, in a most mysterious manner, noble
marquis, the parchment which you heard that I
received
from the quadroone-mother
Lost it! Then are they both
my
slaves by right of
inheritance, he cried, with sudden exultation.
Vengeance
will be doubly mine.
Nay, Signor Marquis, interrupted Osma, with
cutting
coolness, they are, nevertheless, in my power,
not in thine! Thou canst have revenge of neither but
by my will. I am pleased to see that thou dost
consider
my words with patience. In desiring the
possession
of Azlie, thou hast only Renault's pride and
arrogance to humble! Am I right?
My passion for her had its birth in no other
feeling
.
And this would be gratified by degrading the
sister
,
whom the brother, as well as her own ambition,
has elevated above her condition, scorning for her all
beneath honourable and wedded love. Is it not so?
It is.
Then, if this degradation be effected, pursued the
count, and Renault thereby humbled, it will matter
little to thee who is the instrument of it. I swear to
thee thou shalt have thy desire in the result. Wilt
thou give me the sister for the brother?
Hast thou not said that thou hast her already, Sir
Count, as well as the brother? Wherefore do you put
an empty question to me?
It hath this end, answered Osma, coming closer
to him; the loss of the parchment leaves me no
ground for claiming them as my slaves, save by an
open act of power and will. This I do not wish to
exercise in the present state of popular feeling, if I
may bring it about otherwise. Without doubt, Signor
Marquis, the title rests in you from the neglect of your
noble father to record the manumission. It is through
yourself, therefore, that I would have the title come to
me.
Darest thou insult me, Sir Count of Osma, with the
proposition to use me as a tool of thy lust?
Am I not made a tool of thy vengeance?
demanded
the wily Spaniard.
Be it so, answered Jules, after a moment's gaze
at the collected face of the count; and here is my
Sceleret!
the incarnate fiend hath my tongue, he
cried, with a torrent of fearful execrations, hastily
withdrawing the mutilated stump, which he had
involuntarily
and impulsively extended to seal the compact.
The Count of Osma smiled with malicious pleasure.
Then, saying that he would immediately despatch a
party of horse to escort him to the city and to his
palace before midnight, he took his leave of the young
man, and was soon galloping with an exulting spirit
on his return to the town.
If Jules Caronde had entertained any other feelings
than those of deadly revenge against him who had so
terribly mutilated him, a revenge grafted upon years
of previous hatred, he would have borne himself with
the hostile bearing of an enemy towards the new
governor on discovering him in the person of his
visiter
;
or, in promising to enter the city, and place
himself
in his power after the slaughter of his
ambassador
and his body-guard, he would, at least, have
apprehended
treachery and retribution. But he had no
room for any emotion or thought but that which so
completely filled his dark and bitter soul.
Scene Fourth.
The Camanchee Prince and Courreur Chef.
About the same time that Jules Caronde rose from
his restless pallet to gaze from the window upon the
quiet lake, so contrasted in its stillness and repose to
the unquiet of his own bosom, a young man made his
appearance in a turret upon the outer wall of the
island-fortress of the
courreurs du bois
, which was
situated
a league to the north of the lonely tower of
the chasseur chief, in the centre of a broader link of
the same chain of lagoons. His glance was directed
towards the northern outlet of the lake, which, through
a succession of others, ultimately gave egress into the
Mississippi many leagues distant. He listened as if
he expected to hear distant sounds from the water,
and, with a night-telescope, surveyed, long and
intensely
,
the lengthened reach beyond him. A sound
at length arrested his ear. He listened doubtfully
a while, and then spoke to a sentinel near.
Didst thou not hear a sound, like the dashing of
paddles, or the steady rush of barges through the
water?
I have heard it often to-night, Sieur De Thoyras,
answered the man; it is the evening wind bending
the tops of the forest trees on the main as it passes
over them. There, it ripples along the smooth water;
and now I feel it!
You are right, Leroy! answered the young man,
with a tone of disappointment, as the wind blew his
locks about his cheeks.
At this moment Charleval joined him.
If you look up the lake until dawn, De Thoyras,
you will not see your allies. A thousand Camanchee
mounted warriors will scarce row when they can
ride.
The same pirogues that will take them to this
side, will easily enter the inlet to the first of the chain
of lakes, and so reach us with less distance. It is
twenty leagues farther by the shores; and, as the
runner
Lassatchee, on his return, bade us look for them
tonight
,
they will, to get here in time, take water. If
they disappoint us, we must be sacrificed along with
Renault to-morrow, or rescue him.
Did I not tell thee I had once seen this noble
Camanchee
chief, and also the young prince his son,
observed
Charleval. Mark me! He will not
disappoint
us! When, three years ago, he heard that the
Count of Osma had arrived to govern the province
under Spain, he came from his fastnesses, accompanied
by several of his chiefs and by his son, a princely
youth, and in the most distinct terms offered his
services
against the Spaniard should he again return.
Since that period he has kept himself in readiness to
obey our call. From some cause, hostility to Spain
is deeply rooted in his breast. He will not disappoint
us. Lassatchee reports that he received the message
of the arrival of the Spaniards with a kindling eye;
and, forthwith gathering his warriors, bade him
return
,
and say that he would not be long behind him.
When they came here before it was by land,
swimming
the river on horseback. The Camanchee, like the
Arab of the desert, is ever in the saddle, and it will
not be a slight reason that will induce him to exchange
his horse for a barge. Listen! That was a horse's
neigh from the main land! Carondelet and Marigny,
thy two penitent
frres
, De Thoyras, who seek to
atone, by the most vigilant duty now, for their folly in
being led astray by Jules, I have posted on the shore;
Marigny's bugle will give us the signal of their
approach
.
Hark! cried De Thoyras, catching him by the
arm.
And there it sounds, the sweetest music ears ever
listened to, continued Charleval, with gratitude and
triumph. Now, Osma, is the day of thy power
ended.
Ere the notes of the glad bugle which was sounded
from the land ceased to float across the lake,
Charleval
sent back an answering blast that awakened a
thousand echoes from the wooded shores, and caused
five hundred hearts within the fortress to bound with
warlike enthusiasm.
Instantly the whole island-garrison was in life and
motion. Charleval, now the
chef courreur
in
Renault's
place, leaving De Thoyras in command, sprang
into a barge, accompanied by the three remaining
frres
that had followed De Thoyras to Renault's
standard, and whom he had made his lieutenants, and
crossed the lake to the main to meet his allies.
As he left the island, the diminished moon, with
tardy
rising, at length appeared above the trees of the
forest, and, as he approached the shadowy line of the
shore, began to illumine its recesses and penetrate
aslant into its glades. Standing upright in his barge,
with his keen gaze fixed on the gloomy banks, he was
borne towards them with rapid oars. All was still
and motionless along the land; and, as he came nearer,
he began to fear his joy was premature, and that
Marigny had been deceived. At this moment he
discovered
Vol. II.Q
a man on the beach awaiting his landing, and
with a beating heart he sprang to the shore to meet
him.
What tidings, Carondelet? Are they not arrived?
Look along the curving edge of the forest, which,
receding, leaves a wide lawn between it and the lake,
said the young man, the elegance of whose figure was
finely set off by the richness of the chasseur costume
which he wore, conducting him, at the same time, to a
small mound, upon which grew a gigantic and
wide-spreading
oak.
I see nothing.
Dost thou hear nothing?
No.
Yet there are more than a thousand mounted
warriors
lining it. Come with me, Charleval, he added,
laying his hand lightly upon the wrist of his young
friend. Their leader hath just marshalled them there
in covert, as is the practice of these forest warriors;
and now, surrounded by his stately chiefs, awaits your
coming in yonder spot where the moonlight is falling
like silver mist upon the sward.
Charleval followed the poetic Carondelet from the
water, and, crossing the edge of the forest, came
suddenly
upon the left of a line of savage warriors hid
within its shades. Passing in silence along their front,
not without admiration at the barbaric splendour of
their costume and the fierceness of their aspects, he
came to a space in the centre of the wood all open to
the sky, save that a sycamore, towering from the midst,
flung above its hoary arms, between which the moon
made its way in many a broken beam of light.
Beneath
the branches of this tree Charleval discovered a
group of savage warriors, plumed and painted, and
arrayed
in the gorgeous costumes of the chiefs of the
Camanchees, to which his eye was familiar. They
were mounted on fiery horses richly caparisoned; the
skins of wild beasts, that constituted their housings,
dyed scarlet and orange; while gold and silver
ornaments
profusely adorned their bridles, stirrups, and
saddle-bows.
They were seven in number, armed with battle-axes;
and five of them, in addition, carried long-feathered
spears in their hands. The latter were drawn up in
stern silence a few feet in the rear of the remaining
two, as if they formed a guard of honour to their prince
rather than constituted a part of his council. The
chief himself, distinguished by his noble and kingly
bearing, as well as the war-eagle's feather that
adorned
the coronet of barbaric gold, was seated in his
saddle
,
with his face turned towards Charleval, who had
paused to view his countenance ere he proceeded.
The light of the moon shone full upon it, and betrayed
distinctly each lineament, while it, at the same time,
softened the harsher outlines. It was that of a man
nearly sixty years of age. The features were noble,
and he thought of that haughty Castilian character
which he had observed in Spanish nobles of high birth.
Benevolence and firmness pleasingly marked the
expression
of his well-shaped mouth, and a smile of great
sweetness animated his face as he slightly turned his
head to reply to some remark made by the young chief
at his side, in whom Charleval recognised his son.
There was a seriousness stamped on his brow by care
and years till it had assumed the fixed impression of
sternness, to which the bronzed complexion and the
warlike garniture of his temples gave additional
severity
.
Charleval read in his face the preponderance of
the more humane and gentle qualities of mankind over
the savage and vindictive. His carriage was marked
by an air of commanding dignity, that became the
native
majesty of his whole person.
About his neck was a circlet of plain gold, small chains
of silver, and an imposing and barbarous necklace,
composed of talons of eagles and the glittering claws
of beasts of prey: the records of his own personal
achievements in the savage chase. He wore a sort of
surcoat without sleeves, made of the glossy skin of the
panther, bound to his body by a belt of hide fastened with
a rude clasp of virgin gold. His leggins were of
orange-coloured
deer's hide, highly ornamented, with sandals
of the same, elegantly and tastefully wrought with
brilliant beadwork, and his shirt was of mountain
goat-skin
.
Over his shoulders was worn a scarlet mantle
or
ponta
, which fell in graceful folds about his person.
It was garnished with quills of the porcupine, and
bordered
with the long hair of human scalps. His
stirrups
were of solid gold, and his bridle was plated with
the same precious metal. In his hand he held a
shining
battle-axe, which, with a broad two-edged dagger
stuck in his belt, comprised his arms.
The young chief, his son, was mounted on a black
horse of great firmness of limb and matchless beauty
of proportion, whose fiery impatience he could hardly
restrain, yet governing him with that careless
indifference
of touch (beneath which is concealed the mastery
of skill) characteristic of a man to whom the saddle is
a familiar seat. He was not more than seventeen
years of age, yet tall and graceful; shaped like a
youthful
Apollo, remarkable for the natural ease of his
carriage
,
and the unstudied grace of all his movements.
His eye was bright and fearless; his brow open and
ingenuous
;
and the expression of his face, which was
dark but handsome, was resolute and fearless. A
circlet of the plumes of the war-eagle bound his brows,
ornamented with the beak of the kingly bird placed in
front, like the visor to a helm. His black hair was
braided, and hung in long plaits to his saddle, the ends
tied with gay cords of silver thread and tassels. Over
his shoulder was thrown the skin of a young
buffalo-bull
;
and on the soft, white texture of the dressed hide,
which served as an ornamental lining of the shaggy
hide, and of which he ostentatiously displayed
outwardly
as much as could appear, were painted or
emblazoned
in scarlet colours the battles in which, young as
he was, he had already distinguished himself. His
leggins were of the same gay colours; while
gaitermoccasins
of exceedingly beautiful workmanship
covered
his feet and legs. His breast was ornamented
with gold and silver ornaments, and savage necklaces
of birds and tiger's claws; while on his breast hung a
circular shield made of the skin of the bull's neck, on
which were blazoned, singularly enough, the crest of
the house of Osma, as if the young warrior would defy
the Spanish chief on the morrow by the open
appropriation
of his own arms. A quiver and a short bow
were slung at his back; in his belt was stuck a long
dagger; and, like his sire, he carried in his right
hand a naked battle-axe. Near him stood the young
chasseur Marigny.
Ihuahua! the young
courreur
leader is here,
said Carondelet, advancing, and addressing the elder
chief.
On foot? exclaimed the prince, in French,
courteously
dismounting with native politeness; and,
throwing
the rein of his horse to his son, he walked forward
to meet Charleval.
The young man received him with that warmth of
grateful feeling which his prompt coming had inspired.
Then, without losing for him that reverence his age
and commanding presence, as well as his powerful
rank challenged, he entered immediately into the
subject
of the alliance.
Hast thou seen this Count Osma? inquired the
Camanchee warrior, after Charleval had given him, in
answer to question upon question (as if the minutest
detail was to him of the deepest moment), a full and
connected narrative of the circumstances that had
transpired within his knowledge, from the night of the
landing of the Spaniards to that moment; to all of
which he had listened with stern and wondering
attention
.
I have not seen him, Ihuahua. Yet men say he
hath a noble countenance, and looks less the villain
than he is, answered Charleval.
Hath he a daughter who is fair and virtuous, said
you?
Gentle and lovely above her sex, rumour has it.
'Tis a pity; I would it were not so, observed
Q 2
the warrior, with some emotion. Hath he grown
gray?
The count?
Yes, this
count
, he repeated, with a strong
ironical
emphasis on the last word.
I have not yet seen him, prince! answered
Charleval
.
Ah! nono, thou hast not, he answered,
abstractedly
,
and then gave himself up to musing.
Charleval noticed his manner with surprise; but,
not being able to account for it to his satisfaction,
entered
into conversation with the young prince, who
spoke French like a native, until the father should
rouse himself from his deep thought and again address
him. Suddenly Ihuahua turned to him and said, in a
commanding tone,
Conduct me to thy fortress! I would pass the
night with thee. My warriors shall encamp here on
the main, and with the dawn be ready to move
towards
the town. My son Opelouza will accompany
me. These chiefs will also remain with my
warriors
.
Thus speaking, and giving a few orders to his
chieftains
in their own martial tongue, the dignified
warrior
,
accompanied by his son, both leaving their horses
in the charge of their men, followed Charleval to the
beach, and, entering the boat with him, were rapidly
borne across the lake to the fortress.
Scene Fifth.
The Sorceress and the Quadroone-mother.
On
the same eventful eve of St. Michael, ere yet the
moon had risen, the beautiful yet wicked
quadroone-mother
sat alone by the trellised casement of her
chamber
.
The gentle airs from the garden, into which it
opened, came to her through the open lattice laden
with fragrance, and cooled her throbbing temples.
Her brow was as queenly, her noble black eye as
large and lustrous, and her dark, majestic, yet
voluptuous
beauty still as striking as before. Yet thought
was busy as she leaned musingly upon her arm and
looked vacantly into the deep blue of the starry
heaven
.
But her thoughts were not in the direction of her
gaze. She had taken her seat by the window as
twilight
stole over the scene, and insensibly became
meditative
.
Her thoughts, as at that hour they irresistibly
will, soon took a sad and serious complexion, and, ere
she was aware, she found herself acting over again in
imagination the deeds of her guilty life.
She had other cause, too, for sad and gloomy
reveries
.
Renault had cast off the filial reverence which
had hitherto so distinguished him; and, though a
prisoner
in his own house, and daily in her presence,
treated her with cold and stern indifference; within
the hour she had encountered his silent, reproving, yet
contemptuous glance as he passed in and out of her
apartment. Azlie, too, shuddered at her approach,
and avoided her.
Both, indeed, had kept aloof from her during the six
days of their imprisonment, not only to express
thereby
their feelings at her criminal compact with Osma,
but to enjoy each other's society sacred from her
intrusion
.
The safety of the concealed Don Henrique,
as well as the privacy of Estelle's disguised visits to
their little circle, also rendered such retirement
necessary
.
This neglect, by throwing her upon herself and
her own resources, naturally produced in her a morose
and bitter spirit, and at times a melancholy that she
would gladly have banished. She was a guilty
woman
;
and the angel of sadness, which to the good and
virtuous is the parent of gentle devotion, to the bad
and vicious becomes the author of guilty fears, that
fill the remorseful mind with dismal contemplations of
its present state, and offer it dark and menacing
pictures
of the future. As she sat and reflected, her soul
was filled with forebodings she could not shake off.
Thought maddened her.
She remembered, with singular distinctness, among
other reminiscences that forced themselves upon her,
an event of years long passed, as if it had taken place
but yesterday. The more she strove to divest her
mind of this unpleasant current of thought, the more
perseveringly would it flow on again in the same
channel
,
gathering fresh impetus from the temporary
diversion
of its course; till at length, giving way to it, she
experienced a despairing pleasure in indulging the
dark and turbid torrent to its full bent. She
remembered
the timethe hourthe place! Twenty-three
years had passed away, yet the whole was written in
fadeless letters of undying memory upon her mind.
She was then youngbeautifula favoured mistress!
The Marquis de la Caronde adored her, and lavished
upon her the wealth of his heart and his hand. The
Marchioness of Caronde wore only his name. Ninine
held the cords of his will, and governed him as her
caprice pointed. At length the marchioness became a
mother, and the marquis, from paternal pride, paid to
her who had given an heir to his house the respect that
his love had hitherto denied her. Ninine felt the
neglect
and jealousy that now first poisoned her love.
Thrice she attempted the infant boy's life, and thrice
the marquis detected, yet forgave her; for the child
was not many weeks old ere he yielded himself again
captive to her fascinations. A fourth time, when the
boy was half a year old, the shaft was aimed at the
fountain of its nourishment: the subtlest poison that is
was conveyed to the mother in a rose-bud! With the
opening flower, she inhaled the invisible principle of
death. Like that flower, she faded and soon died.
But the boy lived. The father's suspicions were
aroused, and he removed him secretly to a
foster-mother
.
Yet his love for the siren who had thrown
about him her fatal net was stronger than his horror at
the crime. In vain she set on foot every secret
inquiry
.
She was unable to discover the infant; and, in a
few months afterward, becoming herself a mother, in
the joy of that event forgot the cause of her disquiet.
But ambition soon enthroned itself in her soul. She
now aspired to the title and estates of the father for her
illegitimate son. Her hatred to the true heir was again
revived, and she gave herself no rest, night or day, in
her desire to discover his retreat. At lengthfor
what will not jealousy, envy, and ambition, united in a
woman's heart, accomplish?when her own boy was
two years old, she discovered the object of her search,
now a fine child nearly three years of age. It was
found by one of her hirelings many leagues in the
interior
.
She had him secretly brought to her. The
two boys were wonderfully like each other, both
bearing
their father's looks. Hers, being tall for its age,
although nearly a year younger, was equal with the
other in height. Suddenly this resemblance
suggested
a thought upon which she immediately acted. The
box of poisoned sweetmeats she had prepared to give
the child was cast aside, and, drawing it to her, she
taught it to call her Ma. Her own son she sent
back to the hamlet in his stead, knowing that the
marquis
had not seen his child for a year, and would
easily
be deceived by the likeness between the two, while
the alteration that he would discover when he should
visit him would be attributed to the natural effect of
time and growth; and, lest the face of the other should
betray her, she guardedly kept him out of his sight
until she could present him without suspicion. At
length, satisfied, from her manner (studied to bring
about this very result, and establish, without farther
uncertainty, her object), that Ninine would not harm
him, he sent for the son of the marchioness, now four
years of age, and received to his arms instead that of
the quadroone.
Such was the field over which the
quadroone-mother's
thoughts ranged as she sat by the window. She
had often sighed; but it was because she did not find
the fulfilment of her ambitious hopes in her son a
reward
sufficient to compensate her for her guilt.
With the embrace with which he received the child,
the marquis had detected the deception she had put
upon him. But he remained silent upon the subject,
though she suspected his knowledge of it even up to
the day of his death. But, so long as he winked at
her wickedness, which he did, perhaps, either from fear
of her poisoning the true heir, or on account of the
blindness of his attachment to her, she paid no regard
to his knowledge of it, and, with a feeling of security
in her guilt, continued to feed ambitious hopes for her
son; and thus, until the day of their father's death,
did these two brothers grow up to manhood, nature
alone making the just distinction between the base coin
and that which was of the legitimate ore.
The thoughts of the quadroone-mother still flowed
on, downward the tide of time, and unsparing
memory
again held the mirror of the past to her mental
gaze.
She remembered that, fourteen years before, she was
walking through the slave-mart, when a beautiful
female
child, scarcely three years old, held in the lap of
a tall, stern woman, arrested her eye; that, pleased
with its infantine beauty, she purchased both mother and
child, and took them to her dwelling. That, at length,
as the child grew in beauty, she conceived the thought
of adopting it as her own, and by the refinements of
education fitting her to be the companion even of
princes; so that, through her promised loveliness,
when her own charms and power should fail, and her
favour with the marquis be diminished, she might live
again in her
protge
, and by her powerful alliance
hold the consideration and rank her ambition coveted.
She remembered how the child's mother doted upon
it; how she refused to resign it from her own devoted
care to hers; and how, fearing her for a secret
power
she possessed over her mind, she at length gave
her to drink of an herb, the property of which is to
drive those who take it to seek self-destruction in the
water.
As Ninine recalled the wild shrieks of the woman
rushing forth at midnight to plunge into the river, they
seemed to come again with startling distinctness to her
ears; shuddering, she stopped them and hid her eyes,
as if to shut out from every sense the fearful curse
upon the murderess with which her victim's last cries
were mingled. But in vain. The curse was repeated
sterner and closer to her ear, as uttered by a living
voice. She looked up. 'Twas not imagination!
It was real!
The murdered woman stood before
her, and a deep and solemn curse, thrice repeated, as
she heard it fourteen years before, fell from her lips.
The murderess gazed upon this appearance from the
dead with mortal horror in her glazed stare, with parted
lips, and with the fixed and rigid immobility of stone.
The sorceress stood contemplating her a moment
with a steady look of contempt, and a triumphant
smile in her eyes, which showed it to be a moment of
the most gratifying exultation to her. At length she
spoke:
Woman, dost thou remember me?
Ninine slowly brought her hands together, and
clasped the fingers supplicatingly; then sinking to her
knees with a pallid countenance, in which awe, and
fear, and remorse were blended, twice in vain essayed
to move her bloodless lips in reply.
What hast thou done with her I left with thee?
demanded the sorceress, in a stern voice.
Sheshe isis here! faintly articulated Ninine.
She is thine!
Thou wicked woman! I know thy guilt and thy
acts of iniquity, and have watched over the child thou
wouldst have made the victim of thy ambitious heart!
Repent thee of thy crimes, for thy hour is near!
Mercy, mercy, dread being!
Didst thou remember mercy when the maiden
pleaded to thee? demanded the sorceress, with
reproving
sternness.
Mercy, mercy! thou spirit of another world! she
repeated, with unsubdued terror.
Be thou in the hall of trial on the morrow to
answer
truly what may be required of thee, and thou
mayst have space for repentance.
I will answer even to my own hurt, if thou wilt give
me hope of mercy in Heaven!
Mercy in Heaven ask thy priests for, she
answered
,
derisively. Mercy on earth I alone promise
thee.
This will give me space for obtaining Heaven's; I
will obey thee.
Know that thou art there to assert thine own
dishonour
.
Wilt thou go?
I will.
To publish thine own infamy! Wilt thou go?
I will, dread being!
Then farewell till we meet in the Judgment Hall.
With this parting salutation, spoken in a warning
tone of voice, the sorceress disappeared as suddenly as
she had appeared, and left the quadroone-mother to
reflect
upon an event which, to her guilty and
superstitious
soul, seemed to have been directed by the anger of
an avenging Heaven, and portended sudden and just
retribution
.
That she had seen an inhabitant of the
world of spirits was the deep and abiding impression
upon her mind, already by its previous train of thought
fully open to the reception of supernatural influences.
CHAPTER XV.
ST. MICHAEL'S DAY.SCENE IN THE JUDGMENT HALL.
The
sun rose on the morning of St. Michael's day
with unclouded splendour, kindling a thousand steel
points that bristled in the Place d'Armes, and dying
with deeper red the crimson banners of Spain, which,
bordered with gold, and gay with silken fringes, flaunted
above the heads of squadrons of cuirassiers and
lancers
,
and long lines of heavy men-at-arms. The
whole Spanish force was under arms, and in battle
array before the hall of council. The Count of Osma,
in the magnificent uniform of commanding-general,
mounted on his sable warhorse, and accompanied by
all his staff and aids save Montejo, rode along their
line with a proud eye and triumphant bearing. It
was near the hour for the sitting of the tribunal; and,
as he galloped across the Place d'Armes, reviewing
his troops with the pride of a soldier, he was weighing
in his mind the chances of an attack upon them from
the citizens, who, as the time of the trial approached,
began to evince a deep and ominous feeling of
sympathy
for the prisoners, which he felt was not to be
slighted
.
All the streets of the city seemed to have disgorged
their throngs into the square. It was on every side
surrounded with a dense multitude of citizens waiting
the hour of trial, and only kept back from the
council-chamber
by the presence of the military, and a strong
guard placed at every avenue of approach. It was
Osma's
hour of triumph. The calm and settled
vindictiveness
of his looks betrayed his consciousness that he
held his own judgment in his own hands, while the
scorn with which he surveyed the imposing display he
had made for the trial told that he felt it was to be but
a masquerade of justice, and that he looked upon the
whole as an amusing pageant, to which he had
consented
to gratify his vanity and manifest his power, while
it should make more signal and public the degradation
and infamy both of Renault and Azlie.
At ten o'clock the roar of artillery announced the
opening of the tribunal; and Osma, with his aids and
chief officers, dismounting from their horses, entered
the government-house and ascended to the Hall of
Council. With a haughty port, he preceded them
through files of men-at-arms; and, entering the
chamber
of the tribunal by a side door, advanced towards
the forum where sat the six judges in their sable robes
and badges of office. He took a seat upon a sort of
state chair on the right of it, yet so much lower that
he seemed rather a spectator than an actor in the
coming
scene. The Moor stood like a statue behind him,
and Estelle, with anxious solicitude, trembling between
Vol. II.R
hope and fear, sat by his side. In a few moments
after
he was seated, the wide doors of the hall were
thrown open, and the populace, rushing in, soon filled
the vast chamber to overflowing.
Reggio, the
alfarez real
, and one of the members of
the
cabildo
, was its president. After a deep and
expectant
silence had prevailed over the hall for a few seconds,
he rose, and proclaiming, in a loud voice, the object of
the extraordinary sitting of the tribunal, commanded
the accuser to stand forth and be confronted with the
accused.
The Count of Osma rose from his chair with a
derisive
smile of conscious power, and was about to
advance
to the front of the tribunal, when his glance
rested
on the advancing figure of the sorceress, who, with
her eyes fixed upon him, was making her rapid way
across the space between the tribunal and the door in
the direction of the spot where he stood. Before he
could give utterance to any command in relation to her,
she was already at his side, and had whispered in his
ear, in a low tone,
There be two Indian warriors without, a chief and
his son, accompanied by a young man, who would
witness
the trial, an' it please my Lord of Osma, she said,
rather imperatively than as if seeking a favour.
Let them enter and stand near the forum, he
answered
,
in a loud voice. This is no private matter;
'tis not the first trial on record a master hath had to
prove his right to his own slaves. Know, citizens, I
have consented to this from my love of justice and
respect
for the laws.
In a few seconds she reappeared, conducting the
stately warrior Ihuahua, the prince his son, and
Charleval
,
who, save a sword at his side, was in the dress of
a creole citizen. When the emotion excited by the
sudden appearance of this party had subsided, and they
had taken a place near the tribunal opposite to Osma,
Reggio again called upon the accuser and accused to
stand before the forum. Osma, with dignified ease,
advanced
in front of the judgment seat, the eye of the
warrior chief the while fixed upon him with an
eagle-like
and searching glance. At the same instant, from
one of the long Venetian windows that opened upon the
corridor, guarded by a file of Spanish soldiers, appeared
Renault, with Azlie supported upon his arm. His
carriage
was haughty and calm, and as he met the eye of
Osma his own flashed back defiance. Azlie was pale,
yet firm; and from the serene yet devotional aspect of
her countenance, and the repose of her manner, it
would seem she had a hope to sustain her above despair
even in that fearful hour. After a moment's silence,
the judge, turning to the count, asked,
Dost thou claim the prisoners here arraigned as
thy slaves?
I do, answered he, boldly.
On what legal ground? demanded Reggio,
looking
at the people while he spoke rather than at the
count, as if he was willing that they should see how
bold justice could be, even with so high a party at its
bar.
On that of a deed of manumission, signors, given
to their mother by the Marquis of Caronde, which, not
being recorded in the public archives, but placed by
him instead in the freed woman's hands who had been
his slave, gave her the power over her own liberty and
that of her issue. This parchment has been
transferred
to me by the mother, and with it the surrender of
her own freedom and that of her children.
Renault smiled haughtily while the count was
speaking
,
who, on his part, with malicious pleasure, secretly
marked his confident demeanour, supposing it to be
grounded on his knowledge of the loss of the
parchment
to which he alluded, only the lower to sink his
hopes when he should find the equivalent resource he
had at command.
Produce this instrument, my lord, said Reggio.
He may not, Sieur Reggio, said Renault, taking
a folded parchment from his breast, and holding it
unrolled
before the tribunal. This is the instrument of
my sister's liberty and my own, on which our accuser
would found our servitude; and
thus
do I make myself
and her for ever free.
With these energetic words he rent the paper in
fragments and cast them at his feet. A murmur of
surprise and pleasure ran through the multitude, which
Osma, with a voice of thunder, silenced by calling on
the
alguazil mayor
, who had ushered in the prisoners,
to lead in Jules, marquis of Caronde. Renault's
heart leaped to his throat, and Azlie could scarcely
repress a shriek at this command.
In the midst of breathless expectancy, the chasseur
chief, pale and invalid, with his right arm in a sling,
entered the hall and sat down in a chair to which Osma
conducted him, placed near his own.
There is yet one otherthe quadroone-mother!
said the count, turning to Reggio; and Ninine, with
looks that showed she had not forgotten her visit from
the sorceress, while she obeyed the command of Osma,
who had summoned her to attend in order to confront
Jules before the tribunal, was led in by the
alguazil
mayor
.
Now, signors, said the count to Reggio and the
judges, first question this woman of this parchment.
Wert thou once the slave of the Marquis of
Caronde
?
asked Reggio, with courtesy, playing subtly
his given part in the trial.
Yes, she answered, without lifting her eyes, and
with so much embarrassment that Osma glanced
towards
her sharply, as if he expected her to commit
herself in some way. But she thought not of him or
his interests now. The fear of what was to follow
from the threats of the sorceress alone occupied her
mind.
Did he draw, and then sign and seal for thee a bill
of manumission for thyself and children?
He did, signor.
Did he record it?
He gave it to me, signor.
Didst thou file it in the archives?
No, I kept it, signor.
And afterward transferred it to the Count of Osma
was it not so?
I did, signor.
Thou and thy children are then his slaves by this
act?
My children alone, signor. I have been
manumitted
by another instrument under his hand and seal.
Thou dost acknowledge, then, thy son Renault and
thy daughter Azlie to be the slaves of the Lord of
Osma?
I do, signor, she said, at first hesitating, but
instantly
answering on meeting the fixed glance of Osma.
Now, Signor Reggio, said the count, with a smile,
addressing the judges, having shown your tribunal
that I had once a clear and lawful right to hold the
prisoners in bondage, and all present having witnessed
the destruction of the instrument on which alone I
founded this right, it remains that the prisoners be
acquitted
as freed man and freed woman, unless, by a
claim equally well-grounded, I can a second time prove
my right to their servitude.
To these words Renault and Azlie listened, now
with hope when he mentioned acquittal, then with
poignant despair when he alluded to a new ground on
which to base his claim to hold them in bondage.
They instinctively cast their eyes towards the
implacable
Jules, in whose fierce countenance they too plainly
read the solution of Osma's words, and divined the
instrument
through which he was a second time to aim
at their freedom.
This argument is conclusive, said Reggio. If
you have farther evidence to substantiate your claim,
my lord, may it please you to produce it.
I pray you, my lord marquis, said Osma,
addressing
Jules, present your claim before the tribunal.
Jules rose, and, supporting himself with his
remaining
hand on the arm of the chair, said in a low tone,
that was expressive of the bitter vindictiveness which
had brought him to the hall of judgment,
Signors, as the only son and heir to the title and
R 2
French estates of the late Marquis of Caronde, and in
absence of any evidence to prove the manumission of
the prisoners Renault and Azlie, I hereby claim them
as my slaves by virtue of my father's purchase of the
mother, and according to the letter and spirit of our
laws. Last night I discovered among his papers this
bill of sale, dated twenty-three years back, of the
quadroone
Ninine, properly attested and sealed, which will
prove my claim.
With these words he presented a paper to Reggio,
who, after examining and returning it to him, said, as
if surprised at this turn of the trial,
This instrument, my lord marquis, confirms your
right beyond dispute.
This right, then, said Jules, I here transfer to
the Lord of Osma!
With these words he placed the paper in the hands
of the count, and turning, with a hideous smile of
anticipated
vengeance, his vindictive glance towards
Renault
,
sat down again, wearied with the effort he had
made.
Renault listened to the statement of his deadly foe
with growing horror, and heard the decision of the
Alfarez real
as if a thunderbolt had burst upon his
head. But he felt not for himself. Azlie had sunk
upon her knees beside him, and was looking
pleadingly
,
eloquently, and imploringly up into his face. He
knew what she meant. He knew that all hope was
past; yet he could nothe
could not strike the blow!
His hand was in his bosom upon a dagger which he
had concealed therebut he could not
draw it!
Osma
now advanced towards them with the confident and
exulting
step of triumphant wickedness. The crisis was
imminent. The weapon was half drawn from its
covert
,
when the sorceress, who had been seemingly an
unconcerned spectatress of all that had passed, stepped
between the count and his victims.
Stand there! Garcia Ramarez, she cried,
commandingly
.
Renault, hold thy hand. My lords
judges
!
I
have evidence to bring in this matter.
Woman
,
she added, addressing the trembling Ninine, and
speaking in a commanding tone, that filled the house
and thrilled the blood of all who heard it, now give
thy testimony, in truth, as thou hopest for mercy and
fearest retribution!
Ninine fell upon her face before the tribunal, and
clasped her hands in despair, yet deprecatingly.
Is this young man thy son? Speak truth, as thou
hopest for salvation! cried the sorceress, laying her
hand upon Renault.
No. He is the son of the Marchioness of
Caronde
.
Is yonder young man thy son? she demanded,
pointing to Jules, who had already sprung to his feet.
He is, dread being!
And thou didst transpose the one for the other in
their childhood, and thus deceive the Marquis of
Caronde
?
Speak truth!
I did, answered Ninine, irresistibly, wholly
overcome
at this wonderful knowledge of a secret which
she had believed locked in her own bosom, not
knowing
that her thoughts were audible as she sat at her
casement the evening before.
'Tis false! shouted Jules; and, in the fierceness
of his indignant rage, he bounded towards her,
seeking
,
with his mutilated arm, the grasp of a sword-hilt
at his side.
Instantly recalled to the loss of his hand, he uttered
a volley of curses; and, maddened even more than by
the disclosure of Ninine, he literally stamped and
foamed
with fury at this abortive attempt to grasp his sword.
Even Osma, though at such a moment, could not
forbear
giving him a look of malicious pleasure.
Here's a hand to help thee, gossip Jules! cried
the shrill voice of Gobin; and, with the words, a
withered
human hand fell upon the floor at the phrensied
creole's feet.
He turned deadly pale, and, staggering backward,
was compelled to support himself by the balustrade of
the tribunal.
What means this, signora? asked the count of
the quadroone-mother, with stern surprise.
That I speak the truth, my lord.
She but seeks to make her bastard son noble, my
lords and judges, cried Jules, with deep wrath,
turning
to the tribunal. There is no proof, my lords!
While he was speaking, there was heard a general
exclamation of surprise from the populace, occasioned
by the entrance of the venerable Father Dagobert,
vicar-general of the province, in his full and flowing
canonical robes, who, with great dignity, slowly
advanced
towards the tribunal. The judges rose at his
approach, and even Osma and Jules Caronde felt awed
at his presence. He was accompanied by two
Carmelite
monks, in their tawny-coloured scapulars of
serge, with girdles and sandals.
My lord vicar, I did leave thee in Cuba a month
since, said Osma, courteously; I welcome thee
back.
My lords and judges, said the vicar-general, after
the excitement caused by his presence had in a degree
subsided, I have intruded into this court to bear
testimony
to the evidence already delivered by this
quadroone
woman, which I have listened to from the
anteroom
!
Does your reverence mean to prove that she hath
spoken truth? asked Reggio, with astonishment.
Hear my testimony, and judge! When I was on
the eve of embarking for Cuba, the late Marquis of
Caronde, being on his deathbed, sent for me to confess
and give him absolution. In his confession, be
declared
,
by his hopes of Divine mercy, that the young man
called Renault the Quadroon was his legitimate son by
the marchioness his wife, and the young man, known
as Jules Caronde, was his son by the quadroone
Ninine
.
'Tis a foul lie, lord vicar! cried Jules.
There was a general murmur of pious horror at this
impious assertion, while Reggio and the judges started
from their seats with astonishment.
Nay, son, thou hast forgotten thyself, said
Father
Dagobert, mildly. This is to thee a bitter
truth!
I challenge proof! demanded the degraded young
man. St. Peter himself should not prove this
damning
charge on his own assertion!
I forgive thee, my son, for thou hast reason for
bitterness
.
The sin be with those who have done this
thing, said the vicar-general, looking sternly at
Ninine
,
who knelt in silence and despair before the
tribunal
.
With these words he drew from the folds of his
vesture a sealed parchment. Then addressing the
judges, he continued,
In the midst of my lord marquis's confession,
respected
signors, he took from his pillow this paper,
sealed with his own private signet, and, saying that it
was a full confession, under his own hand, of his
being
a party to such great injustice, desired me to make
such use of it for the advantage of the true heir as,
with reverence for his own memory, I should see fit;
taking from me, at the same time, a most solemn
promise
to see his son restored to his hereditary right. The
ship that was to bear me to Cuba was already under
sail, and I hastened on board. I returned but half an
hour since in a barque that hath arrived from the
Havanna
;
and, hearing of this trial, hastened hither to
save the innocent and confound the guilty.
Reggio received the pacquet, and, examining the
seals, held it towards Jules, on whose finger was his
father's signet with which the impression on the wax
had been made, and demanded if that was his father's
seal. The young man was silent from conviction;
and Reggio, at the command of the vicar-general,
broke the three seals, and read aloud the confession,
written in his own hand, of the marquis, to the facts
stated by the vicar-general. After accusing Ninine
the Quadroone of the guilty acts charged to her, he
prayed that, although, through a criminal weakness, he
could not bring himself to punish her, he trusted she
would be brought by a just tribunal to the punishment
her crimes merited.
There remains now, said Reggio, after the
surprise
created by the reading of his confession had
subsided
,
two points to be made clear. The first is, the
authenticity of the handwriting; and the second, the
truth of the confession of the accused party, Ninine.
Is this your father's handwriting? he demanded of
Jules.
The young man made no reply; but its genuineness
was proved by comparison, in addition to the
testimony
of the vicar-general, with other authentic
instruments
written with his own hand. Art thou guilty
of the charge of which thy late lord and master hath
charged thee? he then demanded of Ninine.
Guilty, she gasped rather than articulated.
Dost thou swear, in the presence of Heaven, that
Renault the Quadroon is the son of the Marchioness
Caronde?
I swear.
Dost thou swear, in the presence of Heaven, that
Jules, known as the Marquis of Caronde, is thine own
son?
I do.
My Lord of Osma, said Reggio, with the
decision
and coolness he had exhibited to the count
throughout
,
and whom he had made to feel that himself was
judge there, and not he, this seems the clearest
testimony
.
Have you aught to say against it?
Nothing, so that it bear not against the maiden,
though by it I lose a slave; and, he added, ironically,
turning to Jules, my friend here a marquisate.
Dost thou mock me? demanded Jules, fiercely.
Nay, being thy mother's son, thou art my slave,
and I cannot mock thee, answered Osma, with
derision
,
exulting with the malice of a bad man in the
wretchedness of his late partner in guilt.
Thy
slave, proud count! Neither is thy slave!
cried the sorceress, sternly. Jules Caronde, behold
thy master! she commandingly added, pointing to
Renault.
Jules ground his teeth, and the count, with a laugh,
turned on his heel, while the sorceress, with her
withered
finger still stretched towards Renault, kept her
full eye upon the writhing features of the chasseur
chief.
Renault had heard the testimony of the
vicar-general
,
listened to the reading of the confession and to
the subsequent opinion of the judges, with silent
amazement
and incredulity, which each moment gave way to
the full head of proof that met his doubts: doubts not
because the evidence was weak, but that the truth was
too great for his belief. At length he felt the
confirmation
of his true position, and with proud and
grateful
feelings bent over Azlie to congratulate her,
forgetting
,
in the moment of his own triumph and honours,
that she was no longer his sister. Her looks of
sorrow
and despair instantly recalled him to the painful
consciousness that she was not included in his change
of condition. She would have withdrawn herself from
his manful and brotherly shelter, but he held her to his
heart and whispered,
Nay, sweet sister! I am still thy brotherstill
Renault to thee.
I am thy slave, Renault!
Never! no, never!
At this moment an individual, who had some time
stood within hearing, wrapped in a cloak and wearing
his hat low over his brows, stepped up, and, pressing
Renault's hand, said, in a low tone of voice,
I congratulate thee, my noble marquis! Thy place
here is now better supplied by me, he added,
receiving
the hand of Azlie from that of Renault.
It is the opinion of this tribunal, now said
Reggio
,
rising with dignity, that Renault, lately called the
Quadroon, is the rightful heir of the late Marquis of
Caronde, and can, therefore, be no slave; but, on the
other hand, is a free citizen and a noble-born
gentleman
.
At these words Estelle instinctively gave utterance
to a cry of joy, and in the presence of the whole
assembly
rushed forward, half way met by Renault, and
was clasped to his true and manly heart.
S'death! This is a fair scene! exclaimed the
count, amid the general surprise. Love hath been
at hide and seek in my palace!
If my Lord of Osma, continued the judge, after
a moment's pause, presses the claim, Jules, lately
known as the Marquis Caronde, may be clearly proven
to be his slave, inasmuch as he now stands in the
position
the most noble Renault, marquis of Caronde,
so lately occupied. Is it your pleasure to urge this
point, my lord?
Before Osma could give the reply that rose to his
lips, the disgraced Jules, who for the last few moments
had been fixing his eyes upon his kneeling and
wretchedly
guilty mother, with an expression in which was
concentrated all his fierce wrath against her, suddenly
leaped forward like a wild beast, and with his left hand
seized her by the throat. His clutch was like that of
the tiger fixed in the flesh of its victim. She became
instantly livid in the face, and her eyes were forced
out. The first joints of his fingers were hid by the
depth and strength of his pressure. Osma caught his
wrist, but the hand was immoveable, and his hold upon
the throat deadly as his vindictive energy.
By Heaven! loose thy clutch, madman, cried the
count, or I will sever thy hand like its fellow with a
blow of my sword.
The only reply he received was a demoniacal and
glaring stare, that convinced him madness had taken
the seat of reason. He forbore the blow, and with
the assistance of Renault and the
alguazil mayor
,
finally
succeeded in tearing him from his mother.
She was already dead! He had broken her neck.
By the command of Osma, he was instantly dragged
forth from the hall to a place of confinement, while
the body of the unfortunate and guilty woman was
removed
.
It was followed by the tearful eyes both of
Azlie and Renault; for to the one she was still a
mother, and to the other she had ever been as one.
The sorceress, to whom the appearance of the
vicar-general
,
thus controlling the subsequent progress of
events, was an incident unlooked for, now approached
Don Henrique, and said warmly,
Did I not bid thee keep within the crowd? Leave
the maiden to me. Osma's eye is already arrested
by thy guise!
The young man obeyed; and, when the count
approached
to demand who he was, was already lost in
the throng, while the sorceress remained by Azlie,
sustaining her with one arm about her waist. Ere
the count spoke to the maiden, as it appeared to be
his intention to do, he suddenly addressed the Father
Dagobert, who was standing near by, now a spectator
only.
Hast thou, my lord vicar, asked he,
sarcastically
,
any confessions touching this gentle quadroone,
that I may not take her to mine own palace as my
slave?
None, my lord, save those I fear thou wilt with
sorrow make in thy death-hour, if thou doest the
wrong thou contemplatest in this matter, answered
the vicar-general, with fearless reproof.
I am my own conscience-keeper, priest, retorted
the count, with haughty displeasure, turning from him
towards Azlie. Fiend! he said, as his eye fell on
the shielding form of the sorceress, thou art ever
crossing my path like an evil omen. Transfer the
maiden to me, and stand aside!
Touch her not, Garcia Ramarez!
I will have thee seized.
I laugh at thy power.
Resign thy charge!
Wouldst thou receive her as thy slave or thy
mistress
,
noble governor? she scornfully demanded,
without
moving.
Is she not my slave now?
Ay,
more
to thee than thy slave, Garcia of
Osma
,
Vol. II.S
she replied, while the deepest meaning seemed
to speak out at her eyes, as they rested upon his face.
What is thy meaning, woman, he demanded, with
the quick suspicion of some covert design.
Thou shalt soon learn!
She then waved her hand commandingly towards
the tribunal, to the immediate actors in the scene
before
it, and to the whole assembly. Having by this act
drawn the attention of every eye in the vast hall, she
drew herself to her utmost height, and rested her gaze
full upon the face of the Count of Osma, with
something
of the expression with which the inquisitor
watches the countenance of his victim while he is
inflicting
the torture.
My Lord of Osma! listen to the story of a
Spanish
knight I have to tell thee. 'Tis eighteen years
ago that a youthful noble of Castile was taken
prisoner
by the Moors and carried captive to Morocco. The
emperor compelled him to labour in the gardens of his
palace; and his occupation was to draw water from
the marble fountains to wet the plants that grew
around the latticed windows of the harem. The
emperor
had an only daughter. I see thou art listening
to me, governor!
Go on, said Osma, with interest.
She was fair as the lily when the snow-cloud
lingers
between it and the sun; as gentle as the dove; as
beautiful in limb as the antelope; and as fleet as the
mountain roe. Her voice was the rival of the
nightingale
;
and her spirits were gay and happy as the
heart of the morning lark when he mounts upward,
singing, as he goes, to welcome the sun. Her hair
was jetty as night; and from the shadow of the curls
that floated above her brow, her eyes shone out like
twin-stars, inviting to a heaven of love. Dost thou
listen, Count of Osma?
I do; I pray thee go on!
From her lattice she saw the youthful knight, and
he found favour in her eyes for his beauty and
misfortunes
.
From day to day she gazed on him unseen,
till love at length stole away her heart. She sought
him in the garden and told her love. Evening after
evening they met in the olive-bower of Asmil; and to
the falling of distant fountains, the music of the
nightingale
,
and the sighing of zephyrs laden with
perfumes
,
they loved, and discoursed of love, even until
the tints of the morning tinged the rosy orient. At
length the young princess secretly became the bride
of the young Castilian knight, none save the priest of
Mohammed and her faithful slave being present. She
now proposed his escape, and to fly with him. The
hour came for the midnight flight, and
he betrayed her!
The mourning Zillah was left desolate! The husband
of her hand and heart, the idol of her soul, had proved
false and unworthy the pearl of her princely love!
Dost thou listen, count?
He silently waved his hand for her to proceed, as if
he dared not trust himself to speak, while the most
absorbing and anxious interest was apparent in every
feature.
From that hour she drooped. Her faithful slave
at length proposed that she should seek him in his own
lordly halls, accuse him of his perfidy, avenge her
wrongs by his presence, and then die at his feet.
They reached, at length, the shores of Castile, and
came one stormy night to the castle of her
treacherous
lord. It beetled over the sea, was crowned with
majestic towers, and encompassed by high and stately
walls. From every window and casement blazed a
light. It was a festal night, and on St. Michael's eve!
They landed weary, yet full of hope, and entered the
wide gates of the castle with a crowd of guests. They
moved on, and came to a vast hall hung with banners
and armour. Knights and nobles, dames and
maidens
,
were gathered there, and every eye was fixed with
interest upon a group standing before an altar. She
saw that it was a bridal group. The priest was
reading
aloud the service, and the bridegroom and bride
were standing before him, with hand clasped in hand.
In the former Zillah beheld him she sought. Rushing
forward, she shrieked, `my husband!' and fell at his
feet senseless. The ceremony ceased; but the
bridegroom
,
instantly recognising in the princess his wife,
sternly commanded his servants to bear off the mad
woman, and cast her forth into the storm, and then he
calmly bade the rite proceed. Dost thou hear the tale,
my lord? she asked, fixing upon him her full, dark
gaze.
He was silent; but, with compressed lips and glassy
eyeballs, kept his eyes upon her, as if they were
fixed by a spell.
Her faithful slave, continued the sorceress, bore
her from the outer gate, where the menials had cast
her, to a hut on the forest's edge. There, before
morning, she gave birth to an infant daughter, and left
it her own spirit. The poor peasants dug a grave for
her, and she was buried the next night, alone and
unwept
,
save by her devoted slave, who then took the
child to the castle of its father, that he might take pity
on it; for she feared the innocent would perish in her
arms. As she approached the gate, he came forth
with horse, and hound, and horn. With the child in her
arms, she stood in his path. He recognised the slave,
and she told him the fate of his wife, and implored
him to cherish her child. The sight of the infant
inflamed him with rage and shame as he rode in
the midst of his friends, and, with a curse upon them
both, he set his hounds upon her to hunt her down.
She escaped from them barely with her life to a
lonely
hamlet. There an assassin sent by him found her;
but by her arts and power she escaped, and bound his
soul to fear; and he spared the child. There long she
hid herself, and became as a mother to this hapless
daughter of a Moorish princess, and heiress of a noble
Castilian name. I see thou dost listen to my tale, Sir
Count!
When the babe was two years old, she took the
long-maturing resolution to avenge its mother's death,
even with the life of its cruel father. She sought him in
his castle, but learned he was on a foreign battle-field.
She followed him from land to land, and from sea to
sea, and at length took ship for Cuba, whither she
heard he had sailed. But she was taken captive by a
pirate ere she reached the island, brought to this port,
and exposed openly for sale in the market-place.
Fearing lest the child should be taken from her, she
called it her own. At length, the mistress of the
governor
,
Ninine the Quadroone, became her purchaser;
and by-and-by, struck with the child's beauty,
attempted
the life of the supposed mother, that she might
make it her own, contemplating the wealth and
consideration
her charms would bring her when she should
grow into the bloom of girlhood. Her victim,
however
,
escaped the death designed for her, and, feeling
secure of the child's safety for the present, returned to
her own country to gather wealth for this beloved
daughter of her deceased mistress. But slavery and
disaster detained her from the beloved child until a
few days before thy arrival hither, Count of Osma,
when she found all her watchful care was necessary to
save her from wicked persecutors, whom her
unfolding
beauties had made enemies to her peace and
honour
.
I have now done. Does the tale interest thee?
Does it please thine ear?
Osma continued for a moment gazing upon her
after
she had ceased speaking; while the Moor Sulem,
no less interested in her tale, showed by his
countenance
he had found the key to her mystery. The
count, then starting, as if from a fearful dream, caught
her by both wrists, and cried, with an impetuosity that
was fearful, while his eyes, averted from her, were fixed
upon the beautiful, pale, wondering face of Azlie,
Tell me, fearful woman! Is this my childis
she my daughter? Speak!
Behold her mother's picture! she answered,
taking
from Azlie the locket she had before given to
her, and exhibiting to him the likeness of a lovely
Moorish
princess in the richest costume of her country.
He gazed upon it with a look of startling
recognition
,
S 2
and then glanced from it to the face of the
maiden
.
To every eye the resemblance was perfect.
Didst thou not once give that miniature to Zillah,
thy Moorish bride? asked the sorceress, sternly,
seeing
that he evidently bore reluctant testimony in his
heart to the truth of her tale.
If it be the same, it has a miniature of myself
within it.
Give it me, cried the sorceress.
She touched a spring, and the locket opened,
exposing
within a likeness of a young cavalier, to which
the Count of Osma still bore a striking resemblance.
He made no reply, but rapidly walked the space in
front of the tribunal in troubled thought, while shame
and disappointment, rather than remorse and paternal
love, kindled his cheek. His troubled eye rested often
on Estelle, pale and almost lifeless in the arms of
Renault
.
To acknowledge Azlie as his daughter would
be to repudiate Estelle. His love gave excuse for his
undiminished passion for the Quadroone, and he came
to a characteristic decision.
Thy story is false, thou Moorish impostor! a stale
invention, begotten by thy ambition to see thy offspring
received among the noble. Ho, guards! Seize her!
Bear her off, and answer for her forthcoming with
your heads!
Algauzil mayor!
I commit this maiden
to your custody! If thou valuest thy neck, see to
her safety. This masquerade hath lasted full long. I
will now play the governor and judge. Sit back with
thy fellows, Signor Reggio. I will take my seat again,
and, 'fore Heaven! my authority with it!
Garcia!
cried a deep voice, that made the count
pause, as if chilled to marble, with one foot resting on
the lower step of the forum to which he was in the
act of ascending.
Garcia!
again spoke the same voice, in tones of
warning and reproof.
The count trembled.
Garcia
! a third time menacingly spoke Ihuahua,
to whom all eyes were now turned.
Who calls? asked the count, with a deadly
paleness
on his cheeks and lips, while he seemed as if he
would sink into the ground.
Thy brother! answered the venerable warrior;
and, advancing near, he threw off his loose robes, and
stood before him in the costume of an elderly Spanish
cavalier.
Does the sea give back its dead? cried Osma,
with fear.
Dost thou remember me?
Thou art my elder brother, whom I believed dead!
he cried, with horror and despair.
Thy
will
was surely my death, Garcia, but
Heaven
gave me escape by the very wickedness of the
means thou didst employ to execute it. More gold
than thou didst promise Rascas bought him from thee.
He saved my life and secured my escape, returning to
thee his own report of the execution of thy commands.
'Tis false! I sought not thy death!
Behold the instrument of thy intended crime, cried
the sorceress, directing the attention of all to Rascas,
who leaned upon two men in front of the crowd. He
hath long since confessed all to me!
Ha! Rascas! cried Osma, with delight, seeing
him present. Bear truly thy testimony!
Thou wilt little like it, answered Rascas, faintly,
but ironically. I obeyed thy commands all but the
death, and by chance finding a dead fisherman on the
beach, severed his head and carried it to thee for thy
brother's, for which thou gavest me three hundred
golden
moidoresa rare price for a fisherman's head! It
was on St. Michael's Day I brought thee the gory sight.
Villain, thou hast destroyed thyself for this
treachery
,
cried Osma, fiercely. Am I bearded? Am I
baited? Are both hell and heaven armed against me,
that I am thus held at bay by ye all?
Garcia Ramarez, said Ihuahua, or rather Don
Louis, count of Osma, as he had shown himself to
be, thou art bayed at by none save the bloodhounds
of thine own guilty conscience! I am rejoiced to see
thee feel! Yet methinks a brother come to thee after
twenty years' absence should receive a better welcome
than that which sits upon thy dark and turbid brow!
I am indeed thy elder brother Louis! whom, taking
advantage
of on a sick bed, thou didst imprison three
years in the lowest dungeons of my own castle, with
yonder assassin for my jailer; at whose hands, when
at length thou wouldst have slain me, I received more
mercy than at thine! From Spain I sailed for the
New World, disgusted with the land that bore upon
its green bosom a monster like thyself! With the
feelings of an anchorite, I buried myself in the
wilderness
of America, but from circumstances was at length
induced to throw off my solitary life and unite myself
with its simple inhabitants. I married the daughter of
the prince of the tribe to which I attached myself, and
at his death became its chief. I had quite forgotten
thee and thy crimes, when, three years ago, I heard of
the attempted conquest, by the Spaniards, of this
province
,
and heard also that Garcia, count of Osma, was
their leader. From that moment I was filled with a
desire to behold thee, resolved, if I found thee a
reformed
and penitent man, to leave thee to the
possession
of thy wickedly-gotten rank and title; but if the
lapse of years had made thee gray in iniquity, to pluck
thy honours from thy brow, and degrade thee to thy
merited infamy and contempt.
The voice of Don Louis was elevated at the close
to a stern and indignant tone. Garcia Ramarez
listened
to him while he was speaking with a set lip,
bent brow, flashing eyes, a bright red spot on either
cheek, and a nervous contraction of the fingers of his
hands, that betrayed the fearful pitch of emotion to
which he was inwardly moved. When he had ended,
he drew in a long, hard breath, as if he would swallow
down the feeling that swelled in his throat, and said
through his teeth, in a low tone of the most ironical
bitterness and scorn,
And
how
has Louis Ramarez found his brother
Garcia?
A chief devil in all but power, answered Don
Louis, in a tone of horror and detestation.
I will see whether I have power or not, cried
Osma, bursting into a volcano of irresistible fury and
vehemency, while his inflamed visage and burning
eyes, with the passionate dilation and expansion of his
whole form and figure, made him appear the living
representative of the arch-fiend himself. Every eye
that looked upon him, and witnessed the effect of his
demoniacal phrensy, quailed with wondering dread.
If I am not the Count of Osma, continued he, I
am at least the governor of this province, and have the
power to punish my enemies. Ho! Monterey! La
Torre! my guards! Seize this Count of Osma and
bind him! By the red rood! brother Louis, thou shalt
find I have power here! and no man, save Don
Alphonso
,
prince of Castile, from whom I received it,
shall deprive me of it. Seize and load him with
chains! How! Do ye hesitate? he demanded,
seeing
the men-at-arms, after advancing a step, stop and
look with surprise and alarm towards the windows
that opened upon the corridor.
His own quick, fierce glance followed theirs, and he
beheld with consternation, entering through every
door-like
casement, a file of Indian warriors, armed with
spears and battle-axes, led by the young chief
Opelousa
,
who, a short while before, had retired from the
hall, and now reappeared dressed like a Spanish noble,
save that the war-eagle's plume still towered above his
head, in honour of the proud maternal blood that
mingled
with his no less noble Castilian current. In an
instant of time, ere Osma could speak or move from
the spot where this extraordinary event surprised him,
the hall of judgment was filled with grim and painted
warriors, who ranged themselves by the sides and in
front of the tribunal, in stern and menacing silence,
overawing the Spanish soldiery.
Garcia, said Don Louis, with natural fraternal
feeling
,
after surveying upon his features the effect of this
sudden reverse of power, I would forgive thee if I
believed
contrition could find a home in thy heart. But
Heaven hath doomed thee to destruction, and sent upon
thee madness, the incurable madness of habitual
iniquity
.
Thy power here, as well as thy name and title,
must now end! Iniquity and crime have prospered with
thee during long years in their pursuit. But because
thou hast been suffered to go on for a time unchecked,
think not the vengeance of Heaven slumbers and will
never waken! Wickedness is sometimes permitted
to exist by infinite wisdom, that the sudden destruction
of its author may not involve the innocent in his
punishment
.
Thy lovely child has, in thine own case,
been thy guardian angel, and till now arrested the
suspended
bolt from thy head! It hath at length fallen
upon thee! but not until Heaven hath provided her
another protector in the noble youth whose manly
arm is sustaining her in this trying hour. It becomes
a mortal like me to imitate Heaven. For her sake,
I will give thee half of my estate if thou choosest
to return to Spain. I will also withhold my attack
upon thy forces herefor are they not all my
countrymen
?if
thou wilt now resign thy government.
To thee? demanded Osma, degraded yet still
haughty.
It is already mine! One thousand warriors, such
as you see here, whose will is my will, and who need
but the sign of a lifted finger to fall upon thy soldiery,
are within thy city's walls! Five hundred
Louisianians
also have possession of its gates and barriers!
Were the leaves of thy forests warriors, and these
to a man within the town, and filling my palace and
council-chamber, I would not give up my power
without
a struggle. It shall never be said Garcia of
Osma
,
or Garcia Ramarez, if thou wilt have it so,
brother
,
ever gave up a fortress without striking a blow for
its deliverance. I have lived a warrior, and I will die
with a weapon in my hand! Naught but death or
the command of my prince shall divest me of my
authority
!
Then resign it with what grace thou hast
remaining
,
tyrant, for thou wilt soon be divested of it, cried
the gallant Montejo, entering the hall, bearing aloft a
silken banner of the house of Castile, and approaching
the tribunal. Behind him followed a pursuivant, in the
gorgeous apparel and armour of his rank and office.
Montejo! Traitor! shouted Osma, as he
approached
;
and then, seeing the pursuivant, he
exclaimed
with surprise, How is this? the king's herald,
Olivier de Vezin! What brought thee out of Spain?
To witness our disgrace?
Know, Count of Osma interrupted Montejo.
My name is Garcia Ramarez, said the governor,
with irony.
Know then, Garcia Ramarez, continued
Montejo
,
with some surprise, that, hearing of thy
imprisonment
of the prince Don Henrique, who voyaged with
thee hither, his rank disguised to all save thyself and a
few friends, I fled in the yacht which was to have
borne him beyond the reach of thy vindictive power,
to demand of the Governor of Cuba aid against thee.
Ere I had got to sea, our ship fell in with a brigantine
bound hither from Spain, having at Havanna taken on
board his reverence the vicar-general. On board this
vessel also came passenger the noble Olivier de Vezin,
his Catholic majesty's royal herald at arms. He is
present with me here, and will deliver his own
message
and proclamation.
Thus speaking, Montejo drew back a step for the
royal herald to advance, when, recognising beneath his
disguise Don Henrique standing beside Azlie, who,
with Renault and the sorceress, were deeply intent
upon the development of events, he, with a cry of
surprise
and grateful joy, cast himself into his embrace.
The herald, commanding the attention of the
assembly
and tribunal, proclaimed, after the usual ceremonial
preliminaries, That Providence, in its wisdom, having
removed Don Alphonso, prince of Castile and the
Asturias
,
Infante of Spain, and heir to the throne of Spain
and Castile, by death, without issue, it was the will of
his Catholic majesty that his royal and-beloved son,
the young prince, Don Carlos Henrique, of Aragon,
now Prince of Castile, heir and successor to the throne,
do speedily return to Spain from his voluntary
banishment
,
incurred, continued the herald, in dread of the
church, to which royal wisdom would have consecrated
him, lest by his marriage, the realm, in another
generation
,
should be torn by civil dissensions between rival
houses! But Heaven, in its inscrutable ways, having
put an end to the elder branch of the royal line, the
commands and statutes relating to the younger brother,
Don Carlos Henrique, are revoked; and he is hereby,
and henceforward ever will be, received and
acknowledged
as Prince of Castile, and heir to the throne of
Spain and the Indies. God and Spain!
Viva
the
royal Prince of Castile!
Garcia Ramarez heard this proclamation with an
expression on his countenance that was indescribable.
There was a smile just perceptible on his mouth, and
a triumphant expansion of the pupil of the eye as he
looked up and moved it round upon each face
separately
.
Don Henrique watched him, and, together witl.
Renault and the sorceress, understood what was
passing
in his heart. His glance finally settled on Montejo.
Didst thou not say but now, traitorous Montejo, that
it were a grace to resign my power, lest it should be
taken from me? he asked, with malignant triumph.
I did.
This proclamation of De Vezin, methinks, doth
not revoke my commission. When this beardless
Prince of Castile, whom Heaven would have on the
throne to make of the realm a royal masqueradewhen
this new Infante shall bid me resign the power
conferred
on me by his brother Don Alphonso, then will I
obey; but thou, traitor, shalt not live to see it. To
arms, Spaniards! To arms! Sound the battle-cry,
he shouted, suddenly waving his sword, and sending
his loud voice far into the Place d'Armes. Lancers!
dragoons! and men-at-arms! Spain and honour calls
on you to do battle for your conquests!
Hold, Spaniards! shouted the voice of Don
Henrique
,
casting aside his disguise. Behold in me Don
Carlos, the Prince of Castile! I command your
allegiance
and obedience! Garcia of Ramarez! you
may well stand appalled! I am no spirit, but a living
man, whom Heaven hath raised up to be the
instrument
of its vengeance. Thy power is ended! Thou
hast filled the measure of thy crimes, and justice and
vengeance wait for their victim!
Gobin 'll have to be gov'nor again, said the fool,
who had crept upon the forum unobserved, and now
stood upon a chair of the tribunal.
Thus do I mock ye all! Ha, ha, ha! cried the
count, through his set teeth; and with a devilish and
most horrible laugh of mingled derision and despair,
he threw himself forward upon his sword point, and fell
pierced through the body upon the floor of the
council-chamber
.
A few words will close the tale.
The love and virtue of Azlie were rewarded by the
hand of the prince, to whom, as granddaughter to the
Moorish emperor, she was nearly equal in rank.
When afterward, as reigning princess of Castile, she
presided over the court of her capital, she was
distinguished
not less for her beauty than for her virtues,
with which she won the hearts of all around her; and
while she lived, Don Henrique never regretted that he
had bestowed his hand and princely coronet where he
had given his heart. But she lived not to reach the
throne; and when, at length, Don Henrique, under the
designation of Carlos IV., seated himself upon it,
another
and less lovely sat by his side.
Renault also, after the mourning for her father was
over, became united to Estelle. The gentle and
melancholy
beauty of the Marchioness of Caronde, as well
as the noble bearing of the young marquis, were not
forgotten in Paris, even in the early part of the
present
generation, by the surviving courtiers of the time
of Louis XIV.
Don Louis, the Count of Osma, having no reason to
dispossess Spain of the province of Louisiana by
attacking
Vol. II.T
her troops, returned with his warriors to the
forests, to which habit and disgust of the world had
attached
him, and died in old age, wept and honoured by
his adopted tribe; while his son, whom he had
educated
with the object of one day inheriting the home and
titles of his ancestors, sailed for Spain with Don
Henrique
,
where the castle of Osma received him as its
rightful heir and master. Don Henrique took the
Moor with him, and thence sent him to Morocco.
The sorceress, whom her skill in Moorish
astrology
,
as well as the knowledge which circumstances,
improved
by her own sagacity and subtlety, had enabled
to play such a mysterious and extraordinary part in the
foregoing scenes, and hold such an influence over the
minds, not only of the vicious, but the virtuous, became
the faithful and devoted slave of Azlie, as she had
been of Zillah, where, at length, she died in Castile.
The grieved princess, her mistress, erected a tablet
beside
a mausoleum, which her filial piety had built above
her mother's obscure grave, and long afterward
mourned
her death. Rascas recovered from his wounds
through the healing balm administered to him by the
sorceress, and ended his life on the gallows.
Gobin was taken to France under the especial
protection
of Renault, and being by him presented at court,
without the aid of his friend Boviedo, was long known
at Versailles as the rarest jester and wittiest fool of his
time. Boviedo expired suddenly on horseback, not long
after the death of his master, while in the act of
blowing
his trumpet in honour of the arrival of a new
governor
;
thus dying, as it were, in harness, as became a
doughty Aragonese trumpeter.
Reggio and his council were left in charge of the
affairs of the province until Don Henrique sent out
another
governor. Those whom Osma had imprisoned
were liberated. The remaining five of the Seven Frres
became faithful supporters of the Spanish government,
Charleval himself being made by Don Henrique
colonel
of a regiment of creoles, which he formed from the
chasseurs and
courreurs du bois
, and was also created
a perpetual
regidor
of the superior council.
Thus end I this
BOKE;
for as much as in wrytyng
of the same my
penne
is worn, myn hande wery, and myn
eyne dimmed with overmoche looking on the whit paper
.
THE END.